Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB125.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, June 30,
2026, and June 30, 2027, appropriations are hereby made, restrictions
and limitations are hereby imposed and transfers, capital improvement
projects, assessments, fees, receipts, disbursements, procedures and
acts incidental to the foregoing are hereby directed or authorized as
provided in this act.
(b) The agencies named in this act are hereby authorized to initiate
and complete the capital improvement projects specified and authorized
by this act or for which appropriations are made by this act, subject to
the restrictions and limitations imposed by this act.
(c) The provisions of this act relating to fiscal year 2026 shall be
known and may be cited as the omnibus appropriation act of 2025 and
shall constitute the omnibus reconciliation spending limit bill for the
2025 regular session of the legislature for purposes of K.S.A. 75-
6702(a), and amendments thereto.
(d) The appropriations made by this act shall not be subject to the
provisions of K.S.A. 46-155, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. (a) The department of corrections is hereby authorized and
directed to pay the following amount from the Hutchinson correctional
facility – facilities operations account of the state general fund for lost
property to the following claimants:
Perry L. Isley #45786
Hutchinson Correctional Facility
P.O. Box 1568
Hutchinson, KS 67504-1568..........................................................$50.00
Kendall Golston #104039
Hutchinson Correctional Facility
P.O. Box 1568
Hutchinson, KS 67504-1568..........................................................$30.04
(b) The department of corrections is hereby authorized and directed to
pay the following amount from the Larned state correctional facility –
facilities operations account of the state general fund for lost property
to the following claimant:
Franklyn Harrison #6004387
Larned State Correctional Facility
1318 KS Hwy #264
Larned, KS 67550-9304.................................................................$50.00
(c) The department of corrections is hereby authorized and directed to
pay the following amount from the Lansing correctional facility –
facilities operations account of the state general fund for lost property
to the following claimant:
Dexter Robinson #123892
P.O. Box 2
Lansing, KS 66043.......................................................................$100.00
Sec. 3. The Kansas department for aging and disability services is
hereby authorized and directed to pay the following amount from the
department's operating expenditures account of the state general fund
for failure to timely process a request for home and community-based
(HCBS) eligibility concerning a resident that resulted in a loss of
reimbursement for such services to the following claimant:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 2
Hillside Village, LLC
33600 W 85 St.
DeSoto, KS 66018..........................................................................$3,100
Sec. 4. The Kansas department of health and environment is hereby
authorized and directed to pay the following amount from the
department's operating expenditures account of the state general fund
for failure to timely process a request for home and community-based
(HCBS) eligibility concerning a resident that resulted in a loss of
reimbursement for such services to the following claimant:
Hillside Village, LLC
33600 W 85 St.
DeSoto, KS 66018..........................................................................$3,100
Sec. 5. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this act, the director of
accounts and reports is hereby authorized and directed to draw warrants
on the state treasurer in favor of the claimants specified in this act,
upon vouchers duly executed by the state agencies directed to pay the
amounts specified in such sections to the claimants or their legal
representatives or duly authorized agents, as provided by law.
(b) The director of accounts and reports shall secure, prior to the
payment of any amount to any claimant or as transactions between state
agencies as provided by this act, a written release and satisfaction of all
claims and rights against the state of Kansas and any agencies, officers
and employees of the state of Kansas regarding their respective claims.
Sec. 6.
ABSTRACTERS' BOARD OF EXAMINERS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Abstracters' fee fund (016-00-2700-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................$25,723
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................$25,733
Sec. 7.
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by the state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the board of accountancy fee fund (082-00-2701-0100) of
the board of accountancy is hereby increased from $482,769 to
$506,816.
Sec. 8.
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Board of accountancy fee fund (028-00-2701-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$483,965
Provided, That expenditures from the board of accountancy fee fund
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $1,600.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$489,996
Provided, That expenditures from the board of accountancy fee fund
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $1,600.
Special litigation reserve fund (028-00-2715-2700)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 3
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the executive
director of the board of accountancy, with the approval of the director
of the budget, may transfer moneys from the board of accountancy fee
fund (028-00-2701-0100) to the special litigation reserve fund (028-00-
2715-2700) of the board of accountancy: Provided, That the aggregate
of such transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not
exceed $20,000: Provided further, That the executive director of the
board of accountancy shall certify each such transfer of moneys to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the executive
director of the board of accountancy, with the approval of the director
of the budget, may transfer moneys from the board of accountancy fee
fund (028-00-2701-0100) to the special litigation reserve fund (028-00-
2715-2700) of the board of accountancy: Provided, That the aggregate
of such transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall not
exceed $20,000: Provided further, That the executive director of the
board of accountancy shall certify each such transfer of moneys to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
Sec. 9.
STATE BANK COMMISSIONER
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the bank
commissioner fee fund (094-00-2811) of the state bank commissioner
is hereby decreased from $13,607,801 to $13,557,797.
Sec. 10.
STATE BANK COMMISSIONER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 4
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Bank commissioner fee fund (094-00-2811)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026..............................$13,667,399
Provided, That expenditures from the bank commissioner fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality for the
division of consumer and mortgage lending shall not exceed $1,000:
Provided further, That expenditures from the bank commissioner fee
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality for
the division of banking shall not exceed $2,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...............................$13,711,453
Provided, That expenditures from the bank commissioner fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality for the
division of consumer and mortgage lending shall not exceed $1,000:
Provided further, That expenditures from the bank commissioner fee
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality for
the division of banking shall not exceed $2,000.
Bank examination and investigation fund (094-00-2013-1010)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Consumer education settlement fund (094-00-2560-2500)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the consumer
education settlement fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
consumer education purposes, which may be in accordance with
contracts for such activities, which are hereby authorized to be entered
into by the state bank commissioner or the deputy commissioner of the
consumer and mortgage lending division, as the case may require, and
the entities conducting such activities.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the consumer
education settlement fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for
consumer education purposes, which may be in accordance with
contracts for such activities, which are hereby authorized to be entered
into by the state bank commissioner or the deputy commissioner of the
consumer and mortgage lending division, as the case may require, and
the entities conducting such activities.
Litigation expense fund (094-00-2499-2499)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That the above agency is authorized to make expenditures
from the litigation expense fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, for costs, fees and expenses associated with administrative or
judicial proceedings regarding the enforcement of laws administered by
the consumer and mortgage lending division and the enforcement and
collection of assessed fines, fees and consumer refunds: Provided
further, That, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, a portion of
the moneys collected as a result of fines and investigative fees collected
by the consumer and mortgage lending division, as determined by the
deputy of the consumer and mortgage lending division, shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and credited to the litigation
expense fund.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That the above agency is authorized to make expenditures
from the litigation expense fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for costs, fees and expenses associated with administrative or
judicial proceedings regarding the enforcement of laws administered by
the consumer and mortgage lending division and the enforcement and
collection of assessed fines, fees and consumer refunds: Provided

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 5
further, That, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, a portion of
the moneys collected as a result of fines and investigative fees collected
by the consumer and mortgage lending division, as determined by the
deputy of the consumer and mortgage lending division, shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and credited to the litigation
expense fund.
(b) During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30,
2027, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 9-2209, 9-2218, 16a-2-
302 and 16a-6-104, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, all
moneys received under the Kansas mortgage business act or the
uniform consumer credit code for fines or settlement moneys
designated for consumer education shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the consumer education
settlement fund (094-00-2560-2500).
Sec. 11.
KANSAS BOARD OF BARBERING
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the board of
barbering fee fund (100-00-2704-0100) of the Kansas board of
barbering is hereby increased from $221,901 to $324,633.
Sec. 12.
KANSAS BOARD OF BARBERING
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Board of barbering fee fund (100-00-2704-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$258,595
Provided, That expenditures from the board of barbering fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $500: Provided, however, That in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on the board of barbering fee fund for fiscal year
2026, expenditures in an amount of not to exceed 90% of the balance of
the barbering board fee fund may be made by the above agency from
such fund for the fiscal year 2026 for purposes as determined necessary
by the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$262,654
Provided, That expenditures from the board of barbering fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $500: Provided, however, That in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on the board of barbering fee fund for fiscal year
2027, expenditures in an amount of not to exceed 90% of the balance of
the barbering board fee fund may be made by the above agency from
such fund for the fiscal year 2027 for purposes as determined necessary
by the above agency.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-1817, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal years ending
June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from any special revenue fund or funds for the above
agency for fiscal years 2026 and 2027 as authorized by this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
moneys for fiscal years 2026 and 2027 to charge and collect a fee for
the examination of an applicant to practice barbering in an amount of

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 6
not more than $150.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made from the board of
barbering fee fund for fiscal year 2027 by the above agency, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such fund to provide a plan detailing the above agency's five-year plan
for the above agency's vehicle use and maintenance to accomplish the
statutory duties of the agency to the division of the budget, house of
representatives committees on general government budget and
appropriations and the senate committee on ways and means on or
before June 30, 2027.
Sec. 13.
BEHAVIORAL SCIENCES REGULATORY BOARD
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the behavioral
sciences regulatory board fee fund (102-00-2730-0100) of the
behavioral sciences regulatory board is hereby decreased from
$1,243,446 to $1,206,956.
Sec. 14.
BEHAVIORAL SCIENCES REGULATORY BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Behavioral sciences regulatory board fee fund (102-00-2730-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$1,226,463
Provided, That expenditures from the behavioral sciences regulatory
board fee fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000: Provided further, That all
expenditures from the behavioral sciences regulatory board fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for disciplinary hearings shall be
in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the behavioral
sciences regulatory board fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$1,234,535
Provided, That expenditures from the behavioral sciences regulatory
board fee fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000: Provided further, That all
expenditures from the behavioral sciences regulatory board fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for disciplinary hearings shall be
in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the behavioral
sciences regulatory board fee fund for fiscal year 2027.
Coronavirus relief fund (102-00-3753)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Sec. 15.
STATE BOARD OF HEALING ARTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Healing arts fee fund (105-00-2705-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$7,878,653
Provided, That expenditures from the healing arts fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$5,000: Provided further, That all expenditures from the healing arts fee

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 7
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for disciplinary hearings
shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the
healing arts fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$8,037,946
Provided, That expenditures from the healing arts fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$5,000: Provided further, That all expenditures from the healing arts fee
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for disciplinary hearings
shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on the
healing arts fee fund for fiscal year 2027.
Medical records maintenance trust fund (105-00-7206-7200)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................$35,000
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................$35,000
Sec. 16.
KANSAS STATE BOARD OF COSMETOLOGY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Cosmetology fee fund (149-00-2706-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$1,315,590
Provided, That expenditures from the cosmetology fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$1,315,590
Provided, That expenditures from the cosmetology fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,000.
Sec. 17.
STATE DEPARTMENT OF CREDIT UNIONS
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the credit union
fee fund (159-00-2026-0100) of the state department of credit unions is
hereby decreased from $1,439,263 to $1,397,029.
Sec. 18.
STATE DEPARTMENT OF CREDIT UNIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Credit union fee fund (159-00-2026-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$1,417,916
Provided, That expenditures from the credit union fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $300.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$1,374,455
Provided, That expenditures from the credit union fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $300.
Sec. 19.
KANSAS DENTAL BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 8
Dental board fee fund (167-00-2708-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$544,000
Provided, That expenditures from the dental board fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $1,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$510,000
Provided, That expenditures from the dental board fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $1,000.
Special litigation reserve fund (167-00-2749-2000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
Sec. 20.
STATE BOARD OF MORTUARY ARTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Mortuary arts fee fund (204-00-2709-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026....................................$353,511
Provided, That expenditures from the mortuary arts fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$359,143
Provided, That expenditures from the mortuary arts fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $500.
Sec. 21.
KANSAS BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN FITTING
AND DISPENSING OF HEARING INSTRUMENTS
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the hearing
instrument board fee fund (266-00-2712-9900) of the Kansas board of

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 9
examiners in fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments is hereby
decreased from $49,369 to $37,986.
Sec. 22.
KANSAS BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN FITTING AND
DISPENSING OF HEARING INSTRUMENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Hearing instrument board fee fund (266-00-2712-9900)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................$38,255
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................$38,973
Hearing instrument litigation fund (266-00-2136-2136)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the hearing
instrument litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
except upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after
ascertaining that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable
effects of a foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the
requested expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on
the requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2)
the requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next
preceding session of the legislature and is not contrary to known
legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above
agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship
to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the hearing
instrument litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
except upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after
ascertaining that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable
effects of a foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the
requested expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on
the requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2)
the requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next
preceding session of the legislature and is not contrary to known
legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above
agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship
to powers and functions of the above agency.
Sec. 23.
BOARD OF NURSING
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Board of nursing fee fund (482-00-2716-0200)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$3,854,238
Provided, That expenditures from the board of nursing fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$3,954,238
Provided, That expenditures from the board of nursing fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $500.
Gifts and grants fund (482-00-7346-4000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 10
Education conference fund (482-00-2209-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Criminal background and fingerprinting fund (482-00-2745-2700)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Sec. 24.
BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN OPTOMETRY
(a) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the optometry fee fund (488-
00-2717-0100) as authorized by section 24(a) of chapter 82 of the 2023
Session Laws of Kansas, this or any other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made from such
moneys in an amount of not to exceed $1,000 for official hospitality.
Sec. 25.
BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN OPTOMETRY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Optometry fee fund (488-00-2717-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$273,704
Provided, That expenditures from the optometry fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$254,869
Provided, That expenditures from the optometry fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,000.
Optometry litigation fund (488-00-2547-2547)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the optometry
litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and
delay until the next legislative session on the requested action would be
contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is
not one that was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature
and is not contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested
action will assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that
bears a valid relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the optometry
litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except upon the
approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining that: (1)
Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a foreseeable
occurrence characterize the need for the requested expenditure, and
delay until the next legislative session on the requested action would be
contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the requested expenditure is
not one that was rejected in the next preceding session of the legislature
and is not contrary to known legislative policy; and (3) the requested
action will assist the above agency in attaining an objective or goal that
bears a valid relationship to powers and functions of the above agency.
Criminal history fingerprinting fund (488-00-2565-2565)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 11
Sec. 26.
STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the state board of
pharmacy fee fund (531-00-2718-0100) of the state board of pharmacy
is hereby decreased from $3,768,713 to $2,726,649.
Sec. 27.
STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
State board of pharmacy fee fund (531-00-2718-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$2,947,109
Provided, That expenditures from the state board of pharmacy fee fund
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$3,607,526
Provided, That expenditures from the state board of pharmacy fee fund
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,500.
State board of pharmacy litigation fund (531-00-2733-2700)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the state board of
pharmacy litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
except upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after
ascertaining that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable
effects of a foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the
requested expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on
the requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2)
the requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next
preceding session of the legislature and is not contrary to known
legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above
agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship
to powers and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the state board of
pharmacy litigation fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
except upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after
ascertaining that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable
effects of a foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the
requested expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on
the requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2)
the requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next
preceding session of the legislature and is not contrary to known
legislative policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above
agency in attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship
to powers and functions of the above agency.
Prescription monitoring program fund (531-00-2827-2827)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Harold Rogers prescription fund (531-00-3188-3110)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Strategic prevention framework for prescription
drugs – federal fund (531-00-3284-3284)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 12
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Prescription drug overdose data-driven prevention
initiative – federal fund (531-00-3294-3294)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Public health crisis response fund (531-00-3602-3602)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Non-federal gifts and grants fund (531-00-7018-7000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That the state board of pharmacy is hereby authorized to
apply for and to accept grants and may accept donations, bequests or
gifts during fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That the board shall
remit all moneys received under this proviso to the state treasurer in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto: Provided further, That, upon receipt of each such remittance,
the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to
the credit of the non-federal gifts and grants fund: And provided further,
That all expenditures from the non-federal gifts and grants fund for
fiscal year 2026 shall be made in accordance with appropriation acts
upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to
vouchers approved by the president of the state board of pharmacy or a
person designated by the president.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That the state board of pharmacy is hereby authorized to
apply for and to accept grants and may accept donations, bequests or
gifts during fiscal year 2027: Provided, however, That the board shall
remit all moneys received under this proviso to the state treasurer in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto: Provided further, That, upon receipt of each such remittance,
the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to
the credit of the non-federal gifts and grants fund: And provided further,
That all expenditures from the non-federal gifts and grants fund for
fiscal year 2027 shall be made in accordance with appropriation acts
upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to
vouchers approved by the president of the state board of pharmacy or a
person designated by the president.
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the executive
secretary of the state board of pharmacy, with the approval of the
director of the budget, may transfer moneys from the state board of
pharmacy fee fund (531-00-2718-0100) to the state board of pharmacy
litigation fund (531-00-2733-2700) of the state board of pharmacy:
Provided, That the aggregate of such transfers for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, shall not exceed $50,000: Provided further, That the
executive secretary of the state board of pharmacy shall certify each
such transfer of moneys to the director of accounts and reports and
shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the executive
secretary of the state board of pharmacy, with the approval of the
director of the budget, may transfer moneys from the state board of
pharmacy fee fund (531-00-2718-0100) to the state board of pharmacy
litigation fund (531-00-2733-2700) of the state board of pharmacy:
Provided, That the aggregate of such transfers for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, shall not exceed $50,000: Provided further, That the
executive secretary of the state board of pharmacy shall certify each
such transfer of moneys to the director of accounts and reports and
shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 13
Sec. 28.
REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Appraiser fee fund (543-00-2732-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$443,064
Provided, That expenditures from the appraiser fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$500.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$400,503
Provided, That expenditures from the appraiser fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$500.
Federal registry clearing fund (543-00-7752-7000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
AMC federal registry clearing fund (543-00-7755-7755)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Special litigation reserve fund (543-00-2698-2698)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
(b) During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30,
2027, the executive director of the real estate appraisal board, with the
approval of the director of the budget, may transfer moneys from the
appraiser fee fund (543-00-2732-0100) of the real estate appraisal
board to the special litigation reserve fund (543-00-2698-2698) of the
real estate appraisal board: Provided, That the aggregate of such
transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, shall not exceed $20,000: Provided further, That
the executive director of the real estate appraisal board shall certify
each such transfer of moneys to the director of accounts and reports and

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 14
shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the real estate appraisal board from moneys appropriated
from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal years 2025 and 2026
as authorized by section 27 of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws of
Kansas, this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such moneys appropriated in such years to review the practical
applications of real estate appraisal program and participate in such
program to increase the number of appraisers available in Kansas and
include the above agency's participation in the program in a report to
the house committee on appropriations, house committee on general
government budget and the senate committee on ways and means on or
before January 31, 2026.
Sec. 29.
KANSAS REAL ESTATE COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Real estate fee fund (549-00-2721-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026................................$1,354,013
Provided, That expenditures from the real estate fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027................................$1,383,770
Provided, That expenditures from the real estate fee fund for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,000.
Real estate recovery revolving fund (549-00-7368-4200)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Background investigation fee fund (549-00-2722-2700)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Special litigation reserve fund (549-00-2821-2821)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 15
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and June 30,
2027, the executive director of the Kansas real estate commission, with
the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer moneys from
the real estate fee fund (549-00-2721-0100) to the special litigation
reserve fund of the Kansas real estate commission: Provided, That the
aggregate of such transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall not exceed $20,000:
Provided further, That the executive director of the Kansas real estate
commission shall certify each such transfer of moneys to the director of
accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification
to the director of the budget and the director of legislative research.
Sec. 30.
STATE BOARD OF TECHNICAL PROFESSIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Technical professions fee fund (663-00-2729-0100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$860,319
Provided, That expenditures from the technical professions fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,000.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$875,120
Provided, That expenditures from the technical professions fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $2,000.
Special litigation reserve fund (663-00-2739-0200)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made from the special
litigation reserve fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, except
upon the approval of the director of the budget acting after ascertaining
that: (1) Unforeseeable occurrence or unascertainable effects of a
foreseeable occurrence characterize the need for the requested
expenditure, and delay until the next legislative session on the
requested action would be contrary to clause (3) of this proviso; (2) the
requested expenditure is not one that was rejected in the next preceding
session of the legislature and is not contrary to known legislative
policy; and (3) the requested action will assist the above agency in
attaining an objective or goal that bears a valid relationship to powers
and functions of the above agency.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 16
Sec. 31.
STATE BOARD OF VETERINARY EXAMINERS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Veterinary examiners fee fund (700-00-2727-1100)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$406,361
Provided, That expenditures from the veterinary examiners fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $700.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$412,101
Provided, That expenditures from the veterinary examiners fee fund for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $700.
Sec. 32.
GOVERNMENTAL ETHICS COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year or years specified, the following:
Operating expenditures (247-00-1000-0103)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026...................................$560,191
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027...................................$554,784
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year or years specified all
moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such fund
or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized by law
shall not exceed the following:
Governmental ethics commission fee fund (247-00-2188-2000)
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.....................................No limit
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.....................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30,
2027, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 25-4152, 25-4180, 25-
4181, 25-4186, 46-280, 46-288 and 75-3036, and amendments thereto,
or any other statute, all moneys received from civil penalties charges
and collected by the governmental ethics commission under K.S.A. 25-
4152, 25-4180, 25-4181, 25-4186, 46-280 and 46-288, and
amendments thereto, shall be remitted to the state treasurer in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state
general fund.
Sec. 33.
LEGISLATIVE COORDINATING COUNCIL
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $821,290 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 24(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the legislative coordinating council –
operations account (422-00-1000-0100), the sum of $49,893 is hereby
lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $5,153,147
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 24(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the legislative research

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 17
department – operations account (425-00-1000-0103), the sum of
$111,741 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $4,801,277 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 24(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the office of revisor of statutes – operations
account (579-00-1000-0103), the sum of $538,588 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 34.
LEGISLATIVE COORDINATING COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Legislative coordinating council –
operations (422-00-1000-0100).................................................$965,242
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the legislative
coordinating council – operations account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Legislative research department –
operations (425-00-1000-0103)..............................................$5,632,057
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the legislative research
department – operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Office of revisor of statutes –
operations (579-00-1000-0103)..............................................$5,060,760
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of revisor of
statutes – operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Legislative research department special
revenue fund (425-00-2111-2000)...............................................No limit
Legislature employment security fund........................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the office of
revisor of statutes and the legislative research department from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or
funds for such agencies for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by such agencies from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 to
identify moneys in any state general fund account or special revenue
fund of any state agency named in this act that are moneys for services
to students attending grades K-12 at any public school operated by a
school district organized under the laws of this state and including
moneys appropriated or received pursuant to articles 34, 51, 53 or 54 of
chapter 72 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto:
Provided, That during fiscal year 2026, such information shall be
available for review during the preparation of school finance caseload
estimations and the joint estimates of revenues pursuant to K.S.A. 75-
6701, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 35.
LEGISLATURE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Efficiency analysis review account.........................................$1,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
the efficiency analysis review account for the fiscal year ending June

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 18
30, 2025, to enter into one or more contracts with a professional
consulting service or services to assist in the review and evaluation of
how data analytics, statistical analysis and artificial intelligence could
be used to evaluate and identify potential efficiencies in state finances
and state agencies: Provided further, That the review and evaluation of
state finances shall include access to micro level data that shows
revenue and expenditures for the analysis of how data analytics,
statistical analysis and artificial intelligence would assist the legislature
to identify potential efficiencies: And provided further, That the state
agency review and evaluation shall include examining the designated
state agency's core functions, procedures and efficiencies and analyze
how data analytics, statistical analysis and artificial intelligence would
assist such agencies in providing services more efficiently that may
result in an overall reduction in expenditures: And provided further,
That the legislative coordinating council shall have the authority to
develop a scope statement, select the state agencies to be reviewed and
evaluated, draft a request for proposal and solicit bids in an amount not
to exceed $1,000,000 for such review and evaluation: And provided
further, That the legislative coordinating council shall approve any such
contract or contracts: And provided further, That such professional
consulting service or services shall provide a report to the house
committee on appropriations and the senate committee on ways and
means on or before January 1, 2026.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $16,978,235
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 26(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the operations (including official
hospitality) account (428-00-1000-0103), the sum of $3,924,863 is
hereby lapsed.
Sec. 36.
LEGISLATURE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operations (including official
hospitality) (428-00-1000-0103)...........................................$25,522,660
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operations (including
official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this account, pursuant to vouchers
approved by the chairperson or vice chairperson of the legislative
coordinating council, to pay compensation and travel expenses and
subsistence expenses or allowances as authorized by K.S.A. 75-3212,
and amendments thereto, for members and associate members of the
advisory committee to the Kansas commission on interstate cooperation
established under K.S.A. 46-407a, and amendments thereto, for
attendance at meetings of the advisory committee that are authorized by
the legislative coordinating council, except that: (1) The legislative
coordinating council may establish restrictions or limitations, or both,
on travel expenses, subsistence expenses or allowances, or any
combination thereof, paid to members and associate members of such
advisory committee; and (2) any person who is an associate member of
such advisory committee, by reason of such person having been
accredited by the national conference of commissioners on uniform
state laws as a life member of that organization, shall receive the same
travel expenses and subsistence expenses for attendance at meetings of
the advisory committee as a regular member, but shall receive no per
diem compensation: And provided further, That expenditures may be
made from this account for services, facilities and supplies provided for
legislators in addition to those provided under the approved budget and

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 19
for related copying, facsimile transmission and other services provided
to persons other than legislators, in accordance with policies and any
restrictions or limitations prescribed by the legislative coordinating
council: And provided further, That no expenditures shall be made from
this account for any meeting of any joint committee, or of any
subcommittee of any joint committee, chargeable to fiscal year 2026
unless such meeting is approved by the legislative coordinating council:
And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A.
45-116, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures
shall be made from this account for the printing and distribution of
copies of the permanent journals of the senate or the house of
representatives to each member of the legislature during fiscal year
2026: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 77-138, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no
expenditures shall be made from this account for the printing and
distribution of complete sets of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each
member of the legislature in excess of one complete set of the Kansas
Statutes Annotated to each member at the commencement of the
member's first term as legislator during fiscal year 2026: And provided
further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 77-138, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures shall be
made from this account for the legislator's name to be printed on one
complete set of the Kansas Statutes Annotated during fiscal year 2026:
And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A.
77-165, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures
shall be made from this account for the printing and delivering of a set
of the cumulative supplements of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to
each member of the legislature in excess of one cumulative supplement
set of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each member of the legislature
during fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-1005, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, expenditures may be made from this account to reimburse
members of the legislature for expenses incurred in printing
correspondence with constituents: And provided further, That no
expenses shall be reimbursed unless a legislator has first obtained
approval for such printing by the director of legislative administrative
services: And provided further, That such reimbursements shall only be
issued after a legislator provides written receipts showing such expense
to the director of legislative administrative services: And provided
further, That the maximum amount reimbursed to any legislator shall be
equal to or less than the maximum amount allotted to any legislator for
constituent correspondence pursuant to policies adopted by the
legislative coordinating council: And provided further, That in addition
to the provisions of the Kansas legislative intern program pursuant to
legislative coordinating council policy 37, expenditures shall be made
by the above agency from this account in fiscal year 2026 to pay for the
actual mileage of Kansas legislative interns traveling to the capitol for
the required minimum of 12 days of attendance at the capitol.
Legislative information
system (428-00-1000-0300)....................................................$8,836,189
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the legislative
information system account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Legislative special

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 20
revenue fund (428-00-2260-2200)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the legislative special
revenue fund, pursuant to vouchers approved by the chairperson or the
vice chairperson of the legislative coordinating council, to pay
compensation and travel expenses and subsistence expenses or
allowances as authorized by K.S.A. 75-3212, and amendments thereto,
for members and associate members of the advisory committee to the
Kansas commission on interstate cooperation established under K.S.A.
46-407a, and amendments thereto, for attendance at meetings of the
advisory committee which are authorized by the legislative
coordinating council, except that: (1) The legislative coordinating
council may establish restrictions or limitations, or both, on travel
expenses, subsistence expenses or allowances, or any combination
thereof, paid to members and associate members of such advisory
committee; and (2) any person who is an associate member of such
advisory committee, by reason of such person having been accredited
by the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws as a
life member of that organization, shall receive the same travel expenses
and subsistence expenses for attendance at meetings of the advisory
committee as a regular member, but shall receive no per diem
compensation: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from
this fund for services, facilities and supplies provided for legislators in
addition to those provided under the approved budget and for related
copying, facsimile transmission and other services provided to persons
other than legislators, in accordance with policies and any restrictions
or limitations prescribed by the legislative coordinating council: And
provided further, That amounts are hereby authorized to be collected for
such services, facilities and supplies in accordance with policies of the
council: And provided further, That such amounts shall be fixed in order
to recover all or part of the expenses incurred for providing such
services, facilities and supplies and shall be consistent with policies and
fees established in accordance with K.S.A. 46-1207a, and amendments
thereto: And provided further, That all such amounts received shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
legislative special revenue fund: And provided further, That all
donations, gifts or bequests of money for the legislative branch of
government that are received and accepted by the legislative
coordinating council shall be deposited in the state treasury and
credited to an account of the legislative special revenue fund: And
provided further, That no expenditures shall be made from this fund for
any meeting of any joint committee, or of any subcommittee of any
joint committee, during fiscal year 2026 unless such meeting is
approved by the legislative coordinating council: And provided further,
That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 45-116, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures shall be
made from this fund for the printing and distribution of copies of the
permanent journals of the senate or the house of representatives to each
member of the legislature during fiscal year 2026: And provided
further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 77-138, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures shall be
made from this fund for the printing and distribution of complete sets
of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each member of the legislature in
excess of one complete set of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each
member at the commencement of the member's first term as legislator
during fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 77-138, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, no expenditures shall be made from this fund for the legislator's
name to be printed on one complete set of the Kansas Statutes

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 21
Annotated during fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 77-165, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, no expenditures shall be made from this
fund for the printing and delivering of a set of the cumulative
supplements of the Kansas Statutes Annotated to each member of the
legislature in excess of one cumulative supplement set of the Kansas
Statutes Annotated to each member of the legislature during fiscal year
2026.
Capitol restoration – gifts and
donations fund (428-00-7348-7000)............................................No limit
(c) As used in this section, "joint committee" includes the joint
committee on administrative rules and regulations, healthcare
stabilization fund oversight committee, joint committee on special
claims against the state, legislative budget committee, joint committee
on state building construction, joint committee on information
technology, joint committee on pensions, investments and benefits,
joint committee on state-tribal relations, confirmation oversight
committee, J. Russell (Russ) Jennings joint committee on corrections
and juvenile justice oversight, compensation commission, joint
committee on Kansas security, Robert G. (Bob) Bethell joint committee
on home and community based services and KanCare oversight, capitol
preservation committee, joint committee on child welfare system
oversight, joint committee on fiduciary financial institutions oversight
and any other committee, commission or other body for which
expenditures are to be paid from moneys appropriated for the
legislature for the expenses of any meeting of any such body or for the
expenses of any member thereof.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or
from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 to install
and make available during the 2026 regular session of the legislature
short-range wireless technology to transmit live audio of the house of
representatives and the senate chambers during such chambers' session
with access to such audio limited to approved legislator devices or
otherwise allow for bluetooth connection and provide an independent
internet network for such technology and access to such network be
limited to legislators.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
moneys for fiscal year 2026 to create an interim study committee to
examine the KanCare 3.0 program, including, but not limited to, the
requirements, actions and rules of the department of health and
environment and the Kansas department for aging and disability
services in executing the program, and any actuarial and financial
concerns and practices associated with the KanCare 3.0 program.
Sec. 37.
DIVISION OF POST AUDIT
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $3,478,835 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 28(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the operations (including legislative post audit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 22
committee) account (540-00-1000-0100), the sum of $382,396 is
hereby lapsed.
Sec. 38.
DIVISION OF POST AUDIT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operations (including legislative post
audit committee) (540-00-1000-0100)....................................$3,602,447
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operations (including
legislative post audit committee) account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 39.
GOVERNOR'S DEPARTMENT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Governor's department (252-00-1000-0503)..........................$4,300,449
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the governor's department
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures may be made
from this account for official hospitality and contingencies without
limitation at the discretion of the governor: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account for
fiscal year 2026 to provide to members of the public upon request
information concerning all locations where the governor and the
lieutenant governor traveled during fiscal year 2026 and the amount of
travel expenses for each such location.
Domestic violence
prevention grants (252-00-1000-0600).................................$25,110,151
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the domestic violence
prevention grants account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from the domestic violence prevention
grants account for official hospitality and contingencies without
limitation at the discretion of the governor.
Child advocacy centers (252-00-1000-0610)..........................$4,593,918
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the child advocacy
centers account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from the child advocacy centers account for official
hospitality and contingencies without limitation at the discretion of the
governor.
CASA grant (252-00-1000-0630)...........................................$1,230,535
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the CASA grant account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures may be made
from the CASA grant account for official hospitality and contingencies
without limitation at the discretion of the governor.
(b) Expenditures may be made by the above agency for travel
expenses of the governor's spouse when accompanying the governor or
when representing the governor on official state business, for travel and
subsistence expenditures, for security personnel when traveling with
the governor and for entertainment of officials and other persons as
guests from the amount appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, by subsection (a) from the state general fund in the governor's
department account (252-00-1000-0503).
(c) Expenditures may be made by the above agency for travel
expenses of the lieutenant governor's spouse when accompanying the
lieutenant governor or when representing the lieutenant governor on
official state business, for travel and subsistence expenditures, for

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 23
security personnel when traveling with the lieutenant governor and for
entertainment of officials and other persons as guests from the amount
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by subsection (a)
from the state general fund in the governor's department account (252-
00-1000-0503).
(d) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Special programs fund (252-00-2149).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the special programs
fund for operating expenditures for the governor's department,
including conferences and official hospitality: Provided further, That
the governor is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for
such conferences: And provided further, That fees for such conferences
shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating expenses
incurred for such conferences, including official hospitality: And
provided further, That all fees received for such conferences shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
special programs fund.
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (252-00-2409)....................................................No limit
Kansas commission on disability concerns
fee fund (252-00-2767)................................................................No limit
White collar crime fund (252-00-2853).......................................No limit
Residential substance abuse –
federal fund (252-00-3006).........................................................No limit
Arrest grant – federal fund (252-00-3082)..................................No limit
National criminal history improvement program –
federal fund (252-00-3189).........................................................No limit
Violence against women grant –
federal fund (252-00-3214).........................................................No limit
Project safe neighborhoods –
federal fund (252-00-3217).........................................................No limit
Coverdell forensic science improvement –
federal fund (252-00-3227).........................................................No limit
Crime victim assistance –
federal fund (252-00-3260).........................................................No limit
Pandemic assistance/vaccine
equity fund (252-00-3372)...........................................................No limit
Access visitation grant –
federal fund (252-00-3460).........................................................No limit
Battered women/family violence prevention –
federal fund (252-00-3461).........................................................No limit
Sexual assault services program –
federal fund (252-00-3465).........................................................No limit
Family violence prevention services –
ARPA federal fund (252-00-3640)..............................................No limit
Emergency rental assistance –
federal fund (252-00-3646).........................................................No limit
Coronavirus emergency supplemental –
federal fund (252-00-3671).........................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund –
federal fund (252-00-3753).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan –
state fiscal relief –
federal fund (252-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Edward Byrne justice assistance grants –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 24
federal fund (252-00-3757).........................................................No limit
Prison rape elimination act –
federal fund (252-00-3758).........................................................No limit
Homeowners' assistance –
federal fund (252-00-3759).........................................................No limit
John R Justice grant –
federal fund (252-00-3802).........................................................No limit
Hispanic and Latino
American affairs commission –
donations fund (252-00-7236).....................................................No limit
Advisory commission on
African-American affairs –
donations fund (252-00-7242).....................................................No limit
Sec. 40.
ATTORNEY GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Operating expenditures (082-00-1000-0103).............................$311,880
Safe and secure firearm detection program...........................$10,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such account during fiscal year 2025 to oversee and implement the safe
and secure firearm detection program in accordance with the
requirements of this proviso: Provided further, That the above agency
shall enter into a contract with a private vendor for firearm detection
software to be used by a public school: And provided further, That such
software shall: (1) Detect and alert building personnel and first
responders regarding the presence of visible, unholstered firearms on
the public school property; (2) be fully designated as qualified anti-
terrorism technology under the federal SAFETY act, 6 U.S.C. § 441 et
seq.; (3) integrate with a building's security camera infrastructure; (4)
be directly managed by the contracted vendor through a constantly
monitored operations center that is staffed by highly trained analysts
who can rapidly communicate possible threats to law enforcement and
appropriate building personnel; and (5) be developed in the United
States without the use of any third-party or open-source data: And
provided further, That any public school may apply to the attorney
general for authorization to use the firearm detection software: And
provided further, That the application shall be in such form and manner
as the above agency requires and submitted at a time determined and
specified by the above agency: And provided further, That each
application submitted by a public school shall specify the buildings in
which such public school intends to use the firearm detection software:
Provided however, That it is the intent of the legislature that this
funding for the safe and secure firearm detection program terminate
following fiscal year 2026 and that no additional state funding shall be
provided for such program: And provided further, That if a unified
school district decides to continue to use such program, such program
shall be funded from existing resources of such district: And provided
further, That, as used in this proviso, "public school" means any school
operated by a school district organized under the laws of this state.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the amount of moneys
appropriated and reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, by section 32(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024
Session Laws of Kansas from the state general fund in the litigation
costs account (082-00-1000-0040), the sum of $226,774 is hereby
lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 32(b) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the crime victims

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 25
compensation fund (082-00-2563-2060) for state operations of the
attorney general is hereby increased from $681,791 to $840,092.
(d) On the effective date of this act, or as soon thereafter as
moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$460,593 from the Kansas endowment for youth fund (365-00-7000-
2000) to the tobacco master settlement agreement compliance fund
(082-00-2383-2320) of the attorney general.
Sec. 41.
ATTORNEY GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Litigation costs (082-00-1000-0040)...........................................$40,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the litigation costs
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Operating expenditures (082-00-1000-0103)..........................$9,201,268
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$2,000.
Office of inspector general (082-00-1000-0300)....................$1,387,852
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of inspector
general account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, expenditures shall be made
by the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 for the
office of inspector general to conduct an audit on the utilization of the
service and repair of complex wheelchairs, annual preventative
maintenance appointments and any necessary repairs not requiring
prior authorization by the division of health care finance of the
department of health and environment during fiscal year 2026.
Child abuse grants (082-00-1000-0400)......................................$75,000
Child exchange and
visitation centers (082-00-1000-0450).......................................$128,000
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-7334, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the above agency may use moneys in the child exchange
and visitation centers account for matching funds.
Abuse, neglect and
exploitation unit (082-00-1000-0500)........................................$400,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the abuse, neglect and
exploitation unit account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made by the attorney general from the abuse,
neglect and exploitation unit account pursuant to contracts with other
agencies or organizations to provide services related to the
investigation or litigation of findings related to abuse, neglect or
exploitation.
Protection from abuse (082-00-1000-0900)...............................$570,900
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts as of June 30,
2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Safe and secure
firearm detection program: Provided, That all expenditures made by the
above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 shall be
subject to the provisions of the provisos for such account pursuant to
section 40(a): Provided however, That it is the intent of the legislature
that this funding for the safe and secure firearm detection program
terminate following fiscal year 2026 and that no additional state
funding shall be provided for such program: And provided further, That

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 26
if a unified school district decides to continue to use such program,
such program shall be funded from existing resources of such district.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Court cost fund (082-00-2012-2000)...........................................No limit
Private detective fee fund (082-00-2029-2029)...........................No limit
Provided, That, in furtherance of the purposes authorized by K.S.A. 75-
7b17, and amendments thereto, specifically obtaining "such other
information as deemed necessary by the attorney general" pursuant to
K.S.A. 75-7b17(b)(5), and amendments thereto, expenditures may be
made from the private detective fee fund to secure from the Kansas
bureau of investigation criminal history record information related to
adult convictions, adult non-convictions, adult diversions, adult
expunged records, juvenile adjudications, juvenile non-adjudications,
juvenile diversions and juvenile expunged records for fingerprints
submitted in conjunction with an application for a private detective
firearm permit.
Scrap metal theft reduction
fee fund (082-00-2085-2100)......................................................No limit
Kansas attorney general batterer
intervention program
certification fund (082-00-2103-2103)........................................No limit
Attorney general's committee on crime
prevention fee fund (082-00-2113-2090)....................................No limit
Provided, That, expenditures may be made from the attorney general's
committee on crime prevention fee fund for operating expenditures
directly or indirectly related to conducting training seminars organized
by the attorney general's committee on crime prevention, including
official hospitality: Provided further, That the attorney general is
hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for conducting training
seminars organized by the attorney general's committee on crime
prevention: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order
to recover all or part of the direct and indirect operating expenses
incurred for conducting such seminars, including official hospitality:
And provided further, That all fees received for conducting such
seminars shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the attorney general's committee on crime prevention fee
fund.
SSA fraud prevention
federal fund (082-00-2174-2175)................................................No limit
Protection from abuse fund (082-00-2239-2030)........................No limit
Bond transcript review
fee fund (082-00-2254-2300)......................................................No limit
Bail enforcement agents
fee fund (082-00-2259-2259)......................................................No limit
Provided, That, in furtherance of the purposes authorized by K.S.A. 75-
7e01 through 75-7e09, and amendments thereto, expenditures may be
made from the bail enforcement agents fee fund to secure from the
Kansas bureau of investigation criminal history record information
related to adult convictions, adult non-convictions, adult diversions,
adult expunged records, juvenile adjudications, juvenile non-
adjudications, juvenile diversions and juvenile expunged records for
fingerprints submitted in conjunction with an application for a bail
enforcement agent license.
Fraud and abuse criminal

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 27
prosecution fund (082-00-2262-2262).........................................No limit
Debt collection administration cost
recovery fund (082-00-2305-2240).............................................No limit
Provided, That the attorney general shall deposit in the state treasury to
the credit of the debt collection administration cost recovery fund all
moneys remitted to the attorney general as administrative costs under
contracts entered into pursuant to K.S.A. 75-719, and amendments
thereto.
Interstate water
litigation fund (082-00-2311-2295).............................................No limit
Provided, That, in addition to the other purposes authorized by K.S.A.
82a-1802, and amendments thereto, expenditures may be made from
the interstate water litigation fund for: (1) Litigation costs for the case
of Kansas v. Colorado No. 105, Original in the Supreme Court of the
United States, including repayment of past contributions; (2) expenses
related to the appointment of a river master or such other official as
may be appointed by the Supreme Court to administer, implement or
enforce its decree or other orders of the Supreme Court related to this
case; and (3) expenses incurred by agencies of the state of Kansas to
monitor actions of the state of Colorado and its water users and to
enforce any settlement, decree or order of the Supreme Court related to
this case.
Sexually violent predator
expense fund (082-00-2379-2310)..............................................No limit
Tobacco master settlement agreement
compliance fund (082-00-2383-2320).........................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (082-00-2405-2040)..........................................No limit
Concealed weapon
licensure fund (082-00-2450-2400).............................................No limit
County law enforcement
equipment fund (082-00-2470-2470)..........................................No limit
Abuse, neglect and exploitation of
people with disabilities unit grant
acceptance fund (082-00-2482-2500)..........................................No limit
Attorney general's open
government fund (082-00-2497-2497)........................................No limit
Attorney general's antitrust special
revenue fund (082-00-2506-2050)...............................................No limit
Crime victims
compensation fund (082-00-2563-2060).....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the crime victims compensation fund
for state operations shall not exceed $851,889: Provided further, That
any expenditures for payment of compensation to crime victims are
authorized to be made from this fund regardless of when the claim was
awarded.
Child exchange and visiting
centers fund (082-00-2579-2250)................................................No limit
Crime victims assistance fund (082-00-2598-2070)....................No limit
Tort claims fund (082-00-2613-2080).........................................No limit
Medicaid fraud prosecution
revolving fund (082-00-2641-2280)............................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys recovered by the medicaid fraud and abuse
division of the attorney general's office in the enforcement of state and
federal law that are in excess of any restitution for overcharges and
interest, including all moneys recovered as recoupment of expenses of
investigation and prosecution, shall be deposited in the state treasury to
the credit of the medicaid fraud prosecution revolving fund: Provided
further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 21-5933, and

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 28
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made
from the medicaid fraud prosecution revolving fund for other operating
expenditures of the attorney general's office for medicaid fraud
prosecution direct and indirect costs.
False claims litigation
revolving fund (082-00-2650-2600)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the false claims
litigation revolving fund for costs associated with litigation under the
Kansas false claims act, K.S.A. 75-7501 et seq., and amendments
thereto.
Children's advocacy
center fund (082-00-2654-2610).................................................No limit
911 state maintenance fund (082-00-2747-2447)........................No limit
Roofing contractor
registration fund (082-00-2774-2774).........................................No limit
Human trafficking victim
assistance fund (082-00-2775-2775)...........................................No limit
Criminal appeals cost fund (082-00-2779-2779).........................No limit
State medicaid fraud
forfeiture fund (082-00-2822-2822)............................................No limit
Kansas fights addiction fund (082-00-2826-2826)......................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-766, and
amendments thereto, expenditures shall be made from the Kansas fights
addiction fund to include under the Kansas fights addiction act as a
qualified applicant, as defined in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 75-776, and
amendments thereto, any for-profit private entity that provides services
for the purpose of preventing, reducing, treating or otherwise abating or
remediating substance abuse or addiction and that has released its legal
claims arising from covered conduct against each defendant that is
required by opioid litigation to pay into the fund.
Municipalities fight
addiction fund (082-00-2838-2838)............................................No limit
Charitable organizations
fee fund (082-00-2863-2863)......................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial justice assistance grant
federal fund (082-00-3057-3057)................................................No limit
State medicaid fraud control unit –
federal fund (082-00-3060-3060)................................................No limit
Medicaid fraud control unit (082-00-3060-3080)........................No limit
Com def sol – violence against women
federal fund (082-00-3082-3082)................................................No limit
Crime victims compensation
federal fund (082-00-3133-3020)................................................No limit
Ed Byrne state/local law enforcement
federal fund (082-00-3213-3213)................................................No limit
Violence against women – ARRA
federal fund (082-00-3214-3212)................................................No limit
Comm prsct/project safe neighborhood
federal fund (082-00-3217-3217)................................................No limit
Public safety prtnt/comm
pol fund (082-00-3218-3218)......................................................No limit
Anti-gang initiative
federal fund (082-00-3229-3229)................................................No limit
Alcohol impaired driving cntrmsr
federal fund (082-00-3247-3247)................................................No limit
Children's justice grant
federal fund (082-00-3381-3381)................................................No limit
Sexual assault kit initiative
federal fund (082-00-3416-3416)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 29
Ed Byrne memorial JAG – ARRA
federal fund (082-00-3455-3455)................................................No limit
DOT prohibit
racial profiling (082-00-3566-3566)............................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (082-00-3753-3753)..............................No limit
Medicaid indirect cost
federal fund (082-00-3919-3919)................................................No limit
Federal forfeiture fund (082-00-3940-3940)...............................No limit
Attorney general's state agency
representation fund (082-00-6125-6125).....................................No limit
Crime victims grants and
gifts fund (082-00-7340-7010)....................................................No limit
Provided, That all private grants and gifts received by the crime victims
compensation board shall be deposited to the credit of the crime victims
grants and gifts fund.
Attorney general's antitrust
suspense fund (082-00-9002-9000).............................................No limit
Attorney general's consumer protection
clearing fund (082-00-9003-9010)..............................................No limit
Medicaid fraud
reimbursement fund (082-00-9034-9040)...................................No limit
Suspense fund (082-00-9112-9030).............................................No limit
SUID case registry fund (082-00-3098-3098).............................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, grants made
pursuant to K.S.A. 74-7325, and amendments thereto, from the
protection from abuse fund (082-00-2239-2030) and grants made
pursuant to K.S.A. 74-7334, and amendments thereto, from the crime
victims assistance fund (082-00-2598-2070) shall be made after
consideration of the recommendation of an entity that has been
designated by the United States department of health and human
services and by the centers for disease control and prevention as the
official domestic violence or sexual assault coalition.
(d) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $50,000 from the
state general fund to the sexually violent predator expense fund (082-
00-2379-2310) of the attorney general.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-769, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, no expenditures shall be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, to set legal representation charges for state
agencies at a rate exceeding $100 per hour.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $600,000 from the
state general fund to the medicaid fraud prosecution revolving fund
(082-00-2641-2280) of the attorney general.
(g) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $460,593 from the
Kansas endowment for youth fund (365-00-7000-2000) to the tobacco
master settlement agreement compliance fund (082-00-2383-2320) of
the attorney general.
Sec. 42.
SECRETARY OF STATE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
HAVA election security grant.....................................................$200,000
Sec. 43.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 30
SECRETARY OF STATE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Cemetery and funeral audit
fee fund (622-00-2225)................................................................No limit
HAVA ELVIS fund (622-00-2353-2150).....................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (622-00-2418)....................................................No limit
Information and services
fee fund (622-00-2430-2300)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the information and services fee fund
for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,500.
State register fee fund (622-00-2619-2500)................................No limit
Uniform commercial code
fee fund (622-00-2664-2600)......................................................No limit
Technology communication
fee fund (622-00-2672-2900)......................................................No limit
Athlete agent registration
fee fund (622-00-2674-2700)......................................................No limit
Democracy fund (622-00-2702)..................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the democracy fund shall be to
provide matching funds to implement title II of the federal help
America vote act of 2002, public law 107-252, as prescribed under that
act.
Help America vote act federal fund (622-00-3091).....................No limit
HAVA title I federal fund (622-00-3283-3283)...........................No limit
HAVA election security fund 2018 (622-00-3956-3956).............No limit
State flag and banner fund (622-00-5130-4600).........................No limit
Secretary of state fee
refund fund (622-00-9047)..........................................................No limit
Suspense fund (622-00-9046)......................................................No limit
Electronic voting machine
examination fund (622-00-9101).................................................No limit
Prepaid services fund (622-00-9114)...........................................No limit
Credit card clearing fund (622-00-9434).....................................No limit
Professional employer
organization fee fund (622-00-2678)...........................................No limit
State homeland security grant
federal fund (622-00-3629-3629)................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of any other statute, in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026 by the above agency, as authorized by this or
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such special
revenue fund or funds to provide a report to the house appropriations
committee and the senate ways and means committee detailing the
costs of publication in a newspaper in each county pursuant to K.S.A.
64-103, and amendments thereto, of any constitutional amendment that
is introduced by the legislature during the 2026 regular session of the
legislature and detailing costs to local units of governments for
conducting elections that include proposed constitutional amendments.
(d) On or before the 10th day of each month commencing on July
1, 2025, during fiscal year 2026, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer from the state general fund to the democracy fund interest
earnings based on:
(1) The average daily balance of moneys in the democracy fund

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 31
for the preceding month; and
(2) the net earnings rate of the pooled money investment portfolio
for the preceding month.
Sec. 44.
STATE TREASURER
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the state treasurer
operating fund (670-00-2374-2300) of the state treasurer is hereby
decreased from $2,009,194 to $1,904,147.
Sec. 45.
STATE TREASURER
(a) On the effective date of this act, notwithstanding the provisions
of sections 12, 13 or 14 of chapter 97 of the 2023 Session Laws of
Kansas, for fiscal years 2025, 2026 and 2027, the total of all amounts
transferred from the state general fund to the build Kansas matching
grant fund shall not exceed $165,000,000.
(b) On July 1, 2025, the provisions of section 13(b) of chapter 97
of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas are hereby declared to be null and
void and shall have no force and effect.
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $5,000,000 from the
state general fund to the build Kansas matching grant fund: Provided,
however, That if in the aggregate, the amount transferred from the state
general fund to the build Kansas matching grant fund pursuant to any
previous state finance council action is equal to $165,000,000, then the
provisions of this subsection are null and void.
(d) On the effective date of this act, during the fiscal years ending
June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, in addition to other purposes for
which expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund for fiscal year 2025 or 2026
from the water supply storage debt payment for Milford and Perry
reservoirs account (039-00-1000-0610), as authorized by section 43 or
44 of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas, expenditures
shall be made by the above agency to identify the amount of moneys
that are determined to be a decrease in debt payments that would have
been made for the water supply storage debt for Milford and Perry
reservoirs because of a change in the method of interest rate calculation
on such water supply storage debt as provided in the 2024 water
resources development act of 2024, public law 118-272: Provided, That
upon identifying such amount, the above agency shall withhold an
amount of not less than $12,000,000 from being reinvested into United
States treasury bills: Provided further, That the above agency shall
certify such withheld amount to the director of accounts and reports:
And provided further, That the state treasurer shall transmit a copy of
such certification to the director of the budget, the director of
legislative research, the executive director of the Kansas water office
and the chief executive officer of the state board of regents: Provided,
however, That such identification, withholding and certification of
moneys pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the provisions
concerning the investment of the United States treasury bills, as
authorized pursuant to section 41 of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session
Laws of Kansas.
Sec. 46.
STATE TREASURER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Pregnancy compassion awareness program............................$3,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 32
such account during fiscal year 2026 to continue the statewide program,
previously known as the alternatives to abortion program, to enhance
and increase resources that promote childbirth instead of abortion to
women facing unplanned pregnancies and to offer a full range of
services, including pregnancy support centers, adoption assistance and
maternity homes: Provided further, That the program shall include only
the following services: Counseling and mentoring; care coordination
for prenatal services, including connecting clients to health programs;
providing educational materials and information about pregnancy and
parenting; referrals to county and social service programs, including
child care, transportation, housing and state and federal benefit
programs; classes on life skills, budgeting, parenting, stress
management, job training, job placement and obtaining a GED
certificate; providing material items, including, but not limited to, car
seats, cribs, maternity clothes, infant diapers and formula; and support
groups in maternity homes: And provided further, That program
services shall be made available to any Kansas resident who is a
pregnant woman, the biological father of an unborn child, the
biological or adoptive parent or legal guardian of a child 24 months of
age or younger, a program participant who has experienced the loss of a
child or a parent or legal guardian of a pregnant child who is a program
participant: And provided further, That the provision and delivery of
services under the program shall be dependent on participant needs as
assessed by the nonprofit organization providing the services and not
otherwise prioritized by any state agency: And provided further, That
program services shall be available to participants only during
pregnancy and continuing for up to 24 months after birth of the child:
And provided further, That the state treasurer shall continue to contract
with the nonprofit organization that was awarded such contract in fiscal
year 2025 to provide services under the pregnancy compassion
awareness program, and such nonprofit organization shall subcontract
with existing pregnancy centers, adoption agencies, maternity homes
and social service organizations to provide program services to promote
childbirth instead of abortion: And provided further, That such contract
extension shall be for a term not longer than one year: And provided
further, That the selected contractor and any subcontractors may
provide services in addition to the enumerated program services, but
such services shall not be funded through the pregnancy compassion
awareness program: And provided further, That the state treasurer shall
include as a condition of the contract extension with the nonprofit
organization selected to provide program services: (1) The assessment
of an administrative fine for failure to satisfy program requirements,
including required reporting, or for the intentional or reckless misuse of
any funds awarded by the terms of such contract, and such fine shall be
in the amount of 10% of the funds awarded by the terms of such
contract and shall be deposited into the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, to the
credit of the state general fund; and (2) that such nonprofit organization
shall submit a report to the legislature and the state treasurer on or
before June 30, 2026, on the administration of the program during
fiscal year 2026, including: The number of clients; the number of
clients who participated in case management services; the number of
case management hours provided to clients; the number of clients
engaged in educational services or job training and placement
activities; the number of newborns who were born to program
participants; the number of such newborns placed for adoption; the
number of fathers who participated in program services; the number of
client satisfaction surveys completed; and any other information that
shows the success of the contractor's administration of the program:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 33
And provided further, That the state treasurer shall establish the
pregnancy compassion public awareness program to be administered by
the same nonprofit organization contracted with to provide pregnancy
compassion awareness program services: And provided further, That the
purpose of the public awareness program is to help pregnant women
who are at risk of having abortions to be made aware of the pregnancy
compassion awareness program services: And provided further, That the
public awareness program shall include the development and
promotion of a website that provides a geographically indexed list of
available pregnancy compassion awareness program services and
nonprofit subcontractors that provide services: And provided further,
That the public awareness program may include, but shall not be
limited to, the use of television, radio, outdoor advertising, newspapers,
magazines, other print media and the internet to provide information
about the pregnancy compassion awareness program services and
subcontractors: And provided further, That, to the greatest extent
possible, the secretary for children and families shall supplement and
match moneys appropriated for the pregnancy compassion awareness
program with federal and other public and private moneys, and such
moneys shall be prioritized to be used preferentially for the program
and the public awareness program and be transferred from the special
revenue fund or funds of the Kansas department for children and
families as identified by the secretary for children and families to the
pregnancy compassion awareness program account to be expended for
such programs: Provided, however, That the pregnancy compassion
awareness program and the pregnancy compassion public awareness
program and any moneys appropriated or expended therefor shall not
be used to perform, induce, assist in the performing or inducing of or
refer for abortions, and moneys appropriated or expended for such
programs shall not be granted to organizations or affiliates of
organizations that perform, induce, assist in the performing or inducing
of or refer for abortions.
Aviation jobs loan program...................................................$10,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such fund during fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of providing loans to
eligible borrowers: Provided further, That eligible borrower means an
airport authority or an entity engaged in the business of maintaining,
repairing or overhauling aircraft in Kansas and such airport authority or
entity demonstrates a need for such loan that will result in the creation
of new aviation jobs: And provided further, That the state treasurer is
hereby authorized to enter into loan agreements for purposes of the
aviation jobs loan program: And provided further, That the state
treasurer is hereby authorized to certify to the director of investments
an amount of not to exceed $30,000,000 of unencumbered funds
pursuant to article 42 of chapter 75 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated,
and amendments thereto, available for aviation jobs loan deposit loans:
And provided further, That the state treasurer is hereby authorized to
disseminate information and to provide aviation jobs loan deposit loan
packages to eligible lending institutions as defined in K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 75-4291, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That the
aviation jobs loan deposit loan package shall be completed by such
eligible borrower before being forwarded to the eligible lending
institution for consideration: And provided further, That such eligible
lending institution that agrees to receive an aviation jobs loan deposit
shall accept and review applications from eligible borrowers and shall
apply all usual lending standards to determine the creditworthiness of
such eligible borrowers: And provided further, That an eligible
borrower shall certify on the loan application that the loan will be used
exclusively for expenses involved in the maintaining, repairing or

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 34
overhauling of aircraft in Kansas: And provided further, That the
eligible lending institution may approve or reject an aviation jobs loan
deposit loan package based on the institution's evaluation of the eligible
borrowers included in the package, the amount of the individual loan
and other appropriate considerations: And provided further, That the
eligible lending institution shall forward to the state treasurer an
approved aviation jobs loan deposit loan package in the form and
manner prescribed and approved by the state treasurer: And provided
further, That the package shall include information regarding the
amount of the loan requested by each eligible borrower and such other
information regarding each eligible borrower that the state treasurer
may require: And provided further, That such package shall include a
certification by the applicant that such applicant is an eligible borrower:
And provided further, That the state treasurer may accept or reject an
aviation jobs loan deposit loan package based on the state treasurer's
evaluation of whether the loan to the eligible borrower meets the
requirements of the aviation jobs loan deposit program: And provided
further, That if sufficient funds are not available for an aviation jobs
loan deposit, then the applications may be considered in the order
received when funds are once again available, subject to a review by
the lending institution: And provided further, That upon acceptance, the
state treasurer shall certify to the director of investments the amount
required for such aviation jobs loan deposit loan package, and the
director of investments shall place an aviation jobs loan deposit in the
amount certified by the state treasurer with the eligible lending
institution at an interest rate that is 2% below the market rate as
provided in K.S.A. 75-4237, and amendments thereto, and that shall be
recalculated on the first business day of January of each year using the
market rate then in effect: And provided further, That the minimum
interest rate shall be 0.25% if the market rate is below 2.25%: And
provided further, That when necessary, the state treasurer may request
the director of investments to place such aviation jobs loan deposit with
the eligible lending institution prior to acceptance of an aviation jobs
loan deposit loan package: And provided further, That the eligible
lending institution shall enter into an aviation jobs loan deposit
agreement with the state treasurer and such agreement shall include
requirements necessary to implement the purposes of the aviation jobs
loan deposit program: And provided further, That such requirements
shall include an agreement by the eligible lending institution to lend an
amount equal to the aviation jobs loan deposit to eligible borrowers at
an interest rate that is not more than 3% greater than the interest rate on
aviation jobs loan deposits that is provided to the eligible lending
institution: And provided further, That such rate shall be recalculated on
the first business day of January of each year using the market rate then
in effect: And provided further, That the agreement shall include
provisions authorizing the state treasurer to determine the maximum
term for all loans: And provided further, That the agreement shall
include provisions for the reduction of the aviation jobs loan deposit in
an amount equal to any payment of loan principal by the eligible
borrower: And provided further, That upon the placement of an aviation
jobs loan deposit with an eligible lending institution, the institution
shall fund the loan to each approved eligible borrower listed in the
aviation jobs deposit loan package in accordance with the aviation jobs
loan deposit agreement between the institution and the state treasurer:
And provided further, That the state of Kansas and the state treasurer
shall not be liable to any eligible lending institution in any manner for
payment of the principal or interest on any aviation jobs loan deposit
loan to an eligible borrower: And provided further, That any delay in
payments or default on the part of an eligible borrower does not in any

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 35
manner affect the aviation jobs loan deposit agreement between the
eligible lending institution and the state treasurer: And provided further,
That, on or before January 12, 2026, the above agency shall submit a
report to the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations identifying the eligible
lending institutions that are participating in the program and the eligible
borrowers who have received an aviation jobs loan deposit loan: And
provided further, That the report shall provide the aggregate amount of
moneys loaned and the amount of moneys still available for loan, if
any.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Bond services fee fund (670-00-2061-2500)...............................No limit
Kansas postsecondary education savings
expense fund (670-00-2096-2000)..............................................No limit
KS ABLE savings
expense fund (670-00-2177-2177)..............................................No limit
Unclaimed property
expense fund (670-00-2362-2200)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the unclaimed property expense fund
for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
State treasurer
operating fund (670-00-2374-2300)........................................$1,959,222
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of the uniform
unclaimed property act, K.S.A. 58-3934 et seq., and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, of all the moneys received under the
uniform unclaimed property act during fiscal year 2026, the state
treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to credit the first amount
equal to the expenditure limitation approved by this or other
appropriation act of the legislature received and deposited in the state
treasury to the state treasurer operating fund: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding any provision of the uniform unclaimed property act,
K.S.A. 58-3934 et seq., and amendments thereto, or any other statute,
on June 30, 2026, the state treasurer shall certify any remaining
unencumbered balance in the state treasurer operating fund exceeding
$100,000 to the director of accounts and reports, who shall transfer
such certified amount from the state treasurer operating fund to the
state general fund on June 30, 2026: And provided further, That, after
such aggregate amount has been credited to the state treasurer operating
fund, then all of the moneys received under the uniform unclaimed
property act during fiscal year 2026 shall be credited as prescribed
under the uniform unclaimed property act: And provided further, That
all moneys credited to the state treasurer operating fund during fiscal
year 2026 are to reimburse the state treasurer for accounting, auditing,
budgeting, legal, payroll, personnel and purchasing services and any
other governmental services that are performed to administer the
provisions of the uniform unclaimed property act that are not otherwise
reimbursed under any other provision of law.
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (670-00-2461-2700)..........................................No limit
Distinctive license plate
royalty fund (670-00-2885-2885)................................................No limit
Other federal grants fund (670-00-3878-3878)...........................No limit
Kansas postsecondary education savings
program trust fund (670-00-7241-7100)......................................No limit
Tax increment financing revenue
replacement fund (670-00-7391-4700)........................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 36
Transportation development district
sales tax fund (670-00-7601-7000)..............................................No limit
County and city transient
guest tax fund (670-00-7602-6600).............................................No limit
County and city retailers'
sales tax fund (670-00-7608-6000)..............................................No limit
Community improvement district sales
tax fund (670-00-7610-7650)......................................................No limit
City bond finance fund (670-00-7654)........................................No limit
Local alcoholic liquor fund (670-00-7665-6100)........................No limit
County and city compensating use
tax fund (670-00-7667-6200)......................................................No limit
Racing admissions tax fund (670-00-7670-6300).......................No limit
Rental motor vehicle excise
tax fund (670-00-7681-6800)......................................................No limit
Redevelopment bond fund (670-00-7683-6900).........................No limit
Business machinery and equipment tax reduction
assistance fund (670-00-7684-7680).....................................................$0
Telecommunications and railroad
machinery and equipment tax reduction
assistance fund (670-00-7685-7690).....................................................$0
Fiscal agency fund (670-00-7754-6400).....................................No limit
Unclaimed property
claims fund (670-00-7758-7700).................................................No limit
Local alcoholic liquor
equalization fund (670-00-7759-6500)........................................No limit
Suspense fund (670-00-9054-9000)............................................No limit
Spirit bonds fund (670-00-9515-9515)........................................No limit
Provided, That, on the 15th day of each month that commences during
fiscal year 2026, the secretary of revenue shall determine the amount of
revenue received by the state during the preceding month from
withholding taxes paid with respect to an eligible project by each
taxpayer that is an eligible business for which bonds have been issued
under K.S.A. 74-50,136, and amendments thereto, and for which the
Spirit bonds fund was created, and shall certify the amount so
determined to the director of accounts and reports and, at the same time
as such certification is transmitted to the director of accounts and
reports, shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research: Provided further, That,
upon receipt of each such certification, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer the amount certified from the state general fund to
the Spirit bonds fund: And provided further, That, on or before the 10th
day of each month commencing during fiscal year 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer from the state general fund to the
Spirit bonds fund interest earnings based on: (1) The average daily
balance of moneys in the Spirit bonds fund for the preceding month;
and (2) the net earnings rate of the pooled money investment portfolio
for the preceding month: And provided further, That the moneys
credited to the Spirit bonds fund from the withholding taxes paid by an
eligible business and the interest earnings thereon shall be transferred
by the state treasurer from the Spirit bonds fund to the special
economic revitalization fund administered by the state treasurer in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-50,136, and amendments thereto.
Bioscience development and
investment fund (670-00-9510-9510)..........................................No limit
Special economic
revitalization fund (670-00-9520-9520)......................................No limit
Special qualified industrial
manufacturer fund (670-00-9525-9525)......................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 37
STAR bonds food sales tax
revenue replacement fund............................................................No limit
Provided, That on July 1, 2025, the secretary of revenue, in
consultation with the governing body of each city with a population of
30,000 or less, as certified to the secretary of state by the division of the
budget in accordance with K.S.A. 11-201, and amendments thereto,
that has established a STAR bond project district prior to December 31,
2022, shall certify to the director of the budget and the director of
accounts and reports the amount of additional sales and use tax revenue
that would have been realized from sales of food and food ingredients
within each such STAR bond project district for the months of January
2024 through June 2025, if the state rate for the Kansas retailers' sales
tax provided in K.S.A. 79-3603, and amendments thereto, on the sale of
food and food ingredients had been 6.5%: Provided further, That on or
before September 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
certify to the state treasurer the amounts so certified by the secretary
and shall transfer from the state general fund to the STAR bonds food
sales tax revenue replacement fund the aggregate of all amounts so
certified: And provided further, That on or before October 15, 2025, the
state treasurer shall pay from the STAR bonds food sales tax revenue
replacement fund to the appropriate city bond finance, debt service or
reserve fund the amount certified to the director of accounts and reports
for each city: And provided further, That at the same time the secretary
of revenue transmits certification to the director of accounts and reports
during fiscal year 2026, a copy of such certification shall be transmitted
to the director of legislative research.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:
Community talent recruitment grant program.........................$1,500,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such fund during fiscal year 2026 to administer a program for the
purpose of awarding grants to eligible entities to develop and
administer a talent recruitment program that incentivizes the relocation
of households to Kansas: Provided further, That an eligible entity shall
be a city, county, native American tribe or nonprofit that has a mission
that includes economic development, workforce and talent
development or community development: And provided further, That an
eligible entity may submit a grant application to the above agency that
includes: (1) A talent recruitment program plan that includes: (A) Total
estimated cost of the program; (B) estimated individual costs for
design, administration, marketing and relocation incentive initiatives;
(C) the program's goal number of participating households; (D)
estimated costs incurred against the recipient for each participating
household; (E) estimated state and local tax revenue attributable to
participating households; and (F) estimated total economic impact
attributable to participating households; and (2) proof that the applicant
has local investments and in-kind donations of at least 20% of the total
program cost: And provided further, That the above agency shall award
a grant in an amount of not to exceed $250,000 for each approved grant
application: And provided further, That the above agency shall expend
50% of the amount of the grant to each approved applicant for receipt
of grant funds subject to this proviso at the time of approval: And
provided further, That the above agency shall expend grant funds from
the remaining 50% of the amount of the grant to each approved
applicant when such applicant's program has achieved half of the talent
recruitment program plan's goal of number of participating households
as submitted in the applicable grant application: Provided, however,
That if the program has not achieved such half of the goal of number of

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 38
participating households, the above agency shall not expend the
remaining grant funds: And provided further, That the grant recipient
shall develop and administer a talent recruitment program that provides
incentives for a participating household to relocate or commit to
relocate to Kansas: And provided further, That a grant recipient may
contract with a third-party entity to develop and administer such talent
recruitment program: And provided further, That to be approved to
participate in a talent recruitment program, a household shall have an
annual income of at least $55,000 and such household has submitted an
application to participate in the talent recruitment program and has
been approved by the program to participate in the program: And
provided further, That a grant recipient shall provide the above agency
quarterly reports on the recipient's talent recruitment program for each
grant awarded including: (i) Total number of household applications
received by the recipient; (ii) total number of households approved by
the recipient for participation in the program; (iii) costs incurred against
the recipient for each approved household; (iv) annual income and
occupation of each approved household; and (v) the economic impact
of the program, such as state and local tax revenue contributed and new
consumer spending attributable to a participating household: And
provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
statute to the contrary, incentives received by a participating household
shall not be construed to preclude the participating household or an
individual of a participating household from participating in programs
or receiving other available statewide incentives: And provided further,
That, as used in this proviso, "participating household" means a
household that either has successfully relocated to Kansas or has
committed to relocating to Kansas: Provided however, That, if during
fiscal year 2026, sufficient funds are not available to cover such
appropriation from the state economic development initiatives fund, the
state treasurer shall certify the amount of such insufficient funds to the
director of accounts and reports: Provided further, That upon receipt of
such certification, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
such certified amount from the state general fund to the state economic
development initiatives fund: And provided further, That the state
treasurer shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-648, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, on July 1, 2025, or as soon
thereafter as moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports
shall transfer $50,000 from the Kansas postsecondary education
savings expense fund (670-00-2096-2000) of the state treasurer to the
KS ABLE savings expense fund (670-00-2177-2177) of the state
treasurer.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, for the state treasurer to review the
provisions of article 42 of chapter 75 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated,
and amendments thereto, the investment policies of the pooled money
investment board and other investment models to invest the moneys in
the budget stabilization fund to maximize the interest earnings on such
fund: Provided, That the state treasurer shall submit periodic reports to
the legislative budget committee on the status of such investments.
Sec. 47.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 39
STATE TREASURER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, the following:
Community talent recruitment grant program.........................$1,500,000
Provided, That all expenditures made by the above agency from such
fund during fiscal year 2027 shall be subject to the provisions of the
provisos for such fund pursuant to section 46(c): Provided however,
That, if during fiscal year 2027, sufficient funds are not available to
cover such appropriation from the state economic development
initiatives fund, the state treasurer shall certify the amount of such
insufficient funds to the director of accounts and reports: Provided
further, That upon receipt of such certification, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer such certified amount from the state general
fund to the state economic development initiatives fund: And provided
further, That the state treasurer shall transmit a copy of such
certification to the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
Sec. 48.
INSURANCE DEPARTMENT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Insurance company
examination fund (331-00-2055-2000).......................................No limit
Insurance company annual statement
examination fund (331-00-2056-2100).......................................No limit
Insurance company examiner
training fund (331-00-2057-2200)...............................................No limit
Securities act fee fund (331-00-2162-0100)................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the securities act fee fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality shall not
exceed $3,000.
Investor education and
protection fund (331-00-2242-2240)...........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the investor education and protection
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for official hospitality
shall not exceed $6,000.
Insurance department service
regulation fund (331-00-2270-2400)...........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the insurance department service
regulation fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $7,500.
Captive insurance regulatory and
supervision fund (331-00-2309-2309).........................................No limit
Uninsurable health insurance
plan fund (331-00-2328-2500)....................................................No limit
Fines and penalties fund (331-00-2351-2510).............................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 40-2606, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, all moneys received during
fiscal year 2026 for penalties imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 40-2606, and
amendments thereto, shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the fines and penalties fund.
Insurance education and
training fund (331-00-2367-2600)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the insurance education
and training fund for training programs and official hospitality:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 40
Provided further, That the insurance commissioner is hereby authorized
to fix, charge and collect fees for such training programs: And provided
further, That fees for such training programs shall be fixed in order to
collect all or part of the operating expenses incurred for such training
programs, including official hospitality: And provided further, That all
fees received for such training programs shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the insurance education
and training fund.
Settlements fund (331-00-2523-2520).........................................No limit
Provided, That moneys may be transferred or otherwise credited to the
settlements fund as the result of or pursuant to court orders under
K.S.A. 40-3644, and amendments thereto, court-ordered settlements or
legislative authority: Provided further, That expenditures from the
settlements fund shall be made for the purpose of providing consumer
education and outreach or for costs that the insurance department may
incur in closeout of any troubled insurance company matters.
Pharmacy benefits manager
licensure fund (331-00-2665-2665).............................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (331-00-3753-3753)..............................No limit
Private grants and
gifts fund (331-00-7301-7301)....................................................No limit
Workers compensation fund (331-00-7354-7000).......................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the workers compensation fund for
attorney fees and other costs and benefit payments may be made
regardless of when services were rendered or when the initial award of
benefits was made.
Monumental life
settlement fund (331-00-7360-7360)...........................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the monumental life settlement
fund shall be made for scholarship purposes: Provided further, That the
scholarship recipients shall be African-American students who are
currently enrolled and are attending an accredited higher education
institution in the state of Kansas and who have designated a major in
mathematics, computer science or business.
State firefighters relief fund (331-00-7652-7130).......................No limit
Insurance company tax and fee
refund fund (331-00-9017-9100).................................................No limit
Group-funded pools refund fund.................................................No limit
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the insurance department from the insurance company
examination fund (331-00-2055-2000) for fiscal year 2026 as
authorized by K.S.A. 40-223, and amendments thereto, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 40-223, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, expenditures may be made by the insurance department from
the insurance company examination fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
examination of annual statements filed with the commissioner of
insurance, regardless of when the services were rendered, when the
expenses were incurred or when any claim was submitted or processed
for payment and regardless of whether or not the services were
rendered or the expenses were incurred prior to the effective date of
this act.
Sec. 49.
HEALTH CARE STABILIZATION
FUND BOARD OF GOVERNORS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 41
by law shall not exceed the following:
Conference fee fund (270-00-2453-2453)...................................No limit
Health care stabilization fund (270-00-7404-2000)....................No limit
(b) Expenditures from the health care stabilization fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, other than refunds authorized by law
for the following specified purposes shall not exceed the limitations
prescribed therefor as follows:
Operating expenditures (270-00-7404-2100)..............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the operating
expenditures account for official hospitality.
Legal services and other
claims expenses (270-00-7404-2300)..........................................No limit
Claims and benefits (270-00-7404-2400)....................................No limit
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 40-3401, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from any
special revenue fund or funds of the above agency for fiscal year 2026
as authorized by this section, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to deem a maternity
center as a "healthcare provider" for the purposes of the healthcare
provider insurance availability act, K.S.A. 40-3401 et seq., and
amendments thereto, if such maternity center: (1) Has been granted
accreditation by the commission for accreditation of birth centers; or
(2) is a maternity center as defined in K.S.A. 65-503, and amendments
thereto.
Sec. 50.
POOLED MONEY INVESTMENT BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Pooled money investment portfolio
fee fund (671-00-2319-2000)......................................................No limit
Provided, That, on or before the fifth day of each month of the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the state treasurer shall certify to the pooled
money investment board an accounting of the banking fees incurred by
the state treasurer during the second preceding month that are
attributable to the investment of the pooled money investment portfolio
during such month: Provided further, That, prior to the 10th day of each
month during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the pooled money
investment board shall review the certification from the state treasurer
and shall make expenditures from the pooled money investment
portfolio fee fund (671-00-2319-2000) to pay the amount of banking
fees incurred by the state treasurer during the second preceding month
that are attributable to the investment of the pooled money investment
portfolio during the second preceding month, as determined by the
pooled money investment board: And provided further, That
expenditures from the pooled money investment portfolio fee fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $800.
Municipal investment
pool fund (671-00-7537-7000)....................................................No limit
Sec. 51.
JUDICIAL COUNCIL
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $727,676 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 44(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the operating expenditures account (349-00-
1000-0100), the sum of $88,200 is hereby lapsed.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 42
Sec. 52.
JUDICIAL COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (349-00-1000-0100).............................$730,028
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Judicial council fund (349-00-2127-2100)..................................No limit
Publications fee fund (349-00-2297-2000)..................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (349-00-3753-3772)..............................No limit
Grants and gifts fund (349-00-7326-7000)..................................No limit
Provided, That all private grants and gifts received by the judicial
council, other than moneys received as grants, gifts or donations for the
preparation, publication or distribution of legal publications, shall be
deposited to the credit of the grants and gifts fund.
Sec. 53.
STATE BOARD OF INDIGENTS'
DEFENSE SERVICES
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $27,237,283
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 46(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the operating expenditures
account (328-00-1000-0603), the sum of $5,000,000 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 54.
STATE BOARD OF INDIGENTS'
DEFENSE SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Legal services for prisoners (328-00-1000-0500)......................$402,382
Litigation support (328-00-1000-0510)..................................$2,327,691
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the litigation support
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Operating expenditures (328-00-1000-0603)........................$28,335,610
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures for indigents' defense services are authorized to be made
from the operating expenditures account regardless of when services
were rendered: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from
the operating expenditures account for negotiated contracts for
malpractice insurance for public defenders and deputy or assistant
public defenders: And provided further, That all contracts for
malpractice insurance for public defenders and deputy or assistant
public defenders shall be negotiated and purchased by the state board of
indigents' defense services, shall not be subject to approval or purchase
by the committee on surety bonds and insurance under K.S.A. 75-4114
and 75-6111, and amendments thereto, and shall not be subject to the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments thereto.
Indigents' defense
services operations (328-00-1000-0610)...................................$156,847
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the indigents' defense services operations account is hereby

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 43
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from the indigents' defense services operations account
for the purpose of assigned counsel and other professional services
related to contract cases.
Assigned counsel
expenditures (328-00-1000-0700).........................................$24,672,309
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the assigned counsel expenditures account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
for indigents' defense services are authorized to be made from the
assigned counsel expenditures account regardless of when services
were rendered: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 22-4507, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
account for fiscal year 2026 to set the maximum rate of compensation
of assigned counsel in fiscal year 2026 at $125 per hour.
Capital defense operations (328-00-1000-0800).....................$5,429,177
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the capital defense operations account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
for indigents' defense services are authorized to be made from the
capital defense operations account regardless of when services were
rendered.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Indigents' defense
services fund (328-00-2119-2000)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the indigents' defense
services fund for the purpose of assigned counsel and other
professional services related to contract cases.
Inservice education workshop
fee fund (328-00-2186-2100)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the inservice education
workshop fee fund for operating expenditures, including official
hospitality, incurred for inservice workshops and conferences:
Provided further, That the state board of indigents' defense services is
hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for inservice
workshops and conferences: And provided further, That such fees shall
be fixed in order to recover all or part of such operating expenditures
incurred for inservice workshops and conferences: And provided
further, That all fees received for inservice workshops and conferences
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the inservice education workshop fee fund.
Capital litigation training
grant fund (328-00-3211-3211)...................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the executive
director of the state board of indigents' defense services, with the
approval of the director of the budget, may transfer any part of any item
of appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the state
general fund for the state board of indigents' defense services to any
other item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state general
fund for the state board of indigents' defense services. The executive
director shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 44
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the state board of indigents' defense services from the
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this act or
other appropriation act of the 2026 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 to classify public defenders based on
the level of cases such public defenders are assigned.
Sec. 55.
JUDICIAL BRANCH
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $197,756,795
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 49(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the judiciary operations account
(677-00-1000-0103), the sum of $590,853 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 56.
JUDICIAL BRANCH
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Judiciary operations (677-00-1000-0103)...........................$227,105,841
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the judiciary operations
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That contracts for computer input
of judicial opinions and all purchases thereunder shall not be subject to
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments thereto: And
provided further, That expenditures may be made from the judiciary
operations account for contingencies without limitation at the discretion
of the chief justice: And provided further, That expenditures from the
judiciary operations account for such contingencies shall not exceed
$25,000: And provided further, That expenditures from the judiciary
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $4,000: And
provided further, That expenditures shall be made from the judiciary
operations account for the travel expenses of panels of the court of
appeals for travel to cities across the state to hear appealed cases.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Library report fee fund (677-00-2106-2000)...............................No limit
Dispute resolution fund (677-00-2126-3500)..............................No limit
Judicial branch docket
fee fund (677-00-2158-2158)......................................................No limit
Judicial branch nonjudicial salary
initiative fund (677-00-2229-2800).............................................No limit
District court debt collections (677-00-2229-2801)....................No limit
Judicial branch
education fund (677-00-2324-1900)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the judicial branch
education fund to provide services and programs for the purpose of
educating and training judicial branch officers and employees,
administering the training, testing and education of municipal judges as
provided in K.S.A. 12-4114, and amendments thereto, educating and
training municipal judges and municipal court support staff, and for the
planning and implementation of a family court system, as provided by
law, including official hospitality: Provided further, That the judicial
administrator is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for
such services and programs: And provided further, That such fees may

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 45
be fixed to cover all or part of the operating expenditures incurred in
providing such services and programs, including official hospitality:
And provided further, That all fees received for such services and
programs, including official hospitality, shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the judicial branch
education fund.
Judicial branch nonjudicial salary
adjustment fund (677-00-2389-3200)..........................................No limit
District magistrate judge supplemental
compensation fund (677-00-2398-2390).....................................No limit
Correctional supervision
fund (677-00-2465-2465)............................................................No limit
Duplicate law book fund (677-00-2543-2300)............................No limit
Child support enforcement contractual
agreement fund (677-00-2681-2400)...........................................No limit
SJI grant fund (677-00-2714-2714).............................................No limit
Bar admission fee fund (677-00-2724-2500)..............................No limit
Court reporter fund (677-00-2725-2600)....................................No limit
Electronic filing and
management fund (677-00-2791-2791).......................................No limit
Specialty court resources fund (677-00-2879-2879)...................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial justice
assistance grant fund (677-00-3057)...........................................No limit
Federal grants fund (677-00-3082-3100)....................................No limit
National crime history improvement
program fund (677-00-3189-3189)..............................................No limit
NCHIP-02 grant fund (677-00-3189-3190).................................No limit
Violence against women grant fund –
ARRA (677-00-3214-3214).........................................................No limit
Violence against women 25 grant fund (677-00-3214-3218)......No limit
Byrne discretionary grants
program fund (677-00-3654-3654)..............................................No limit
Coronavirus emergency
supplemental fund (677-00-3671-3671)......................................No limit
Elder justice innovation grant –
federal fund (677-00-3680).........................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (677-00-3753).......................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (677-00-3756-3536).......No limit
State and community highway safety –
federal fund (677-00-3815-3815)................................................No limit
BJA veterans treatment court discretionary
grant program fund (677-00-3922-3922)....................................No limit
Child welfare federal
grant fund (677-00-3942-3300)...................................................No limit
Permanent families account – family and children
investment fund (677-00-7317-7000)..........................................No limit
Justice/MH collaboration grant fund...........................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,500,000 from the
state general fund to the specialty court resources fund (677-00-2879-
2879) of the judicial branch.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 8-2107, 8-2110, 20-3021, 21-6614, 22-2410,
23-2510, 28-170, 28-172a, 28-177, 28-178, 28-179, 32-1049a, 38-
2215, 38-2312, 38-2314, 59-104, 60-729, 60-2001, 60-2203a, 61-2704,
61-4001 and 65-409, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, in
addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by
the above agency from moneys appropriated from the state general

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 46
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to impose a charge or additional
charge not to exceed the following amounts on the following fees and
cases: $22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 8-2107, and amendments thereto; $22
per reinstatement fee, K.S.A. 8-2110, and amendments thereto; $10 per
fee, K.S.A. 20-3021, and amendments thereto; $19 per case, K.S.A. 21-
6614, and amendments thereto; $19 per docket fee, K.S.A. 22-2410,
and amendments thereto; $26.50 per marriage license fee, K.S.A. 23-
2510, and amendments thereto; $22 per bond, lien or judgement fee,
K.S.A. 28-170, and amendments thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A.
28-172a, and amendments thereto; $26.50 per fee, K.S.A. 28-177, and
amendments thereto; $12.50 per fee, K.S.A. 28-178, and amendments
thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 28-179, and amendments thereto;
$22 per reinstatement fee, K.S.A. 32-1049a, and amendments thereto;
$22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 38-2215, and amendments thereto; $19 per
case, K.S.A. 38-2312, and amendments thereto; $22 per docket fee,
K.S.A. 38-2314, and amendments thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A.
59-104, and amendments thereto; $12.50 per fee, K.S.A. 60-729, and
amendments thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 60-2001, and
amendments thereto; $22 per fee, K.S.A. 60-2203a, and amendments
thereto; $12.50 per docket fee, K.S.A. 61-2704, and amendments
thereto; $19 per docket fee, K.S.A. 61-4001, and amendments thereto;
and $22 per lien fee, K.S.A. 65-409, and amendments thereto:
Provided, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all fees
collected by the above agency pursuant to this subsection shall be
remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto: Provided further, That upon
receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the
entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the state general fund.
Sec. 57.
JUDICIAL BRANCH
(a) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 8-2107, 8-2110, 20-3021, 21-6614, 22-2410,
23-2510, 28-170, 28-172a, 28-177, 28-178, 28-179, 32-1049a, 38-
2215, 38-2312, 38-2314, 59-104, 60-729, 60-2001, 60-2203a, 61-2704,
61-4001 and 65-409, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, in
addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by
the above agency from moneys appropriated from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2027, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2027 to impose a
charge or additional charge of not to exceed the following amounts on
the following fees and cases: $22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 8-2107, and
amendments thereto; $22 per reinstatement fee, K.S.A. 8-2110, and
amendments thereto; $10 per fee, K.S.A. 20-3021, and amendments
thereto; $19 per case, K.S.A. 21-6614, and amendments thereto; $19
per docket fee, K.S.A. 22-2410, and amendments thereto; $26.50 per
marriage license fee, K.S.A. 23-2510, and amendments thereto; $22 per
bond, lien or judgement fee, K.S.A. 28-170, and amendments thereto;
$22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 28-172a, and amendments thereto; $26.50
per fee, K.S.A. 28-177, and amendments thereto; $12.50 per fee,
K.S.A. 28-178, and amendments thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A.
28-179, and amendments thereto; $22 per reinstatement fee, K.S.A. 32-
1049a, and amendments thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 38-2215,
and amendments thereto; $19 per case, K.S.A. 38-2312, and
amendments thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 38-2314, and

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 47
amendments thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 59-104, and
amendments thereto; $12.50 per fee, K.S.A. 60-729, and amendments
thereto; $22 per docket fee, K.S.A. 60-2001, and amendments thereto;
$22 per fee, K.S.A. 60-2203a, and amendments thereto; $12.50 per
docket fee, K.S.A. 61-2704, and amendments thereto; $19 per docket
fee, K.S.A. 61-4001, and amendments thereto; and $22 per lien fee,
K.S.A. 65-409, and amendments thereto: Provided, That during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, all fees collected by the above agency
pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto: Provided further, That upon receipt of each such remittance,
the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to
the credit of the state general fund.
Sec. 58.
KANSAS PUBLIC EMPLOYEES
RETIREMENT SYSTEM
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Non-retirement
administration fund (365-00-2277).............................................No limit
Kansas public employees deferred compensation
fees fund (365-00-2376)..............................................................No limit
Kansas endowment for
youth fund (365-00-7000-2000)..................................................No limit
Kansas public employees
retirement fund (365-00-7002-7000)...........................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures may be made from the Kansas public
employees retirement fund other than for benefits, investments, refunds
authorized by law, and other purposes specifically authorized by this or
other appropriation act.
Family and children endowment
account – family and children
investment fund (365-00-7010-4000)..........................................No limit
Optional death benefit plan
reserve fund (365-00-7357-9100)................................................No limit
Group insurance reserve fund (365-00-7358-9200)....................No limit
Senior services trust fund (365-00-7550-7600)...........................No limit
(b) Expenditures may be made from the expense reserve of the
Kansas public employees retirement fund (365-00-7002) for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, for the following specified purposes:
Agency operations (365-00-7002-7400)...............................$37,672,526
Provided, That expenditures from the agency operations account may
be made for official hospitality.
Investment-related expenses (365-00-7002-8000)......................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 38-
2102, and amendments thereto, the amount prescribed by K.S.A. 38-
2102(d)(4), and amendments thereto, to be transferred on July 1, 2025,
by the director of accounts and reports from the Kansas endowment for
youth fund to the children's initiatives fund shall be $52,098,685.
Sec. 59.
KANSAS HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (058-00-1000-0103)..........................$1,202,922
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 48
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$500: Provided further, That expenditures in an amount of not to
exceed $174,000 may be made from this account for mediation services
contracted with Kansas legal services.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Education and training fund (058-00-2282-2000).......................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the education and
training fund for operating expenditures for the commission's education
and training programs for the general public, including official
hospitality: Provided further, That the executive director is hereby
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for such programs: And
provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or
part of the operating expenses incurred for such training programs,
including official hospitality: And provided further, That all fees
received for such programs shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the education and training fund.
State and local fair employment practices –
federal fund (058-00-3016-3000)................................................No limit
Sec. 60.
STATE CORPORATION COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Public service
regulation fund (143-00-2019-0100)...........................................No limit
Provided, however, That expenditures from this fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $2,030.
Gas pipeline inspection
fee fund (143-00-2023-1100).......................................................No limit
Conservation fee fund (143-00-2130-2000)................................No limit
Provided, That any expenditure made from the conservation fee fund
for plugging abandoned wells, cleanup of pollution from oil and gas
activities and testing of wells shall be in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on this fund: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from this fund for debt collection and setoff
administration: And provided further, That a percentage of the fees
collected, not to exceed 27%, shall be transferred from the conservation
fee fund to the accounting services recovery fund (173-00-6105-4010)
of the department of administration for services rendered in collection
efforts: And provided further, That all expenditures made from the
conservation fee fund for debt collection and setoff administration shall
be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on this fund: And
provided further, That the state corporation commission shall include as
part of the fiscal year 2026 budget estimates for the state corporation
commission submitted pursuant to K.S.A. 75-3717, and amendments
thereto, a three-year projection of receipts to and expenditures from the
conservation fee fund for fiscal years 2026, 2027 and 2028.
Abandoned oil and gas
well fund (143-00-2143-2100)....................................................No limit
Natural gas underground storage
fee fund (143-00-2181-2120)......................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 49
Inservice education workshop
fee fund (143-00-2316-2300)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the inservice education
workshop fee fund for operating expenditures, including official
hospitality, incurred for inservice workshops and conferences
conducted by the state corporation commission for staff and members
of the state corporation commission: Provided further, That the state
corporation commission is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect
fees for such inservice workshops and conferences: And provided
further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of
the operating expenditures incurred for conducting such inservice
workshops and conferences: And provided further, That all moneys
received for such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the inservice education workshop fee
fund.
Facility conservation improvement
program fund (143-00-2432-2400)..............................................No limit
Energy grants
management fund (143-00-2667)................................................No limit
Motor carrier license
fees fund (143-00-2812-5500).....................................................No limit
MPG for states and tribes –
federal fund (143-00-3103-3103)................................................No limit
Energy efficiency conservation block
grant – federal fund (143-00-3157-3157)....................................No limit
Energy efficiency revolving loan program –
ARRA federal fund (143-00-3161)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the energy efficiency
revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund for the energy efficiency
revolving loan program pursuant to vouchers approved by the
chairperson of the state corporation commission or by a person or
persons designated by the chairperson: Provided further, That the state
corporation commission is hereby authorized to establish the energy
efficiency revolving loan program for the purpose of making loans for
energy conservation and other energy-related activities: And provided
further, That loans under such program shall be made at an interest rate
established by the state corporation commission: And provided further,
That the state corporation commission is hereby authorized to enter into
contracts with other state agencies and with persons, as may be
necessary, to administer the energy efficiency revolving loan program:
And provided further, That any person who agrees to receive money
from the energy efficiency revolving loan program – ARRA federal
fund shall enter into an agreement requiring such person to submit a
written report to the state corporation commission detailing and
accounting for all expenditures and receipts related to the use of the
moneys received from the energy efficiency revolving loan program –
ARRA federal fund: And provided further, That moneys repaid to the
energy efficiency revolving loan program shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the energy efficiency
revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund: And provided further,
That, on or before the 10th day of each month, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer from the state general fund to the energy
efficiency revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund interest
earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance of repaid moneys in
the energy efficiency revolving loan program – ARRA federal fund for
the preceding month; and (2) the net earnings rate for the pooled money
investment portfolio for the preceding month.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 50
Special one-call –
federal fund (143-00-3477-3477)................................................No limit
Gas pipeline safety program –
federal fund (143-00-3632-3000)................................................No limit
One call – federal fund (143-00-3633-3120)...............................No limit
Underground natural gas storage –
federal fund (143-00-3639-3641)................................................No limit
Energy community revitalization –
federal fund (143-00-3656-3656)................................................No limit
Energy conservation plan –
federal fund (143-00-3682).........................................................No limit
Municipal natural gas utility distribution
grant program ARPA fund (143-00-3756)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the municipal natural
gas utility distribution grant program ARPA fund for providing small
municipalities currently being served by a natural gas gathering field to
design, construct and install natural gas distribution lines that connect
to a natural gas service provider and infrastructure for such lines:
Provided further, That the above agency shall establish an application
process to award such grants to eligible municipalities: And provided
further, That the above agency shall expend a partial amount of the
grant to eligible municipalities for the completion of a natural gas cost
of service and revenue rate requirement study on proposed natural gas
distribution lines: And provided further, That the municipality shall
contract with an external and reputable entity to conduct and complete
a natural gas cost of service and revenue rate requirement study that
studies the cost of service of such distribution lines, including the cost
of the natural gas, natural gas transport, distribution, distribution labor,
maintenance and administration of such lines, and the costs of
maintaining and upgrading the natural gas distribution lines in the city
limits of such municipality: And provided further, That such study shall
provide the municipality with a natural gas utility rate that recovers
actual costs for the maintenance and necessary upgrades of the natural
gas distribution lines in the city limits of such municipality: And
provided further, That such municipality shall implement and charge a
rate that recovers the actual costs for the maintenance and necessary
upgrades of the natural gas distribution lines in the city limits of such
municipality: And provided further, That such municipality shall
identify and contract with a natural gas service provider for the
provision of such natural gas utility: And provided further, That, upon
completion of such study, implementation of such rate and contract
provision of service, the above agency shall expend the remaining
amount of the grant to the municipality for the design, construction and
installation of such lines and infrastructure.
Underground injection control class II –
federal fund (143-00-3768-3700)................................................No limit
Suspense fund (143-00-9007-9000)............................................No limit
Unified carrier registration
clearing fund (143-00-9062-9100)..............................................No limit
Credit card clearing fund (143-00-9401-9400)............................No limit
High efficiency electric
home rebate – federal fund..........................................................No limit
Home owner managing
energy savings – federal fund......................................................No limit
Grid resilience BIL formula – federal fund.................................No limit
Energy efficiency revolving loan fund .......................................No limit
(b) Expenditures for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by the
state corporation commission from the conservation fee fund (143-00-
2130-2000) or the abandoned oil and gas well fund (143-00-2143-

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 51
2100) may be made for the service of independent onsite supervision of
well plugging contracts: Provided, That all such expenditures from the
conservation fee fund or the abandoned oil and gas well fund for the
purpose of plugging of abandoned oil and gas wells during fiscal year
2026 shall be subject to the competitive bidding requirements of K.S.A.
75-3739, and amendments thereto, and shall not be exempt from such
competitive bidding requirements on the basis of the estimated amount
of such purchases.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of any other statute, the chairperson of the state
corporation commission, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer funds from any special revenue fund or funds of
the state corporation commission to any other special revenue fund or
funds of the state corporation commission. The chairperson of the state
corporation commission shall certify each such transfer to the director
of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 55-164, 66-138 or 66-1,142b, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, all moneys received from
civil fines and penalties charged and collected by the state corporation
commission under K.S.A. 55-164, 66-138 or 66-1,142b, and
amendments thereto, in the conservation fee fund (143-00-2130-2000),
the public service regulation fund (143-00-2019-0100) and the motor
carrier license fees fund (143-00-2812-5500) shall be remitted to the
state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto, and deposited in the state treasury and
credited to the state general fund.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $100,000 from the
public service regulation fund (143-00-2019-0100) of the state
corporation commission to the state general fund.
Sec. 61.
CITIZENS' UTILITY RATEPAYER BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Utility regulatory fee fund (122-00-2030-2000).....................$1,372,864
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the citizens'
utility ratepayer board from the utility regulatory fee fund (122-00-
2030-2000) for fiscal year 2026 for the citizens' utility ratepayer board,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
statute to the contrary, if the total expenditures authorized to be
expended on contracts for professional services by the citizens' utility
ratepayer board by the expenditure limitation prescribed by subsection
(a) are not expended or encumbered for fiscal year 2026, then the
amount equal to the remaining amount of such expenditure authority
for fiscal year 2026 may be expended from the utility regulatory fee
fund for fiscal year 2026 pursuant to contracts for professional services
and any such expenditure for fiscal year 2026 shall be in addition to
any expenditure limitation imposed on the utility regulatory fee fund
for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 62.
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 52
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Printing plant improvements (173-00-1000-8546)....................$400,000
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $5,087,547
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 56(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the operating expenditures
account (173-00-1000-0200), the sum of $2,000 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the amount of moneys
reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 56(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the cedar crest living quarters
expenses account (173-00-1000-0631), the sum of $11,795 is hereby
lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, no expenditures or transfers
shall be made by the above agency from the ARPA agency state fiscal
recovery fund (173-00-3756) of the above agency during fiscal year
2025 for the costs of construction, fixtures, furniture or equipment for
the Docking state office building until such costs have been approved
by the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
except that such approval also may be given while the legislature is in
session.
Sec. 63.
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Licensing verification portal (173-00-1000-0030)..................$1,524,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the licensing verification
portal account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operating expenditures (173-00-1000-0200)..........................$5,381,681
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$2,000: Provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-2935, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, in
addition to other positions within the department of administration in
the unclassified service as prescribed by law, expenditures may be
made from the operating expenditures account for three employees in
the unclassified service under the Kansas civil service act.
Office of public advocates (173-00-1000-0300)........................$566,230
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of public
advocates account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,000.
KPERS bonds debt service (173-00-1000-0440)..................$88,182,490
Budget analysis (173-00-1000-0520)......................................$2,287,919
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the budget analysis
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That expenditures from this
account for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts as of June 30,
2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Long-term care
ombudsman (173-00-1000-0580), security against antisemitism (173-
00-1000-0650) and Docking state office building rehabilitation and
repair (173-00-1000-8545).

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 53
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the expanded
lottery act revenues fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
KPERS bond debt service (173-00-1700-1704)...................$36,094,221
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds or indirect
cost recoveries authorized by law shall not exceed the following:
Budget stabilization fund (173-00-1600-1600).....................................$0
Federal cash
management fund (173-00-2001-2200).......................................No limit
Curtis office building maintenance
reserve fund (173-00-2010-2190)................................................No limit
Purchasing fees fund (173-00-2017-2130)..................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the purchasing fees
fund for operating expenditures of the division of purchases, including
training seminars and official hospitality: Provided further, That the
director of purchases is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees
for operating expenditures incurred to reproduce and disseminate
purchasing information, administer vendor applications, administer
state contracts and conduct training seminars, including official
hospitality: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order
to recover all or part of such operating expenses: And provided further,
That all fees received for such operating expenses shall be deposited in
the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the purchasing fees
fund.
Building and ground fund (173-00-2028-2000)..........................No limit
Municipal accounting and training services
recovery fund (173-00-2033-1850).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the municipal
accounting and training services recovery fund to provide general
ledger, payroll reporting, utilities billing, data processing, and
accounting services to municipalities and to provide training programs
conducted for municipal government personnel, including official
hospitality: Provided further, That the director of accounts and reports
is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for such services and
programs: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed to cover
all or part of the operating expenditures incurred in providing such
services and programs, including official hospitality: And provided
further, That all fees received for such services and programs, including
official hospitality, shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and
shall be credited to the municipal accounting and training services
recovery fund.
State revolving fund services
fee fund (173-00-2038-2700)......................................................No limit
Architectural services
fee fund (173-00-2075-2110).......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the architectural
services fee fund for operating expenditures for distribution of
architectural information: Provided further, That the director of
facilities management is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect
fees for reproduction and distribution of architectural information: And
provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or
part of the operating expenses incurred for reproducing and distributing
architectural information: And provided further, That all fees received
for such reproduction and distribution of architectural information shall

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 54
be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
architectural services fee fund.
Budget fees fund (173-00-2191-2100)........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the budget fees fund
for operating expenditures for the division of the budget, including
training programs, special projects and official hospitality: Provided
further, That the director of the budget is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect fees for such training programs: And provided
further, That fees for such training programs and special projects shall
be fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating expenses
incurred for such training programs and special projects, including
official hospitality: And provided further, That all fees received for such
training programs and special projects and all fees received by the
division of the budget under the open records act for providing access
to or furnishing copies of public records shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the budget fees fund.
General fees fund (173-00-2197-2020).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund
for operating expenditures for the division of personnel services,
including human resources programs and official hospitality: Provided
further, That the director of personnel services is hereby authorized to
fix, charge and collect fees: And provided further, That fees shall be
fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating expenses incurred,
including official hospitality: And provided further, That all fees
received, including fees received under the open records act for
providing access to or furnishing copies of public records, shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
general fees fund.
Surplus property program fund –
on budget (173-00-2323-2300)....................................................No limit
Architectural services equipment
conversion fund (173-00-2401-2170)..........................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (173-00-2408-2030)..........................................No limit
Budget equipment
conversion fund (173-00-2434-2090)..........................................No limit
Conversion of materials and equipment – recycling
program fund (173-00-2435-2031)..............................................No limit
Preventive healthcare
program fund (173-00-2556-2550)..............................................No limit
Wireless enhanced 911
grant fund (173-00-2577-2570)...................................................No limit
State emergency fund (173-00-2581-2150).................................No limit
Construction defects
recovery fund (173-00-2632-2615).............................................No limit
Property contingency fund (173-00-2640-2060).........................No limit
Canceled warrants
payment fund (173-00-2645-2070).............................................No limit
Bioscience development fund (173-00-2765-2703)....................No limit
Department of administration
audit services fund (173-00-2819-2819).....................................No limit
Flood control emergency –
federal fund (173-00-3024-3020)................................................No limit
Older Americans act title IIIB
long-term care ombudsman
federal fund (173-00-3287-3287)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 55
Older Americans act title VII
long-term care ombudsman
federal fund (173-00-3358-3140)................................................No limit
Title XIX – office of the public advocates
medical assistance program
federal fund (173-00-3414).........................................................No limit
Title XX – ARPLTC
ombudsman fund (173-00-3680).................................................No limit
ARPA agency state fiscal
recovery fund (173-00-3756).......................................................No limit
Human resource information systems cost
recovery fund (173-00-6103-5700).............................................No limit
Accounting services
recovery fund (173-00-6105-4010).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the accounting services
recovery fund for the operating expenditures, including official
hospitality, of the department of administration: Provided further, That
the secretary of administration is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees for services or sales provided by the department of
administration that are not specifically authorized by any other statute:
And provided further, That all fees received for such services or sales
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the accounting services recovery fund.
Motor pool service fund (173-00-6109-4020).............................No limit
Digital imaging program fund (173-00-6121-6121)....................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the digital imaging
program fund for grants to state agencies for digital document imaging
projects.
Financial management system
development fund (173-00-6135-6130).......................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of administration may establish fees and
make special assessments in order to finance the costs of developing
the financial management system: Provided further, That all moneys
received for such fees and special assessments shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the financial management
system development fund.
State buildings
operating fund (173-00-6148-4100)............................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of administration is hereby authorized to
fix, charge and collect a real estate property leasing services fee at a
reasonable rate per square foot of space leased by state agencies as
approved by the secretary of administration under K.S.A. 75-3765, and
amendments thereto, to recover the costs incurred by the department of
administration in providing services to state agencies relating to leases
of real property: Provided further, That each state agency that is party
to a lease of real property that is approved by the secretary of
administration under K.S.A. 75-3765, and amendments thereto, shall
remit to the secretary of administration the real estate property leasing
services fee upon receipt of the billing therefor: And provided further,
That all moneys received for real estate property leasing services fees
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the state buildings operating fund or the building and ground
fund (173-00-2028-2000), as determined and directed by the secretary
of administration: And provided further, That the net proceeds from the
sale of all or any part of the Topeka state hospital property, as defined
by K.S.A. 75-37,123(a), and amendments thereto, shall be deposited in

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 56
the state treasury and credited to the state buildings operating fund or
the building and ground fund, as determined and directed by the
secretary of administration: And provided further, That the secretary of
administration is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect a
surcharge against all state agency leased square footage in Shawnee
county, including both state-owned and privately owned buildings: And
provided further, That all moneys received for such surcharge shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
state buildings operating fund or the building and ground fund, as
determined and directed by the secretary of administration.
Surplus property program fund –
off budget (173-00-6150-6150)...................................................No limit
Architectural services
recovery fund (173-00-6151-5500).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the architectural
services recovery fund for operating expenditures for the division of
facilities management: Provided further, That the director of facilities
management is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for
services provided to other state agencies not directly related to the
construction of a capital improvement project: And provided further,
That all fees received for all such services shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the architectural services
recovery fund.
Intragovernmental printing and central mail
service fund (173-00-6165).........................................................No limit
Intragovernmental printing service depreciation
reserve fund (173-00-6167-9810)................................................No limit
State workers compensation
self-insurance fund (173-00-6170-6170).....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the state workers compensation self-
insurance fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for salaries and
wages and other operating expenditures shall not exceed $5,354,839.
Dwight D Eisenhower
statue fund (173-00-7243-7243)..................................................No limit
Kansas gold star families
memorial fund (173-00-7244-7244)............................................No limit
Kansas suffragist
memorial fund (173-00-7245-7245)............................................No limit
Long-term care ombudsman gift and
grant fund (173-00-7258-7280)...................................................No limit
Health insurance premium
reserve fund (173-00-7350-7350)................................................No limit
Bid and contract
deposit fund (173-00-7609-7060)................................................No limit
Federal withholding tax
clearing fund (173-00-7701-7080)..............................................No limit
Non-state employer group
benefit fund (173-00-7707-7710)................................................No limit
Cafeteria benefits fund (173-00-7720-7723)...............................No limit
State leave payment
reserve fund (173-00-7730-7350)................................................No limit
Dependent care assistance
program fund (173-00-7740-7799)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the dependent care assistance
program fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for salaries and
wages and other operating expenditures shall not exceed $200,000.
Health benefits administration clearing fund –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 57
remit admin service org (173-00-7746-7746)..............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the health benefits administration
clearing fund – remit admin service org for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, for salaries and wages and other operating expenditures shall
not exceed $6,875,000.
Equipment lease purchase program administration
clearing fund (173-00-8701-8000)..............................................No limit
Facilities conservation
improvement fund (173-00-8745-4912)......................................No limit
State gaming revenues fund (173-00-9011-9100).......................No limit
Suspense fund (173-00-9075-9220)............................................No limit
Electronic funds transfer
suspense fund (173-00-9175-9490).............................................No limit
Friends of cedar crest
endowment fund (173-00-7246-7246).........................................No limit
Provided, That on or before the 10th day of each month commencing on
July 1, 2025, during fiscal year 2026, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer from the state general fund to the friends of cedar
crest endowment fund interest earnings based on: (1) The average daily
balance of moneys in the friends of cedar crest endowment fund for the
preceding month; and (2) the net earnings rate of the pooled money
investment portfolio for the preceding month.
1st Kansas (colored) voluntary infantry
regiment mural fund (173-00-7345-7345)...................................No limit
Ad astra sculpture fund (173-00-7334-7000)..............................No limit
Emil Joseph Kapaun memorial fund............................................No limit
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, for the secretary of administration, as part of
the system of payroll accounting formulated under K.S.A. 75-5501, and
amendments thereto, to establish a payroll deduction plan, for the
purpose of allowing insurers, that are authorized to do business in the
state of Kansas, to offer to state employees accident, disability,
specified disease and hospital indemnity products, which may be
purchased by such employees: Provided, however, That any such
insurer and indemnity product shall be approved by the Kansas state
employees healthcare commission prior to the establishment of such
payroll deduction: Provided, That upon notification of an employing
agency's receipt of written authorization by any state employee, the
director of accounts and reports shall make periodic deductions of
amounts as specified in such authorization from the salary or wages of
such state employee for the purpose of purchasing such indemnity
products: Provided further, That, subject to the approval of the
secretary of administration, the director of accounts and reports may
prescribe procedures, limitations and conditions for making payroll
deductions pursuant to this section.
(e) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $210,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of
the department of transportation to the state general fund for the
purpose of reimbursing the state general fund for the cost of providing
purchasing services to the department of transportation.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
administration is hereby authorized to approve refinancing of
equipment being financed by state agencies through the department's

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 58
equipment financing program. Such refinancing project is hereby
approved for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments
thereto.
(g) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated in any capital
improvement account of any special revenue fund or funds or in any
capital improvement account of the state general fund for the above
agency for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from any such capital improvement account
of any special revenue fund or funds or any such capital improvement
account of the state general fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of
making emergency repairs to any facility that is under the charge, care,
management or control of the department of administration as provided
by law: Provided, That the secretary of administration shall make a full
report on such repairs and expenditures to the director of the budget
and the director of legislative research.
(h) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the state economic
development initiatives fund and shall record a corresponding credit to
the state economic development initiatives fund in an amount certified
by the director of the budget that shall be equal to 75% of the amount
estimated by the director of the budget to be transferred and credited to
the state economic development initiatives fund during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, except that such amount shall be proportionally
adjusted during fiscal year 2026 with respect to any change in the
moneys to be transferred and credited to the state economic
development initiatives fund during fiscal year 2026. All moneys
transferred and credited to the state economic development initiatives
fund during fiscal year 2026 shall reduce the amount debited and
credited to the state economic development initiatives fund under this
subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
adjust the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's
receivables and to the state economic development initiatives fund
pursuant to this subsection, to reflect all moneys actually transferred
and credited to the state economic development initiatives fund during
fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state
treasurer of all amounts debited and credited to the state economic
development initiatives fund pursuant to this subsection and all
reductions and adjustments thereto made pursuant to this subsection.
The state treasurer shall enter all such amounts debited and credited and
shall make reductions and adjustments thereto on the books and records
kept and maintained for the state economic development initiatives
fund by the state treasurer in accordance with the notice thereof.
(i) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the correctional
institutions building fund and shall record a corresponding credit to the
correctional institutions building fund in an amount certified by the
director of the budget that shall be equal to 80% of the amount
estimated by the director of the budget to be transferred and credited to
the correctional institutions building fund during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, except that such amount shall be proportionally adjusted
during fiscal year 2026 with respect to any change in the moneys to be
transferred and credited to the correctional institutions building fund
during fiscal year 2026. All moneys transferred and credited to the
correctional institutions building fund during fiscal year 2026 shall
reduce the amount debited and credited to the correctional institutions

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 59
building fund under this subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
adjust the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's
receivables and to the correctional institutions building fund pursuant to
this subsection, to reflect all moneys actually transferred and credited to
the correctional institutions building fund during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state
treasurer of all amounts debited and credited to the correctional
institutions building fund pursuant to this subsection and all reductions
and adjustments thereto made pursuant to this subsection. The state
treasurer shall enter all such amounts debited and credited and shall
make reductions and adjustments thereto on the books and records kept
and maintained for the correctional institutions building fund by the
state treasurer in accordance with the notice thereof.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
administration, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the department of
administration to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state general fund for the department of administration. The
secretary of administration shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(k) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
SIBF – state
building insurance (173-00-8100-8920)....................................$710,000
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 76-6b05, and
amendments thereto, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the SIBF – state building insurance account of the state
institutions building fund for state building insurance premiums.
(l) There is appropriated for the above agency from the
correctional institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:
CIBF – state
building insurance (173-00-8600-8930)....................................$810,000
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 76-6b09, and
amendments thereto, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the CIBF – state building insurance account of the correctional
institutions building fund for state building insurance premiums.
(m) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or amounts from the
appropriate federal fund or funds of the Kansas department for aging
and disability services to the older Americans act title IIIB long-term
care ombudsman federal fund (173-00-3287) and the older Americans
act title VII long-term care ombudsman federal fund (173-00-3358) of
the department of administration to reimburse the agency for costs
related to administering federal programs.
(n) (1) (A) Prior to August 15, 2025, the state board of regents
shall determine and certify to the director of the budget each of the
specific amounts from the amounts appropriated from the state general
fund or from the moneys appropriated and available in the special
revenue funds for each of the regents agencies to be transferred to and
debited to the 27th payroll adjustment account of the state general fund
by the director of accounts and reports pursuant to this subsection:
Provided, That the aggregate of all such amounts certified to the
director of the budget shall be an amount that is equal to or more than
$1,184,067. The certification by the state board of regents shall specify

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 60
the amount in each account of the state general fund or in each special
revenue fund, or account thereof, that is designated by the state board
of regents pursuant to this subsection for each of the regents agencies to
be transferred to and debited to the 27th payroll adjustment account in
the state general fund by the director of accounts and reports pursuant
to this subsection. At the same time as such certification is transmitted
to the director of the budget, the state board of regents shall transmit a
copy of such certification to the director of legislative research.
(B) The director of the budget shall review each such certification
from the state board of regents and shall certify a copy of each such
certification from the state board of regents to the director of accounts
and reports. At the same time as such certification is transmitted to the
director of accounts and reports, the director of the budget shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(C) On August 15, 2025, in accordance with the certification by
the director of the budget that is submitted to the director of accounts
and reports under this subsection, the appropriation for fiscal year 2026
for each account of the state general fund, state economic development
initiatives fund, state water plan fund and children's initiatives fund that
is appropriated or reappropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of
the legislature is hereby respectively lapsed by the amount equal to the
amount certified under this subsection.
(2) In determining the amounts to be certified to the director of
accounts and reports in accordance with this subsection, the director of
the budget and the state board of regents shall consider any changed
circumstances and unanticipated reductions in expenditures or
unanticipated and required expenditures by the regents agencies for
fiscal year 2026.
(3) As used in this subsection, "regents agency" means the state
board of regents, Fort Hays state university, Kansas state university,
Kansas state university extension systems and agriculture research
programs, Kansas state university veterinary medical center, Emporia
state university, Pittsburg state university, the university of Kansas, the
university of Kansas medical center and Wichita state university.
(4) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:
(A) Any money held in trust in a trust fund or held in trust in any
other special revenue fund or funds of any regents agency;
(B) any moneys received from any agency or authority of the
federal government or from any other federal source, other than any
such federal moneys that are credited to or may be received and
credited to special revenue funds of a regents agency and that are
determined by the state board of regents to be federal moneys that may
be transferred to and debited to the 27th payroll adjustment account of
the state general fund by the director of accounts and reports pursuant
to this subsection;
(C) any account of the Kansas educational building fund; or
(D) any fund of any regents agency in the state treasury, as
determined by the director of the budget, that would experience
financial or administrative difficulties as a result of executing the
provisions of this subsection, including, but not limited to, cash flow
problems, the inability to meet ordinary expenditure obligations, or any
conflicts with prevailing contracts, compacts or other provisions of law.
(5) Each amount transferred from any special revenue fund of any
regents agency to the state general fund pursuant to this subsection is
transferred to reimburse the state general fund for accounting, auditing,
budgeting, legal, payroll, personnel and purchasing services and any
other governmental services that are performed on behalf of the regents

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 61
agency involved by other state agencies that receive appropriations
from the state general fund to provide such services.
(o) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, for the secretary of administration to fix,
charge and collect fees for architectural, engineering and management
services provided for capital improvement projects of the state board of
regents or any state educational institution, as defined by K.S.A. 76-
711, and amendments thereto, for which the department of
administration provides such services and which are financed in whole
or in part by gifts, bequests or donations made by one or more private
individuals or other private entities: Provided, That such fees for such
services are hereby authorized to be fixed, charged and collected in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-1269, and amendments
thereto, notwithstanding any provisions of K.S.A. 75-1269, and
amendments thereto, to the contrary: Provided further, That all such
fees received shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the architectural services recovery fund.
(p) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the expanded
lottery act revenues fund and shall record a corresponding credit to the
expanded lottery act revenues fund in an amount certified by the
director of the budget that shall be equal to the amount estimated by the
director of the budget to be transferred and credited to the expanded
lottery act revenues fund during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
except that such amount shall be proportionally adjusted during fiscal
year 2026 with respect to any change in the moneys to be transferred
and credited to the expanded lottery act revenues fund during fiscal
year 2026. All moneys transferred and credited to the expanded lottery
act revenues fund during fiscal year 2026 shall reduce the amount
debited and credited to the expanded lottery act revenues fund under
this subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
adjust the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's
receivables and to the expanded lottery act revenues fund pursuant to
this subsection, to reflect all moneys actually transferred and credited to
the expanded lottery act revenues fund during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state
treasurer of all amounts debited and credited to the expanded lottery act
revenues fund pursuant to this subsection and all reductions and
adjustments thereto made pursuant to this subsection. The state
treasurer shall enter all such amounts debited and credited and shall
make reductions and adjustments thereto on the books and records kept
and maintained for the expanded lottery act revenues fund by the state
treasurer in accordance with the notice thereof.
(q) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the children's
initiatives fund and shall record a corresponding credit to the children's
initiatives fund in an amount certified by the director of the budget that
shall be equal to 50% of the amount estimated by the director of the
budget to be transferred and credited to the children's initiatives fund
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, except that such amount
shall be proportionally adjusted during fiscal year 2026 with respect to

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 62
any change in the moneys to be transferred and credited to the
children's initiatives fund during fiscal year 2026. Among other
appropriate factors, the director of the budget shall take into
consideration the estimated and actual receipts and interest earnings of
the Kansas endowment for youth fund for fiscal year 2025 and fiscal
year 2026 in determining the amount to be certified under this
subsection. All moneys transferred and credited to the children's
initiatives fund during fiscal year 2026 shall reduce the amount debited
and credited to the children's initiatives fund under this subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
adjust the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's
receivables and to the children's initiatives fund pursuant to this
subsection to reflect all moneys actually transferred and credited to the
children's initiatives fund during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state
treasurer of all amounts debited and credited to the children's initiatives
fund pursuant to this subsection and all reductions and adjustments
thereto made pursuant to this subsection. The state treasurer shall enter
all such amounts debited and credited and shall make reductions and
adjustments thereto on the books and records kept and maintained for
the children's initiatives fund by the state treasurer in accordance with
the notice thereof.
(4) The reductions and adjustments prescribed to be made by the
director of accounts and reports and the state treasurer pursuant to this
subsection for the children's initiatives fund to account for moneys
actually received that are to be transferred and credited to the children's
initiatives fund shall be made after the reductions and adjustments
prescribed to be made by the director of accounts and reports and the
state treasurer pursuant to subsection (r) for the Kansas endowment for
youth fund to account for moneys actually received that are to be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Kansas endowment
for youth fund.
(r) (1) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
record a debit to the state treasurer's receivables for the Kansas
endowment for youth fund and shall record a corresponding credit to
the Kansas endowment for youth fund in an amount certified by the
director of the budget that shall be equal to 75% of the amount
approved for expenditure by the children's cabinet during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, as certified by the director of the budget. All
moneys received and credited to the Kansas endowment for youth fund
during fiscal year 2026 shall reduce the amount debited and credited to
the Kansas endowment for youth fund under this subsection.
(2) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
adjust the amounts debited and credited to the state treasurer's
receivables and to the Kansas endowment for youth fund pursuant to
this subsection to reflect all moneys actually transferred and credited to
the Kansas endowment for youth fund during fiscal year 2026.
(3) The director of accounts and reports shall notify the state
treasurer of all amounts debited and credited to the Kansas endowment
for youth fund pursuant to this subsection and all reductions and
adjustments thereto made pursuant to this subsection. The state
treasurer shall enter all such amounts debited and credited and shall
make reductions and adjustments thereto on the books and records kept
and maintained for the Kansas endowment for youth fund by the state
treasurer in accordance with the notice thereof.
(4) The reductions and adjustments prescribed to be made by the
director of accounts and reports and the state treasurer pursuant to this
subsection for the Kansas endowment for youth fund to account for
moneys actually received that are to be deposited in the state treasury

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 63
and credited to the Kansas endowment for youth fund shall be made
before the reductions and adjustments prescribed to be made by the
director of accounts and reports and the state treasurer pursuant to
subsection (q) for the children's initiatives fund to account for moneys
actually received that are to be transferred and credited to the children's
initiatives fund.
(s) On July 1, 2025, for fiscal year 2026, the secretary of
administration is hereby authorized to receive gifts, grants, bequests or
donations of money for the benefit of cedar crest: Provided, That such
gifts, grants, bequests or donations of money shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the friends of cedar crest
endowment fund.
(t) On July 1, 2025, the title XIX – long-term care ombudsman
medical assistance program federal fund (173-00-3414) of the
department of administration is hereby redesignated as the title XIX –
office of the public advocates medical assistance program federal fund
of the department of administration.
(u) On July 1, 2025, the CRRSA 2021 LTC ombudsman fund
(173-00-3680) of the department of administration is hereby
redesignated as the title XX – ARPLTC ombudsman fund of the
department of administration.
(v) On July 1, 2025, the intragovernmental printing service fund
(173-00-6165) of the department of administration is hereby
redesignated as the intragovernmental printing and central mail service
fund of the department of administration.
(w) On July 1, 2025, no expenditures or transfers shall be made by
the above agency from the ARPA agency state fiscal recovery fund
(173-00-3756) of the above agency during fiscal year 2026 for the costs
of construction, fixtures, furniture or equipment for the Docking state
office building, until such costs have been approved by the state
finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a
matter of legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed
in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, except that such
approval also may be given while the legislature is in session.
(x) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, for the secretary of administration to charge
and collect rental payments on a monthly basis in an amount of $1 per
square foot from any nonstate entity that leases or is assigned office
space in the state capitol building: Provided, That the amounts collected
shall be remitted by the secretary of administration to the state treasurer
in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto: Provided further, That upon receipt of each such remittance,
the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to
the credit of the state buildings operating fund or other funds of the
department of administration as prescribed by the secretary of
administration.
Sec. 64.
OFFICE OF INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Rehabilitation and repair (335-00-1000-0050).......................$4,250,000

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 64
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and
repair account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Vendor contract (335-00-1000-0070)......................................$2,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the vendor contract
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Agency IT emergency (355-00-1000).....................................$2,000,000
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Public safety broadband
services fund (335-00-2125-2125)..............................................No limit
GIS contracting
services fund (335-00-2163-2163)..............................................No limit
State and local implementation grant –
federal fund (335-00-3576-3576)................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (335-00-3753-3772)..............................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (335-00-3756-3536).......No limit
GIS contracting
services fund (335-00-6009-6009)..............................................No limit
Information technology fund (335-00-6110-4030)......................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the information technology fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000: Provided further, That any
moneys collected from a fee increase for information services
recommended by the governor shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the information technology fund.
Information technology
reserve fund (335-00-6147-4080)................................................No limit
Sec. 65.
KANSAS INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Kansas information security office (335-00-1000-0060)........$7,723,902
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas information
security office account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Information technology fund (335-00-6110-4030)......................No limit
Provided, That any moneys collected from a fee increase for
information services recommended by the governor shall be deposited
in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-
4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the information
technology fund.
Information technology reserve fund (335-00-6147-4080).........No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (335-00-3756-3536).......No limit
Sec. 66.
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Administrative hearings

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 65
office fund (178-00-2582)...........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the administrative hearings office
fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $50.
Sec. 67.
OFFICE OF THE CHILD ADVOCATE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Office of the child advocate (114-00-1000-0300).................................$0
Provided, That expenditures from the office of the child advocate
account for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Sec. 68.
OFFICE OF THE CHILD ADVOCATE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Office of the child advocate (114-00-1000-0300)......................$750,576
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of the child
advocate account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the office of the child advocate account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Sec. 69.
STATE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (562-00-1000-0103)..........................$1,510,861
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
BOTA filing fee fund (562-00-2240-2240).............................$1,103,069
American rescue plan – state fiscal
relief – federal fund (562-00-3756).............................................No limit
Sec. 70.
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the division of
vehicles operating fund (565-00-2089-2020) of the department of
revenue is hereby decreased from $56,505,635 to $56,088,838.
Sec. 71.
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (565-00-1000-0303)........................$17,769,960
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,500.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Repossessed certificates of title

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 66
fee fund (565-00-2015-2070)......................................................No limit
Special training fund (565-00-2016-2000)..................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the special training
fund for operating expenditures, including official hospitality, incurred
for conferences, training seminars, workshops and examinations:
Provided further, That the secretary of revenue is hereby authorized to
fix, charge and collect fees for conferences, training seminars,
workshops and examinations sponsored or cosponsored by the
department of revenue: And provided further, That such fees shall be
fixed in order to recover all or part of the operating expenditures
incurred for such conferences, training seminars, workshops and
examinations or for qualifying applicants for such conferences, training
seminars, workshops and examinations: And provided further, That all
fees received for conferences, training seminars, workshops and
examinations shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the special training fund.
Recovery fund for enforcement actions
and attorney fees (565-00-2021-2060)........................................No limit
Photo fee fund (565-00-2084-2140)............................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 8-299, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made
from the photo fee fund for administration and operation of the driver
license program and related support operations in the division of
administration of the department of revenue, including costs of
administering the provisions of K.S.A. 8-240, 8-243, 8-267, 8-1324 and
8-1325, and amendments thereto, relating to drivers licenses,
instruction permits and identification cards.
Sand royalty fund (565-00-2087-2010).......................................No limit
Division of vehicles
operating fund (565-00-2089-2020)......................................$58,520,965
Provided, That all receipts collected under authority of K.S.A. 74-2012,
and amendments thereto, shall be credited to the division of vehicles
operating fund: Provided further, That any expenditure from the
division of vehicles operating fund of the department of revenue to
reimburse the audit services fund (540-00-9204-9000) of the division
of post audit for a financial-compliance audit in an amount certified by
the legislative post auditor shall be in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on the division of vehicles operating fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: And provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made from this fund
for the administration and operation of the department of revenue.
Commercial vehicle administrative
system fund (565-00-2098-2098)................................................No limit
Vehicle dealers and manufacturers
fee fund (565-00-2189-2030)......................................................No limit
Kansas qualified agricultural ethyl alcohol
producer incentive fund (565-00-2215).......................................No limit
Distinctive license plate fund (565-00-2232-2230).....................No limit
VIPS/CAMA technology
hardware fund (565-00-2244-2170)............................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-2021, and
amendments thereto, or of any other statute, expenditures may be made
from the VIPS/CAMA technology hardware fund for the purposes of
upgrading the VIPS/CAMA computer hardware and software for the
state or for the counties and for administration and operation of the
department of revenue.
Automated tax systems fund (565-00-2265-2265)......................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 67
MSA compliance fund (565-00-2274-2274)...............................No limit
Microfilming fund (565-00-2281-2270)......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the microfilming fund
to operate and maintain a microfilming activity to sell microfilming
services to other state agencies: Provided further, That all moneys
received for such services shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the microfilming fund.
Dyed diesel fuel fee fund (565-00-2286-2280)...........................No limit
Electronic databases fee fund (565-00-2287-2180).....................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-2022, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made
from the electronic databases fee fund for the purposes of operating
expenditures, including expenditures for capital outlay; of operating,
maintaining or improving the vehicle information processing system
(VIPS), the Kansas computer assisted mass appraisal system (CAMA)
and other electronic database systems of the department of revenue,
including the costs incurred to provide access to or to furnish copies of
public records in such database systems and for the administration and
operation of the department of revenue.
Cigarette/tobacco products
regulation fund (565-00-2294-2190)...........................................No limit
Alcoholic beverage control
modernization fund (565-00-2299-2299)....................................No limit
Hazmat fee fund (565-00-2365-2300).........................................No limit
State charitable gaming
regulation fund (565-00-2381-2385)...........................................No limit
Kansas retail dealer
incentive fund (565-00-2387-2380).............................................No limit
Division of vehicles
modernization fund (565-00-2390-2390)....................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (565-00-2417-2050)..........................................No limit
Forfeited property fee fund (565-00-2428-2200)........................No limit
Tax amnesty recovery fund (565-00-2462-2462)........................No limit
Setoff services revenue fund (565-00-2617-2080)......................No limit
Publications fee fund (565-00-2663-2090)..................................No limit
Child support enforcement contractual
agreement fund (565-00-2683-2110)...........................................No limit
County treasurers' vehicle licensing
fee fund (565-00-2687-2120)......................................................No limit
Reappraisal
reimbursement fund (565-00-2693-2130)...................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received for the costs incurred for
conducting appraisals for any county shall be deposited in the state
treasury and credited to the reappraisal reimbursement fund: Provided
further, That expenditures may be made from this fund for the purpose
of conducting appraisals pursuant to orders of the state board of tax
appeals under K.S.A. 79-1479, and amendments thereto.
Fleet rental vehicle
administration fund (565-00-2799-2799)....................................No limit
Commercial driver's license drive test
fee fund (565-00-2816-2816)......................................................No limit
Taxpayer notification costs fund (565-00-2852-2852)................No limit
Kansas historic site fund (565-00-2872-2872)............................No limit
Gage park improvement authority
sales tax fund (565-00-2874-2874)..............................................No limit
Commercial driver
education fund (565-00-2876-2876)............................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 68
Drivers license first responders indicator
federal fund (565-00-3179-3179)................................................No limit
Enforcing underage drinking
federal fund (565-00-3219-3219)................................................No limit
Commercial vehicle information systems/network
federal fund (565-00-3244-3244)................................................No limit
FDA tobacco program
federal fund (565-00-3330-3330)................................................No limit
Highway planning construction
federal fund (565-00-3333-3333)................................................No limit
State and community highway
safety fund (565-00-3815-3815)..................................................No limit
Intra-governmental
service fund (565-00-6132-6101)................................................No limit
Miscellaneous trust
bonds fund (565-00-7556-5180)..................................................No limit
Motor carrier permits escrow
clearing fund (565-00-7581-5400)..............................................No limit
Liquor excise tax guarantee
bond fund (565-00-7604-5190)...................................................No limit
Non-resident contractors cash
bond fund (565-00-7605-5200)...................................................No limit
Bond guaranty fund (565-00-7606-5210)....................................No limit
Interstate motor fuel user cash
bond fund (565-00-7616-5220)...................................................No limit
Motor fuel distributor cash
bond fund (565-00-7617-5230)...................................................No limit
Special county mineral production
tax fund (565-00-7668-5280)......................................................No limit
Community improvement district sales tax
administration fund (565-00-7675-5300)....................................No limit
County drug tax fund (565-00-7680-5310).................................No limit
Escheat proceeds
suspense fund (565-00-7753-5290).............................................No limit
Charitable gaming
refund fund (565-00-9001-9001).................................................No limit
Native American veterans' income
tax refund fund (565-00-9019-9019)...........................................No limit
Privilege tax refund fund (565-00-9031-9300)...........................No limit
Suspense fund (565-00-9032-9310)............................................No limit
Cigarette tax refund fund (565-00-9033-9330)...........................No limit
Motor-vehicle fuel tax
refund fund (565-00-9035-9350).................................................No limit
Cereal malt beverage tax
refund fund (565-00-9036-9360).................................................No limit
Income tax refund fund (565-00-9038-9370)..............................No limit
Sales tax refund fund (565-00-9039-9380).................................No limit
Compensating tax
refund fund (565-00-9040-9390).................................................No limit
Alcoholic liquor tax
refund fund (565-00-9041-9400).................................................No limit
Motor carrier tax
refund fund (565-00-9042-9410).................................................No limit
Car company tax fund (565-00-9043-9420)................................No limit
Protested motor carrier
taxes fund (565-00-9044-9430)...................................................No limit
Tobacco products
refund fund (565-00-9045-9440).................................................No limit
Community improvement district sales tax

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 69
refund fund (565-00-9049-9455).................................................No limit
Transient guest tax refund fund (established by
K.S.A. 12-1694a) (565-00-9066-9450).......................................No limit
Interstate motor fuel taxes
refund fund (565-00-9069-9010).................................................No limit
Interstate motor fuel taxes
clearing fund (565-00-9070-9710)..............................................No limit
International fuel tax agreement
clearing fund (565-00-9072-9015)..............................................No limit
Transient guest tax refund fund (established by
K.S.A. 12-16,100) (565-00-9074-9480)......................................No limit
Estate tax abatement
refund fund (565-00-9082-9501).................................................No limit
Fleet rental vehicle clearing fund (565-00-9089-9089)...............No limit
Interfund clearing fund (565-00-9096-9510)..............................No limit
Local alcoholic liquor
clearing fund (565-00-9100-9700)..............................................No limit
International registration plan distribution
clearing fund (565-00-9103-9520)..............................................No limit
Rental motor vehicle excise tax
refund fund (565-00-9106-9730).................................................No limit
Mineral production tax
refund fund (565-00-9121-9540).................................................No limit
Special fuels tax refund fund (565-00-9122-9550).....................No limit
LP-gas motor fuels
refund fund (565-00-9123-9560).................................................No limit
Local alcoholic liquor
refund fund (565-00-9124-9570).................................................No limit
Sales tax clearing fund (565-00-9148-9580)...............................No limit
Rental motor vehicle excise tax
clearing fund (565-00-9187-9640)..............................................No limit
Community improvement district sales tax
clearing fund (565-00-9189-9655)..............................................No limit
County and city retailers sales tax clearing fund – county
and city sales tax (565-00-9190-9610)........................................No limit
City and county compensating use tax
clearing fund (565-00-9191-9620)..............................................No limit
County and city transient guest tax
clearing fund (565-00-9192-9630)..............................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal
relief – federal fund (565-00-3756).............................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, October 1, 2025, January 1, 2026, and April
1, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $14,361,897
from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation to the division of vehicles operating fund (565-00-2089-
2020) of the department of revenue for the purpose of financing the
cost of operation and general expense of the division of vehicles and
related operations of the department of revenue.
(d) On August 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $77,250 from the accounting services recovery fund (173-00-
6105-4010) of the department of administration to the setoff services
revenue fund (565-00-2617-2080) of the department of revenue for
reimbursing costs of recovering amounts owed to state agencies under
K.S.A. 75-6201 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,000,000 from the
state general fund to the division of vehicles modernization fund (565-
00-2390-2390) of the department of revenue.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 70
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,200,000 from the
Kansas endowment for youth fund (365-00-7000-2000) to the MSA
compliance fund (565-00-2274-2274) of the department of revenue.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3221q, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be
made by the above agency from such moneys to enter into a
memorandum of understanding with the state historical society to
transfer moneys to the Kansas historic site fund (288-00-2872) in an
amount as designated for contribution to the Kansas historic site fund
of the above agency for fiscal year 2026 and any prior fiscal years in
which the donation to historic sites by taxpayers occurred.
Sec. 72.
KANSAS LOTTERY
(a) On the effective date of this act, the aggregate of the amounts
authorized by section 64(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas to be transferred from the lottery operating fund (450-00-5123-
5100) to the state gaming revenues fund (173-00-9011-9100) during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, is hereby increased from $71,490,000
to $72,990,000.
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8734, and amendments thereto, and K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 74-8781, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2025, as authorized by section 64 of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, to
negotiate or enter into any contract or extension or renewal of an
existing contract for the management of sports wagering with any
lottery gaming facility manager: Provided, That "sports wagering" and
"lottery gaming facility manager" mean the same as defined in K.S.A.
74-8702, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 73.
KANSAS LOTTERY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Sports wagering receipts fund (450-00-2946-2946)....................No limit
Privilege fee repayment fund (450-00-2947-2947).....................No limit
Lottery operating fund (450-00-5123).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the lottery operating fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $5,000.
Expanded lottery act
revenues fund (450-00-5127-5120)......................................................$0
Expanded lottery receipts fund (450-00-5128)............................No limit
Lottery gaming facility
manager fund (450-00-5129-5150).............................................No limit
Lottery prize payment fund (450-00-7381).................................No limit
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8711, and
amendments thereto, and subject to the provisions of this subsection:
(1) An amount of not less than $2,300,000 shall be certified by the
executive director of the Kansas lottery to the director of accounts and

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 71
reports on or before July 15, 2025; and (2) an amount of not less than
$4,700,000 shall be certified by the executive director of the Kansas
lottery to the director of accounts and reports on or before August 15,
2025, and on or before the 15th of each month thereafter through June
15, 2026: Provided, That, upon receipt of each such certification, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount certified from
the lottery operating fund (450-00-5123-5100) to the state gaming
revenues fund (173-00-9011-9100) and shall credit such amount to the
state gaming revenues fund (173-00-9011-9100) for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026: Provided, however, That, after the date that an
amount of $54,000,000 has been transferred from the lottery operating
fund to the state gaming revenues fund for fiscal year 2026 pursuant to
this subsection, the executive director of the Kansas lottery shall
continue to certify amounts to the director of accounts and reports on or
before the 15th of each month through June 15, 2026, except that the
amounts certified after such date shall not be subject to the minimum
amount of $4,700,000: Provided further, That the amounts certified by
the executive director of the Kansas lottery to the director of accounts
and reports, after the date an amount of $54,000,000 has been
transferred from the lottery operating fund to the state gaming revenues
fund for fiscal year 2026 pursuant to this subsection, shall be
determined by the executive director so that an aggregate of all
amounts certified pursuant to this subsection for fiscal year 2026 is
equal to or more than $79,490,000: And provided further, That the
aggregate of all amounts transferred from the lottery operating fund to
the state gaming revenues fund for fiscal year 2026 pursuant to this
subsection shall be equal to or more than $79,490,000: And provided
further, That the transfers prescribed by this subsection shall be the
maximum amount possible while maintaining an adequate cash balance
necessary to make expenditures for prize payments and operating costs:
And provided further, That the transfers prescribed in this subsection
shall include the total profit attributed to the special veterans benefit
game under K.S.A. 74-8724, and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That the transfers prescribed by this subsection shall be made in
lieu of transfers under K.S.A. 74-8711(d), and amendments thereto, for
fiscal year 2026.
(c) In addition to the purposes for which expenditures of moneys
in the lottery operating fund (450-00-5123-5100) may be made, as
authorized by the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8711, and amendments
thereto, in fiscal year 2026, moneys in the lottery operating fund may
be used for payment of all costs incurred in the operation and
administration of the Kansas lottery, the Kansas lottery act and the
Kansas expanded lottery act.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8724, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from
the lottery operating fund (450-00-5123-5100) to the state gaming
revenues fund (173-00-9011-9100) the amount of total profit attributed
to the veterans benefits game pursuant to K.S.A. 74-8724, and
amendments thereto, during fiscal year 2026: Provided, That, the
transfer to the veterans benefit lottery game fund (694-00-2303-2303)
of the Kansas office of veterans services for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, authorized by section 83(g) represents the total profits
derived from the veterans benefits game pursuant to K.S.A. 74-8724,
and amendments thereto: Provided further, That, on or before August 1,
2026, the executive director of the lottery shall report the amount of
total profit attributed to the veterans benefits game pursuant to K.S.A.
74-8724, and amendments thereto, during fiscal year 2026 to the
director of the budget and the director of legislative research.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 72
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8720, and amendments thereto, or any
other statute, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this
or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by such agency from such
moneys to provide the name and address of all persons who claim a
Kansas lottery prize of $10,000 or more to the office of inspector
general established under K.S.A. 75-7427, and amendments thereto:
Provided, That the office of inspector general shall use information
received pursuant to this subsection solely for the purposes of carrying
out the powers, duties and functions prescribed by K.S.A. 75-7427, and
amendments thereto: Provided further, That the office of inspector
general shall not publicly disclose the identity of any lottery prize
winner, including recipients for whom such prize affects such
recipient's eligibility for or receipt of medical assistance.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8734, and amendments thereto, and K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 74-8781, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, no
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, to
negotiate or enter into any contract or extension or renewal of an
existing contract for the management of sports wagering with any
lottery gaming facility manager: Provided, That "sports wagering" and
"lottery gaming facility manager" mean the same as defined in K.S.A.
74-8702, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 74.
KANSAS RACING AND
GAMING COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Horse fair racing
benefit fund (553-00-2296-3000)................................................No limit
Tribal gaming fund (553-00-2320-3700).....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the tribal gaming fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Education and training fund (553-00-2459-2450).......................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the education and
training fund for operating expenditures, including official hospitality,
incurred for hosting or providing training, inservice workshops and
conferences: Provided further, That the Kansas racing and gaming
commission is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for
hosting or providing training, inservice workshops and conferences:
And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover
all or part of the operating expenditures incurred for hosting or
providing such training, inservice workshops and conferences: And
provided further, That all fees received for hosting or providing such
training, inservice workshops and conferences shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the education and training
fund.
Kansas horse breeding
development fund (553-00-2516-2300).......................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 73
Expanded lottery regulation fund (553-00-2535)........................No limit
Live horse racing purse
supplement fund (553-00-2546-2800).........................................No limit
Live greyhound racing purse
supplement fund (553-00-2557-2900).........................................No limit
Greyhound promotion and
development fund (553-00-2561-3100).......................................No limit
Racing investigative
expense fund (553-00-2570-2400)..............................................No limit
Kansas greyhound breeding
development fund (553-00-2601-2500).......................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding K.S.A. 74-8831, and amendments
thereto, all moneys transferred into this fund pursuant to K.S.A. 74-
8767(b), and amendments thereto, shall be deposited to a separate
account established for the purpose described in this proviso and
moneys in this account shall be expended only to supplement special
stake races and to enhance the amount per point paid to owners of
Kansas-whelped greyhounds that win live races at Kansas greyhound
tracks and pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the Kansas
racing and gaming commission: Provided further, That transfers from
this account to the live greyhound racing purse supplement fund may
be made in accordance with K.S.A. 74-8767(b), and amendments
thereto.
Racing reimbursable
expense fund (553-00-2616-2600)..............................................No limit
Gaming background
investigation fund (553-00-2682-2680).......................................No limit
Illegal gambling
enforcement fund (553-00-2734-2690).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the illegal gambling
enforcement fund for direct or indirect operating expenditures incurred
for investigatory seizure and forfeiture activities, including, but not
limited to: (1) Conducting investigations of illegal gambling operations
or activities; (2) participating in illegal gaming in order to collect or
purchase evidence as part of an undercover investigation into illegal
gambling operations; and (3) acquiring information or making contacts
leading to illegal gaming activities: Provided, however, That all moneys
that are expended for any such evidence purchase, information
acquisition or similar investigatory purpose or activity from whatever
funding source and that are recovered shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the illegal gambling
enforcement fund: Provided further, That any moneys received or
awarded to the Kansas racing and gaming commission for such
enforcement activities shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the illegal gambling enforcement fund.
Gaming machine
examination fund (553-00-2998-2990).......................................No limit
State racing fund (553-00-5131-5000)........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the state racing fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Racing applicant
deposit fund (553-00-7383-7000)................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the expanded lottery regulation fund
for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,500.
(b) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $450,000 from the state general fund to the tribal gaming fund
(553-00-2320-3700) of the Kansas racing and gaming commission.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 74
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer one or more amounts certified by the
executive director of the state gaming agency from the tribal gaming
fund to the state general fund: Provided, That all such transfers shall be
for the purpose of reimbursing the state general fund for the amount
equal to the net amount obtained by subtracting (1) the aggregate of
any costs incurred by the state gaming agency during fiscal year 2026
for any arbitration or litigation in connection with the administration
and enforcement of tribal-state gaming compacts or the provisions of
the tribal gaming oversight act, from (2) the aggregate of the amounts
transferred to the tribal gaming fund (553-00-2320-3700) of the Kansas
racing and gaming commission during fiscal year 2026 for the
operating expenditures for the state gaming agency and any other
expenses incurred in connection with the administration and
enforcement of tribal-state gaming compacts or the provisions of the
tribal gaming oversight act.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all payments for
services provided by the Kansas bureau of investigation shall be paid
by the Kansas racing and gaming commission in accordance with
K.S.A. 75-5516(b), and amendments thereto, pursuant to bills that are
presented in a timely manner by the Kansas bureau of investigation for
services rendered.
(e) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made from the moneys appropriated in the tribal gaming fund (553-
00-2320-3700) for fiscal year 2026 for the Kansas racing and gaming
commission by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures, which are hereby authorized,
may be made from the tribal gaming fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
state gaming agency regulatory oversight of class III gaming, including,
but not limited to, the regulatory oversight and law enforcement
activities of monitoring compliance with tribal-state gaming compacts
and conducting investigations of violations of tribal-state gaming
compacts, investigations of criminal violations of the laws of this state
at tribal gaming facilities, criminal violations of the tribal gaming
oversight act, background investigations of applicants and vendors and
investigations of other criminal activities related to tribal gaming.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8831, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall not make the transfer from the Kansas greyhound breeding
development fund (553-00-2601-2500) of the Kansas racing and
gaming commission to the greyhound tourism fund of the department
of commerce that is directed to be made on or before June 30, 2026, by
K.S.A. 74-8831(b)(1), and amendments thereto, and shall transfer on or
before June 30, 2026, the amount equal to 15% of all moneys credited
to the Kansas greyhound breeding development fund during the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, from the Kansas greyhound breeding
development fund to the greyhound promotion and development fund
(553-00-2561-3100) of the Kansas racing and gaming commission.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of any other statute, the Kansas racing and gaming
commission is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect additional
fees to recover all or part of the direct and indirect costs or operating
expenses incurred or expected to be incurred by the Kansas racing and
gaming commission for the regulation of racing activities that are not
otherwise recovered from a parimutuel facility licensee under authority
of any other statute: Provided, That such fees shall be in addition to all
taxes and other fees otherwise authorized by law: Provided further,
That such costs or operating expenses shall include all or part of any
auditing, drug testing, accounting, security and law enforcement,

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 75
licensing of any office or other facility for use by a parimutuel facility
licensee or projects to update and upgrade information technology
software or facilities of the commission and shall specifically include
any general operating expenses that are associated with regulatory
activities attributable to the entity upon which any such fee is imposed
and all expenses related to reopening any race track or other racing
facility: And provided further, That all moneys received for such fees
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the state racing fund (553-00-5131-5000).
Sec. 75.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Bombardier SSA project (300-00-1000).................................$5,750,000
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the amount of moneys
appropriated and reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, by section 68(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024
Session Laws of Kansas from the state economic development
initiatives fund in the small business R&D grants account (300-00-
1900-1300), the sum of $1,935,139 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $2,000,000 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 68(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state economic development initiatives fund in the Kansas
workforce marketing account (300-00-1900-1340), the sum of
$950,037 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 76.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Advantage Kansas (300-00-1000).............................................$138,992
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the advantage Kansas account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Purple UAS certification innovation grant account................$1,000,000
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $500,000
shall be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal
year 2026 to provide a grant to the national institute for aviation
research at Wichita state university to research and create an accurate
and comprehensive checklist necessary for blue unmanned aircraft
systems (UAS) compliance, which shall include the United States
department of defense requirements for maintenance of supply chain
security necessary for manufacturers of such department of defense
drone technology: Provided further, That, national institute for aviation
research shall include specific recommendations to Kansas state
university Salina for the creation of a purple UAS public safety and
commercial credentialing process: And provided further, That
expenditures in an amount of not less than $500,000 shall be made by
the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide
a grant to Kansas state university Salina to create a purple UAS public
safety and commercial credentialing process for credentialing drones
for commercial and public safety use: Provided, however, That if such
expenditures are not expended by January 1, 2026, on such date, any
remaining moneys in such account are hereby lapsed: And provided
further, That the above agency shall prepare and submit a report to the
legislature on the purple UAS public safety and commercial
credentialing process by January 20, 2026.
Statewide marketing campaign for high demand

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 76
and high wage career fields.....................................................$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the statewide marketing campaign for high demand and
high wage career fields account is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026: Provided further, That expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the statewide marketing campaign for high demand and
high wage career fields account for a contract with Level Up Kansas, a
Kansas nonprofit, for the purpose of providing a statewide marketing
campaign to underskilled adult learners about training opportunities
available at Kansas postsecondary educational institutions in high
demand and high wage career fields.
Maintenance, repair and overhaul of airplanes.....................$10,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the maintenance, repair and overhaul of airplanes account
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures in an amount of not less than $10,000,000 shall be made
by the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to
provide for the maintenance, repair and overhaul of airplanes at the
airport in Topeka, Kansas: And provided further, That all expenditures
for the maintenance, repair and overhaul of airplanes at the airport in
Topeka, Kansas shall require a match of local nonstate or private
moneys on a $1-for-$1 basis: Provided, however, That no expenditures
shall be made from such account or matching moneys for site
preparation: And provided further, That the above agency shall make a
determination as to the financial feasibility of any maintenance, repair
and overhaul project proposed by the metropolitan Topeka airport
authority prior to any expenditures being made by the above agency
from such account: And provided further, That such determination shall
require the metropolitan Topeka airport authority to provide funding for
the first 50% of the total project cost with local nonstate or private
moneys: And provided further, That the above agency shall review any
pending or signed contracts or lease agreements before expending any
moneys from such account to the metropolitan Topeka airport authority.
Cybersecurity center for excellence........................................$3,000,000
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Kansas semiquincentennial commission support account; housing and
workforce development account; home-based child care providers pilot
program account; sports hall of fame support account; and industrial
park project account.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:
Operating grant (including
official hospitality) (300-00-1900-1110).................................$9,699,069
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating grant
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further,
That expenditures may be made from the operating grant (including
official hospitality) account for certified development companies that
have been determined to be qualified for grants by the secretary of
commerce, except that expenditures for such grants shall not be made
for grants to more than 10 certified development companies that have
been determined to be qualified for grants by the secretary of
commerce: And provided further, That expenditures shall be made by
the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to submit a
report on economic development incentives by economic development
incentive program that includes the total incentives awarded to each
program and the estimated fiscal impact on the state general fund

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 77
during fiscal year 2026 to the house of representatives committee on
appropriations and the senate committee on ways and means.
Older Kansans employment
program (300-00-1900-1140).....................................................$504,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the older Kansans employment program account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Rural opportunity zones
program (300-00-1900-1150)..................................................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the rural opportunity zones program account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
shall be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal
year 2026 to provide funds to applicants or for use in counties with a
population of 15,000 or less as of the 2020 census.
Senior community service
employment program (300-00-1900-1160)....................................$8,400
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the senior community service employment program
account is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Strong military bases program (300-00-1900-1170)..................$214,023
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the strong military bases program account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Main street program (300-00-1900-1175)..................................$850,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the main street program account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Governor's council of
economic advisors (300-00-1900-1185)....................................$204,500
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the governor's council of economic advisors account is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Creative arts industries
commission (300-00-1900-1188)............................................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the creative arts industries commission account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
shall not be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal
year 2026 to employ persons on a contractual basis in order to ensure
that the maximum amount of dollars may be distributed to Kansas
communities for arts grants: And provided further, That expenditures
shall be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal
year 2026 to award matching grant funds: And provided further, That an
amount of not to exceed 60% of grant moneys shall be awarded to
applicants for matching grant funds located in counties with a
population of 85,000 or less as of the 2020 census: And provided
further, That an amount of not to exceed 40% of grant moneys shall be
awarded to applicants for matching grant funds located in counties with
a population of more than 85,000 as of the 2020 census.
Public broadcasting grants (300-00-1900-1190)........................$500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the public broadcasting grants account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Build up Kansas (300-00-1900-1230).....................................$2,625,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the build up Kansas account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Community development (300-00-1900-1240).........................$670,000

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 78
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the community development account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
International trade (300-00-1900-1250)..................................$1,445,227
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the international trade account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Reemployment implementation (300-00-1900-1260)..................$99,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the reemployment implementation account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Registered apprenticeship (300-00-1900-1290)......................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the registered apprenticeship account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Small business R&D grants (300-00-1900-1300)......................$500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the small business R&D grants account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Work-based learning (300-00-1900-1310).................................$714,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the work-based learning account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Rural champions (300-00-1900-1320).......................................$150,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the rural champions account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
HEAL grants (300-00-1900-1350)..........................................$1,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the HEAL grants account is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Travel and tourism
operating expenditures (300-00-1900-1901)..........................$4,920,398
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the travel and tourism operating expenditures account is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$4,000.
KIT/KIR programs (300-00-1900-1280)................................$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the KIT/KIR programs account is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Sunflower summer program (300-00-1900-1330)..................$3,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the sunflower summer program account is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That except as
provided further, no expenditures shall be made by the above agency
from such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide reimbursements
or grants to participating venues that do not charge an admission fee to
program participants: Provided further, That the above agency may
provide reimbursements to participating venues that do not charge an
admission to program participants that are located in a county with a
population of 15,000 or less as of the 2020 census: And provided
further, That no expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide reimbursement for
more than one person who is 18 years of age or older accompanying
one or more persons under 18 years of age
Rural remote workplaces........................................................$1,000,000
Semiquincentennial preparation...................................................$73,000

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 79
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Kansas creative arts industries commission
checkoff fund (300-00-2031-2031).............................................No limit
Publication and other sales fund (300-00-2048)..........................No limit
Conference registration and
disbursement fund (300-00-2049)...............................................No limit
IMPACT program services fund (300-00-2176).........................No limit
AJLA special revenue fund (300-00-2190-2190)........................No limit
Reimbursement and recovery fund (300-00-2275)......................No limit
General fees fund (300-00-2310)................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund
for loans pursuant to loan agreements, which are hereby authorized to
be entered into by the secretary of commerce in accordance with
repayment provisions and other terms and conditions as may be
prescribed by the secretary therefor under programs of the department.
Indirect cost – federal fund (300-00-2340-2300)........................No limit
Enterprise facilitation fund (300-00-2378-2710).........................No limit
Publication and other
sales fund (300-00-2399-2399)...................................................No limit
Provided, That in addition to other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the
publication and other sales fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may
be made from such fund for the purpose of compensating federal aid
program expenditures, if necessary, in order to comply with the
requirements established by the United States fish and wildlife service
for utilization of federal aid funds: Provided further, That all such
expenditures shall be in addition to any expenditures made from the
publication and other sales fund for fiscal year 2026: And provided
further, That the secretary of commerce shall report all such
expenditures to the governor and legislature as appropriate.
Conversion of equipment and
materials fund (300-00-2411-2220).............................................No limit
Job creation program fund (300-00-2467-2467).........................No limit
Kan-grow engineering
fund – KU (300-00-2494-2494)..............................................$3,500,000
Kan-grow engineering
fund – KSU (300-00-2494-2495)............................................$3,500,000
Kan-grow engineering
fund – WSU (300-00-2494-2496)...........................................$3,500,000
Athletic fee fund (300-00-2599-2500)........................................No limit
Governor's council of economic advisers private
operations fund (300-00-2761-2701)...........................................No limit
Technology-enabled fiduciary financial
institutions development and
expansion fund (300-00-2839)....................................................No limit
Kansas educator registered apprenticeship grant
program fund (300-00-2856).......................................................No limit
Kansas nonprofit apprenticeship grant
program fund (300-00-2873).......................................................No limit
Existing horse racing facility remodel fund (300-00-2884)........No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the existing horse racing facility
remodel fund shall be made by the above agency for a grant to remodel
an existing horse racing facility in a Kansas county with a population
between 6,000 and 6,100 as of the 2020 census.
Northwest Kansas housing economic development fund (300-00-2886)

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 80
.....................................................................................................No limit
Engineering graduate incentive fund (300-00-2930)...................No limit
Attracting professional sports to
Kansas fund (300-00-2942).........................................................No limit
Attracting powerful economic expansion
payroll incentive fund (300-00-2943)..........................................No limit
Attracting powerful economic expansion
new employee training and
education fund (300-00-2944).....................................................No limit
Attracting powerful economic expansion Kansas
residency incentive fund (300-00-2945)......................................No limit
Child care/development block grant –
federal fund (300-00-3028-3028)................................................No limit
WIOA youth activities –
federal fund (300-00-3039).........................................................No limit
Senior community service employment program –
federal fund (300-00-3100-3510)................................................No limit
American job link alliance job corps –
federal fund (300-00-3100-3512)................................................No limit
American job link alliance –
federal fund (300-00-3100-3516)................................................No limit
Creative arts industries commission
gifts, grants and bequests –
federal fund (300-00-3210-3218)................................................No limit
Workforce data quality initiative –
federal fund (300-00-3237-3237)................................................No limit
WIOA adult – federal fund (300-00-3270)..................................No limit
Trade adjustment assistance –
federal fund (300-00-3273).........................................................No limit
Local veterans employment representative program –
federal fund (300-00-3274-3240)................................................No limit
Disabled veterans outreach program –
federal fund (300-00-3274-3242)................................................No limit
Wagner Peyser employment services –
federal fund (300-00-3275).........................................................No limit
Unemployment insurance –
federal fund (300-00-3335).........................................................No limit
H-1B technical skills training grant –
federal fund (300-00-3400).........................................................No limit
Economic adjustment assistance fund (300-00-3415).................No limit
WIOA dislocated workers –
federal fund (300-00-3428).........................................................No limit
Work opportunity tax credit –
federal fund (300-00-3447-3447)................................................No limit
Temporary labor certification foreign workers –
federal fund (300-00-3448).........................................................No limit
Transition assistance program grant –
federal fund (300-00-3451-3451)................................................No limit
State small business credit initiative –
federal fund (300-00-3567).........................................................No limit
SBA STEP grant –
federal fund (300-00-3573-3573)................................................No limit
Workforce innovation –
federal fund (300-00-3581).........................................................No limit
Reemployment connections initiative –
federal fund (300-00-3585).........................................................No limit
Community development block grant –
federal fund (300-00-3669).........................................................No limit
Pathway home 2 – federal fund (300-00-3734)...........................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 81
Coronavirus relief fund –
federal fund (300-00-3753).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief –
federal fund (300-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $4,000,000
shall be made by the above agency from such fund during fiscal year
2026 to provide a grant to an airport for technology, terminal, tower
upgrades, heliport, vertiport, hangar and office space to attract e-
aviation unmanned aircraft systems testing or manufacturing to Kansas:
Provided further, That, upon receipt by the above agency of
certification from the KC BioHub that the KC BioHub has received a
federal grant, expenditures in an amount of not less than $1,000,000
shall be made by the above agency from such fund during fiscal year
2026 to match such KC BioHub federal grant: Provided further, That
upon receipt of such certification the above agency shall send a copy to
the director of the budget and the director of legislative research.
World cup ARPA fund (300-00-3756).........................................No limit
Provided, That the above agency shall make expenditures from the
world cup ARPA fund during fiscal year 2026 to require the FIFA world
cup 26 Kansas City committee to provide a detailed accounting report
of all expenditures of the moneys in such account to the legislature on
or before January 12, 2026.
ARPA capital projects-broadband
infrastructure – federal fund (300-00-3761)................................No limit
ARPA capital projects-digital technology
connectivity – federal fund (300-00-3761)..................................No limit
RETAIN extension –
federal fund (300-00-3770).........................................................No limit
State broadband data development grant –
federal fund (300-00-3782-3700)................................................No limit
Second chance grant –
federal fund (300-00-3895).........................................................No limit
State digital equity planning grant
program fund (300-00-3927-3927)..............................................No limit
Broadband equity access and deployment
program fund (300-00-3928-3928)..............................................No limit
Apprenticeship USA state –
federal fund (300-00-3949).........................................................No limit
Kansas health profession opportunity project –
federal fund (300-00-3951).........................................................No limit
Kansas creative arts industries commission special
gifts fund (300-00-7004-7004)....................................................No limit
Kansas commission for the United States
semiquincentennial gifts and
donations fund (300-00-7019).....................................................No limit
National main street
center fund (300-00-7325-7000).................................................No limit
IMPACT program repayment fund (300-00-7388).....................No limit
Kansas partnership fund (300-00-7525-7020).............................No limit
Broadband technical
assistance fund (300-00-3807-3807)...........................................No limit
Middle mile broadband
grant fund (300-00-3932-3932)...................................................No limit
Rural community development initiatives
federal fund (300-00-3674).........................................................No limit
Office of broadband development fund..................................$1,091,250
(d) The secretary of commerce is hereby authorized to fix, charge
and collect fees during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for: (1)
The provision and administration of conferences held for the purposes

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 82
of programs and activities of the department of commerce and for
which fees are not specifically prescribed by statute; (2) sale of
publications of the department of commerce and for sale of educational
and other promotional items and for which fees are not specifically
prescribed by statute; and (3) promotional and other advertising and
related economic development activities and services provided under
economic development programs and activities of the department of
commerce: Provided, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover
all or part of the operating expenses incurred in providing such
services, conferences, publications and items, advertising and other
economic development activities and services provided under economic
development programs and activities of the department of commerce
for which fees are not specifically prescribed by statute: Provided
further, That all such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to one or more special revenue fund or
funds of the department of commerce as specified by the secretary of
commerce: And provided further, That expenditures may be made from
such special revenue fund or funds of the department of commerce for
fiscal year 2026, in accordance with the provisions of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, for
operating expenses incurred in providing such services, conferences,
publications and items, advertising, programs and activities and for
operating expenses incurred in providing similar economic
development activities and services provided under economic
development programs and activities of the department of commerce.
(e) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the department of commerce from moneys appropriated in
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for the
department of commerce as authorized by this or other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute, expenditures may be made by the
department of commerce from moneys appropriated in any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for official hospitality.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
commerce, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, from the state economic development initiatives fund for the
department of commerce to another item of appropriation for fiscal
year 2026 from the state economic development initiatives fund for the
department of commerce. The secretary of commerce shall certify each
such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 12-17,169, and amendments thereto, or any
other statute to the contrary, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made from such moneys for the secretary of
commerce to approve a city or county to finance a rural redevelopment
project, as defined in K.S.A. 12-17,162, and amendments thereto,
without the issuance of special obligation bonds up to an amount of not
to exceed $25,000,000 for each such project: Provided, That such rural
redevelopment project costs shall be made payable, both as to principal
and interest, from any source as provided in K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)(1)(A)
through (I), and amendments thereto.
(h) (1) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 83
notwithstanding the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act,
K.S.A. 12-17,160 through 12-17,180, and amendments thereto, or any
other statute to the contrary, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made from such moneys for the secretary of
commerce to approve a STAR bond project for a major amusement
park or historic theater: Provided, That such approval shall be upon
adoption of a STAR bond project plan and establishment of a STAR
bond project district by a city or county for such major amusement park
project or historic theater in accordance with K.S.A. 12-17,164 through
12-17,166, and amendments thereto: Provided further, That such major
amusement park project or historic theater shall be eligible for
financing by special obligation bonds payable from revenues described
by K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That such city or county is authorized to issue such special
obligation bonds in one or more series to finance the undertaking of
such major amusement park project or historic theater in accordance
with the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act: And provided
further, That the secretary of commerce may authorize the Kansas
development finance authority to issue special obligation bonds in one
or more series to finance the undertaking of such major amusement
park project or historic theater: And provided further, That during fiscal
year 2026, the Kansas development finance authority is hereby
authorized to issue such special obligation bonds in accordance with
K.S.A. 74-8905(a), and amendments thereto, subject to the provisions
of this subsection: And provided further, That such special obligation
bonds and interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas
development finance authority and shall not constitute a debt of the
state of Kansas within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the
constitution of the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and
credit or the taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further,
That such special obligation bonds shall be made payable, both as to
principal and interest, solely from the revenues described in K.S.A. 12-
17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto: And provided further, That the
secretary shall review the STAR bond project plan and determine
whether to approve such plan in accordance with K.S.A. 12-17,167,
and amendments thereto: And provided further, That any special
obligation bonds issued to finance the major amusement park project or
historic theater shall be subject to the provisions of the STAR bonds
financing act: And provided further, That such major amusement park
and historic theater costs shall be considered project costs for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-17,162, and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That a major amusement park area shall be considered an
eligible area for purposes of K.S.A. 12-17,162, and amendments
thereto: And provided further, That all such property included in, added
to or removed from the STAR bond project district established pursuant
to this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of the STAR bonds
financing act: And provided further, That if such major amusement park
project or historic theater uses state sales tax financing pursuant to
K.S.A. 12-17,169, and amendments thereto, such project shall be
subject to the requirements of K.S.A. 12-17,176, and amendments
thereto: And provided further, That in the event that the city or county
shall default in the payment of any STAR bonds payable from revenues
described in K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto, no
public funds shall be used to pay the holders thereof except as
specifically authorized by the STAR bonds financing act: And provided

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 84
further, That copies of all retailers' sales, use and transient guest tax
returns filed with the secretary of revenue in connection with such
major amusement park project shall be subject to the provisions of
K.S.A. 12-17,174, and amendments thereto.
(2) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) "Amusement rides" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 44-
1601, and amendments thereto, and includes such amusement rides and
further include buildings necessary to house and operate such
amusement park rides, buildings immediately adjacent and attached to
such amusement park rides and a building necessary to house a
conference center within the major amusement park area.
(B) "Major amusement park" means a project with amusement
rides and related attractions and upon which the secretary has made a
finding that capital improvements of not less than $100,000,000 will be
built in the state to construct the major amusement park.
(C) "Major amusement park area" means an area containing a
major amusement park.
(i) (1) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
notwithstanding the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act,
K.S.A. 12-17,160 through 12-17,180, and amendments thereto, or any
other statute, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 for the
secretary of commerce to authorize the Kansas development finance
authority to issue special obligation bonds in one or more series to
finance the undertaking of a STAR bond project as defined in K.S.A.
12-17,162(aa)(1), and amendments thereto, or a mall STAR bond
project, that has been established by a city or county and approved by
the secretary of commerce pursuant to K.S.A. 12-17,164 and 12-
17,167, and amendments thereto: Provided, That during fiscal year
2026, the Kansas development finance authority is hereby authorized to
issue such special obligation bonds in accordance with K.S.A. 74-
8905(a), and amendments thereto, subject to the provisions of this
subsection: Provided further, That such special obligation bonds and
interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development
finance authority and shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas
within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of
the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the
taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further, That such
special obligation bonds shall be made payable, both as to principal and
interest, solely from the revenues described in K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)(1),
and amendments thereto: And provided further, That the governing
body of a city or county may establish one or more STAR bond projects
for the purpose of the redevelopment of a mall facility in accordance
with the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act, K.S.A. 12-17,160
et seq., and amendments thereto: And provided further, That the
secretary of commerce shall review the STAR bond project plan and
determine whether to approve such plan in accordance with this
subsection and the STAR bonds financing act: And provided further,
That a mall STAR bond project may be located in a newly created mall
STAR bond project district or in an existing STAR bond project
district: And provided further, That any mall STAR bond project
approved by a city or county and the secretary in accordance with the
STAR bonds financing act shall be eligible for financing by special
obligation bonds payable from revenues described by K.S.A. 12-
17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto, which revenues may include

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 85
100% of the tax increment revenue received: And provided further, That
any special obligation bonds issued to finance a mall STAR bond
project shall be subject to the provisions of the STAR bonds financing
act: And provided further, That in the event that the city or county shall
default in the payment of any STAR bonds payable from revenues
described in K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto, no
public funds shall be used to pay the holders thereof except as
specifically authorized by the STAR bonds financing act: And provided
further, That any bonds issued may pay for any or all amounts of the
overall project costs and shall not be limited to payment of only a
certain percentage of total project costs for such mall STAR bond
project: And provided further, That project costs for a mall STAR bond
project include: (A) All costs necessary to implement a project plan for
the redevelopment of a mall STAR bond project district, including costs
incurred for infrastructure and utilities, the acquisition of personal
property related thereto and any other related expenses necessary to
develop and finance such mall facility; and (B) costs incurred for the
construction or renovation of interior and exterior structures, parking
facilities and multi-level parking structures if: (i) The project is a large
metropolitan mall STAR bond project and the project application is
received by the secretary on or before December 31, 2025; or (ii) the
project is a rural mall STAR bond project, the project includes a sports
or entertainment tourism component or an education tourism
component such as a museum or other educational facility and the
project application is received by the secretary on or before December
31, 2025: Provided, however, That such costs shall not be permitted for
any future expansion of the large metropolitan mall STAR bond project
district: And provided further, That a mall facility shall be considered an
eligible area for purposes of K.S.A. 12-17,162, and amendments
thereto: And provided further, That on or before June 30, 2026, the
secretary shall report to the legislature verifying and tracking visitors
and disclose the method of visitor tracking and the visitor tracking data
compiled for compliance with the visitation requirements.
(2) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) "Large metropolitan mall STAR bond project" means a project
that the secretary finds meets the following criteria:
(i) The project has the primary purpose of sports or entertainment
tourism that will draw at least 30% of the project's visitors from a
distance of at least 100 miles and at least 20% of the project's visitors
from outside this state;
(ii) the project is located in an area of a city or community
experiencing economic decline. The secretary shall determine
economic decline by the analysis of at least two measurable indicators
over the most recent 10-year period for which data is available,
including, but not limited to, a decline in real gross domestic product,
decline in average household real income, decreased employment or
reductions in industrial production or retail sales;
(iii) the project has a minimum of $50,000,000 in capital
investment and $50,000,000 in projected gross annual sales; and
(iv) no previous application for a mall redevelopment project
within the same county has been approved by the secretary.
(B) "Mall" means an enclosed area comprised of multiple interior-
facing businesses and stores primarily devoted to the in-person retail
sale of goods and services and the parking, green space and arterial
roads contiguous thereto.
(C) "Mall facility" means an area containing a mall that is located
within the state of Kansas.
(D) "Mall STAR bond project" means an approved large
metropolitan mall STAR bond project or rural mall STAR bond project

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 86
to implement one or more project plans for the redevelopment of a mall
STAR bond project district that contains a mall in which 50% or more
of the total leasable area for businesses to operate in the mall is
unoccupied.
(E) "Mall STAR bond project district" means the specific area
declared to be an eligible area as determined by the secretary that will
include a mall STAR bond project.
(F) "Rural mall STAR bond project" means a project that the
secretary finds meets the following criteria:
(i) The project is within a metropolitan area with a population of
50,000 through 75,000 or outside a metropolitan area with a population
of at least 50,000 as of the 2020 census;
(ii) the project will draw at least 20% of the project's visitors from
a distance of at least 100 miles;
(iii) the project is located in an area of a city or community
experiencing economic decline as determined by the secretary using the
measures and analysis as provided by subparagraph (A)(ii);
(iv) no previous application for a mall redevelopment project
within the same county has been approved by the secretary; and
(v) the project application is received by the secretary on or before
December 31, 2025.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act, K.S.A. 12-17,160
through 12-17,180, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, in
addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by
the above agency from moneys appropriated from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as
authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 for the secretary of
commerce to approve vertical construction of any project within an
approved STAR bond project district in cities with a population under
60,000 as of the 2020 census, if such approval is granted prior to
December 31, 2025.
(k) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act, K.S.A. 12-17,160
through 12-17,180, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, in
addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by
the above agency from moneys appropriated from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as
authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 for the secretary of
commerce to approve a project that will enhance the quality of life in
the community and the region and is in a county with a population
under 100,000 as of the 2020 census within the Kansas City or Wichita
metropolitan statistical areas, of regional importance and with capital
investment of at least $3,000,000 as a rural redevelopment project for
purposes of the STAR bonds financing act: Provided, however, That the
secretary shall not approve such rural redevelopment project unless the
secretary finds that such project will draw at least 20% of the project's
visitors from a distance of at least 100 miles: Provided further, That on
or before June 30, 2026, the secretary shall report to the legislature
verifying and tracking visitors and disclose the method of visitor
tracking and the visitor tracking data compiled for compliance with the
visitation requirements.
(l) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $5,000,000 from the
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief – federal fund (252-00-3756)

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 87
of the governor's department to the American rescue plan state relief –
federal fund (300-00-3756) of the department of commerce.
(m) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $7,000,000 from the state general fund to the attracting
powerful economic expansion payroll incentive fund (300-00-2943)
established by K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-50,316, and amendments thereto.
(n) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $3,000,000 from the state general fund to the attracting
powerful economic expansion new employee training and education
fund (300-00-2944) established by K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-50,318, and
amendments thereto.
(o) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $800,000 from the state general fund to the attracting powerful
economic expansion residency incentive fund (300-00-2945)
established by K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-50,323, and amendments thereto.
(p) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,091,250 from the
broadband infrastructure construction grant fund (276-00-2836-2836)
of the department of transportation to the office of broadband
development fund of the department of commerce.
Sec. 77.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
(a) (1) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
notwithstanding the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act,
K.S.A. 12-17,160 through 12-17,180, and amendments thereto, or any
other statute to the contrary, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2027 as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made from such moneys for the secretary of
commerce to approve a STAR bond project for a major amusement
park or historic theater: Provided, That such approval shall be upon
adoption of a STAR bond project plan and establishment of a STAR
bond project district by a city or county for such major amusement park
project or historic theater in accordance with K.S.A. 12-17,164 through
12-17,166, and amendments thereto: Provided further, That such major
amusement park project or historic theater shall be eligible for
financing by special obligation bonds payable from revenues described
by K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That such city or county is authorized to issue such special
obligation bonds in one or more series to finance the undertaking of
such major amusement park project or historic theater in accordance
with the provisions of the STAR bonds financing act: And provided
further, That the secretary of commerce may authorize the Kansas
development finance authority to issue special obligation bonds in one
or more series to finance the undertaking of such major amusement
park project or historic theater: And provided further, That during fiscal
year 2027, the Kansas development finance authority is hereby
authorized to issue such special obligation bonds in accordance with
K.S.A. 74-8905(a), and amendments thereto, subject to the provisions
of this subsection: And provided further, That such special obligation
bonds and interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas
development finance authority and shall not constitute a debt of the
state of Kansas within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the
constitution of the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and
credit or the taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further,
That such special obligation bonds shall be made payable, both as to
principal and interest, solely from the revenues described in K.S.A. 12-

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 88
17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto: And provided further, That the
secretary shall review the STAR bond project plan and determine
whether to approve such plan in accordance with K.S.A. 12-17,167,
and amendments thereto: And provided further, That any special
obligation bonds issued to finance the major amusement park project or
historic theater shall be subject to the provisions of the STAR bonds
financing act: And provided further, That such major amusement park
and historic theater costs shall be considered project costs for the
purposes of K.S.A. 12-17,162, and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That a major amusement park area shall be considered an
eligible area for purposes of K.S.A. 12-17,162, and amendments
thereto: And provided further, That all such property included in, added
to or removed from the STAR bond project district established pursuant
to this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of the STAR bonds
financing act: And provided further, That if such major amusement park
project or historic theater uses state sales tax financing pursuant to
K.S.A. 12-17,169, and amendments thereto, such project shall be
subject to the requirements of K.S.A. 12-17,176, and amendments
thereto: And provided further, That in the event that the city or county
shall default in the payment of any STAR bonds payable from revenues
described in K.S.A. 12-17,169(a)(1), and amendments thereto, no
public funds shall be used to pay the holders thereof except as
specifically authorized by the STAR bonds financing act: And provided
further, That copies of all retailers' sales, use and transient guest tax
returns filed with the secretary of revenue in connection with such
major amusement park project shall be subject to the provisions of
K.S.A. 12-17,174, and amendments thereto.
(2) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) "Amusement rides" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 44-
1601, and amendments thereto, and includes such amusement rides and
further include buildings necessary to house and operate such
amusement park rides, buildings immediately adjacent and attached to
such amusement park rides and a building necessary to house a
conference center within the major amusement park area.
(B) "Major amusement park" means a project with amusement
rides and related attractions and upon which the secretary has made a
finding that capital improvements of not less than $100,000,000 will be
built in the state to construct the major amusement park.
(C) "Major amusement park area" means an area containing a
major amusement park.
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2027 as authorized by this
or any other appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026 regular session of
the legislature, expenditures shall be made from such moneys for the
secretary of commerce to submit a report on economic development
incentives by economic development incentive program that includes
the total incentives awarded to each program and the estimated fiscal
impact on the state general fund during fiscal year 2027 to the house of
representatives committee on appropriations and the senate committee
on ways and means.
Sec. 78.
KANSAS HOUSING RESOURCES CORPORATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 89
State housing trust fund (175-00-7370-7000).............................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the state housing trust fund shall
be made by the Kansas housing resources corporation for the purposes
of administering and supporting housing programs of the Kansas
housing resources corporation as authorized by K.S.A. 74-8959, and
amendments thereto, and this section: Provided further, That of the
moneys appropriated in the state housing trust fund and identified as
moneys for the rural housing revolving loan program, as authorized by
section 28 of chapter 81 of the 2022 Session Laws of Kansas, or
identified as moneys for the housing revolving loan program, as
authorized by section 77 of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws of
Kansas, expenditures may be made by the above agency from such
identified moneys in such fund for fiscal year 2026 for loans to a local
unit of government, political subdivision of the state, not-for-profit
organizations focused on housing development, for-profit or not-for-
profit builder or developer for moderate and low-income housing
development, including infrastructure necessary to support such
development: And provided further, That at least 50% of such
expenditures shall be used in rural communities: And provided further,
That, notwithstanding the provisions of any statute to the contrary, a
local government or political subdivision of the state is hereby
authorized to enter into loan agreements under this program: And
provided further, That the provisions and restrictions of the cash basis
and budget laws of this state shall not apply to any loan received by a
local government or political subdivision under this program: And
provided further, That notwithstanding the provisions of any statute, the
interest rate for a loan to any not-for-profit organization focused on
housing development shall be equal to the average interest rate of
certificates of deposit in Kansas financial institutions in June 2025, as
determined by the state treasurer.
Sec. 79.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $4,085,256 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 73(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the operating expenditures account (296-00-
1000-0503), $936,574 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 73(b) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the workmen's
compensation fee fund (296-00-2124) of the department of labor is
hereby increased from $13,158,378 to $13,326,791.
Sec. 80.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (296-00-1000-0503)..........................$4,232,799
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That in addition
to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from this account for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
expenditures may be made from this account for the costs incurred for
court reporting under K.S.A. 72-2218 et seq. and 75-4321 et seq., and
amendments thereto: And provided further, That expenditures from this
account for official hospitality by the secretary of labor shall not exceed
$5,000.
Amusement ride safety (296-00-1000-0513).............................$286,519
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the amusement ride

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 90
safety account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Unemployment insurance modernization (296-00-1000-0520)
.................................................................................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the unemployment
insurance modernization account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Department of labor special
projects fund (296-00-2041-2105)...............................................No limit
Special employment
security fund (296-00-2120-2000)...............................................No limit
Workmen's compensation
fee fund (296-00-2124).........................................................$12,908,874
Wage claims assignment
fee fund (296-00-2204-2240)......................................................No limit
Amusement ride safety fund (296-00-2224-2250)......................No limit
Federal indirect cost
offset fund (296-00-2302-2280)..................................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 44‐716a,
and amendments thereto, or any other statute during fiscal year 2026,
the secretary of labor, with the approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer from the special employment security fund of the
department of labor to the department of labor federal indirect cost
offset fund the portion of such amount that is determined necessary to
be in compliance with the employment security law: Provided further,
That, upon approval of any such transfer by the director of the budget,
notification shall be provided to the director of legislative research
department.
Dispute resolution fund (296-00-2587-2270)..............................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received by the secretary of labor for
reimbursement of expenditures for the costs incurred for mediation
under K.S.A. 72-2232, and amendments thereto, and for fact-finding
under K.S.A. 72-2233, and amendments thereto, shall be deposited in
the state treasury and credited to the dispute resolution fund: Provided
further, That expenditures may be made from this fund to pay the costs
incurred for mediation under K.S.A. 72-2232, and amendments thereto,
and for fact-finding under K.S.A. 72-2233, and amendments thereto,
subject to full reimbursement therefor by the board of education and the
professional employees' organization involved in such mediation and
fact-finding procedures.
Indirect cost fund (296-00-2781-2781).......................................No limit
Employment services Wagner-Peyser funded
activities federal fund (296-00-3275-3275).................................No limit
Employment security
administration fund (296-00-3335).............................................No limit
Occupational health and safety –
federal fund (296-00-3339-3210)................................................No limit
Labor force statistics
federal fund (296-00-3742-3742)................................................No limit
Compensation and working conditions
federal fund (296-00-3743-3743)................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (296-00-3753).......................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (296-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 91
KDOL off-budget fund (296-00-6112-6100)...............................No limit
Employment security fund
benefit account (296-00-7054-7000)...........................................No limit
Employment security fund
clearing account (296-00-7055-7100).........................................No limit
Employment security fund (296-00-7056-7200).........................No limit
Employment security fund
trust account (296-00-7056-7200)...............................................No limit
Employment security fund – special
suspense account (296-00-7057-7300)........................................No limit
Special wage payment clearing
trust fund (296-00-7362-7500)....................................................No limit
Kansas sheltered workshop
transition fund (296-00-2895-2895)............................................No limit
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 44-703, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds of the
above agency for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys for
fiscal year 2026 to consider an individual as temporarily unemployed
for purposes of K.S.A. 44-703(ii), and amendments thereto, if such
individual is covered by a collective bargaining agreement and has
been laid off due to lack of work by an employing unit for which the
individual has most recently worked full time and for which the
individual reasonably expects to resume full-time work at a future date
within six months: Provided, That such period of temporary
unemployment designation shall not exceed six months: Provided
further, That the provisions of K.S.A. 44-703(ii), and amendments
thereto, concerning resuming full-time work at a future date within
eight weeks shall not apply to such individuals covered by a collective
bargaining agreement: And provided further, That such individuals shall
not be required to look for work and enroll in the my reemployment
plan during such six-month period of temporary unemployment:
Provided, however, That such individuals shall be eligible for only eight
weeks of temporary unemployment benefits.
Sec. 81.
KANSAS OFFICE OF VETERANS SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures –
administration (694-00-1000-0103)........................................$1,438,667
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures – administration account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operating expenditures –
veteran services (694-00-1000-0203).....................................$1,831,756
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures – veteran services account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided,
however, That expenditures from this account for official hospitality
shall not exceed $2,500.
Operating expenditures – Kansas
soldiers' home (694-00-1000-0403)........................................$4,736,348
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures – Kansas soldiers' home account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 92
Operating expenditures – Kansas
veterans' home (694-00-1000-0503).......................................$5,208,455
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures – Kansas veterans' home account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operations – state
veterans cemeteries (694-00-1000-0703)................................$1,046,822
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operations – state
veterans cemeteries account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,500.
Veterans claim assistance program –
service grants (694-00-1000-0903).........................................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the veterans claim
assistance program – service grants account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided
further, That expenditures from the veterans claim assistance program –
service grants account shall be made only for the purpose of awarding
service grants to veterans service organizations for the purpose of
aiding veterans in obtaining federal benefits: Provided, however, That
no expenditures shall be made by the Kansas office of veterans services
from the veterans claim assistance program – service grants account for
operating expenditures or overhead for administering the grants in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 73-1234, and amendments
thereto.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Veterans' home fee fund (694-00-2236-2200).............................No limit
Soldiers' home fee fund (694-00-2241-2100)..............................No limit
Veterans benefit lottery
game fund (694-00-2303)............................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the veterans benefit lottery game
fund shall be in an amount equal to 50% for operating expenditures and
capital improvements of the above agency, or for the use and benefit of
the Kansas veterans' home, the Kansas soldiers' home and the state
veterans cemetery system; and 50% for the veterans enhanced service
delivery program.
State veterans cemeteries
fee fund (694-00-2332-2600)......................................................No limit
Soldiers' home
medicaid fund (694-00-2464-2464).............................................No limit
Veterans' home
medicaid fund (694-00-2469-2469).............................................No limit
Construction state home
facilities fund (694-00-3018-3000).............................................No limit
State cemetery grants fund (694-00-3048)..................................No limit
Kansas soldier home construction
grant fund (694-00-3075)............................................................No limit
Soldiers' home
medicare fund (694-00-3168-3100).............................................No limit
VA burial reimbursement
fund – federal (694-00-3212-3310).............................................No limit
Veterans' home federal domiciliary per
diem fund (694-00-3220-3220)...................................................No limit
Soldiers' home federal domiciliary per

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 93
diem fund (694-00-3220-3225)...................................................No limit
Veterans' home federal long-term care per
diem fund (694-00-3232-3232)...................................................No limit
Soldiers' home federal long-term care per
diem fund (694-00-3232-3242)...................................................No limit
Commission on veterans affairs federal fund (694-00-3241-3340).....No
limit
SAA administration fund (694-00-3241-3341)...........................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (694-00-3753).......................................No limit
CARES provider relief fund (694-00-3754)................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (694-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
Veterans' home
medicare fund (694-00-3893-3893).............................................No limit
Kansas hometown
heroes fund (694-00-7003-7001).................................................No limit
Vietnam war era veterans' recognition
award fund (694-00-7017-7000).................................................No limit
State veterans cemeteries donations and
contributions fund (694-00-7308-5200)......................................No limit
(c) (1) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 73-1231, 73-1233, 75-3728g,
76-1906 or 76-1953, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the
director of the Kansas office of veterans services, with the approval of
the director of the budget, may transfer moneys that are credited to a
special revenue fund of the Kansas office of veterans services to
another special revenue fund of the Kansas office of veterans services.
The director of the Kansas office of veterans services shall certify each
such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(2) As used in this subsection, "special revenue fund" means the
soldiers' home fee fund (694-00-2241-2100), veterans' home fee fund
(694-00-2236-2200), soldiers' home outpatient clinic fund (694-00-
2258-2300), soldiers' home benefit fund (694-00-7903-5400), soldiers'
home work therapy fund (694-00-7951-5600), veterans' home canteen
fund (694-00-7809-5300), veterans' home benefit fund (694-00-7904-
5500), Persian Gulf war veterans health initiative fund (694-00-2304-
2500), state veterans cemeteries fee fund (694-00-2332-2600), state
veterans cemeteries donations and contributions fund (694-00-7308-
5200) and Kansas veterans memorials fund (694-00-7332-5210).
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas office of veterans services, with the approval of the director of
the budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the
Kansas office of veterans services or any institution or facility under
the general supervision and management of the Kansas office of
veterans services to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state general fund for the Kansas office of veterans services or
any institution or facility under the general supervision and
management of the Kansas office of veterans services. The director of
the Kansas office of veterans services shall certify each such transfer to
the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each
such certification to the director of legislative research.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas office of veterans services, with the approval of the director of
the budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the
Kansas office of veterans services to the Vietnam war era veterans'
recognition award fund (694-00-7017-7000). The director of the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 94
Kansas office of veterans services shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas office of veterans services, with the approval of the director of
the budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the state institutions building
fund for the Kansas office of veterans services or any institution or
facility under the general supervision and management of the Kansas
office of veterans services to another item of appropriation for fiscal
year 2026 from the state institutions building fund for the Kansas office
of veterans services or any institution or facility under the general
supervision and management of the Kansas office of veterans services.
The director of the Kansas office of veterans services shall certify each
such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(g) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,260,000 from the
lottery operating fund (450-00-5123-5100) of the Kansas lottery to the
veterans benefit lottery game fund (694-00-2303-2303) of the Kansas
office of veterans services.
Sec. 82.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF PUBLIC HEALTH
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $5,940,415 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 77(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) account (264-00-1000-0202), $1,386,165 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $8,249,202
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 77(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the aid to local units account
(264-00-1000-0350), $10,419 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $18,750,690
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 77(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the aid to local units – primary
health projects account (264-00-1000-0460), $583,120 is hereby
lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, of the amount of moneys
appropriated and reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, by section 77(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024
Session Laws of Kansas from the state general fund in the lab
equipment replacement account (264-00-1000-0800), the sum of
$429,385 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 83.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF PUBLIC HEALTH
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) (264-00-1000-0202).............................................$6,103,147
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That expenditures in an amount of not less than
$250,000 shall be made by the above agency from such account during
fiscal year 2026 to provide for efforts to control and prevent

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 95
transmission of tuberculosis or other infectious and contagious diseases
as designated by the secretary of health and environment pursuant to
K.S.A. 65-128, and amendments thereto, including screening, diagnosis
and treatment.
Operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) – health (264-00-1000-0270)...............................$8,902,080
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) – health account in excess
of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year
2026: Provided further, That expenditures in an amount of not to
exceed $96,000 shall be made by the above agency from such account
for fiscal year 2026 to provide for efforts to control and prevent
transmission of tuberculosis, including screening, diagnosis and
treatment.
Aid to local units (264-00-1000-0350)...................................$8,249,202
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aid to local units
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That, except as provided in
subsection (k), all expenditures from this account for state financial
assistance to local health departments shall be in accordance with the
formula prescribed by K.S.A. 65-241 through 65-246, and amendments
thereto.
Aid to local units – primary
health projects (264-00-1000-0460)......................................$18,750,690
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aid to local units –
primary health projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
prescription support expenditures shall be made from the aid to local
units – primary health projects account for: (1) Purchasing drug
inventory under section 340B of the federal public health service act for
community health center grantees and federally qualified health center
look-alikes who qualify; (2) increasing access to prescription drugs by
subsidizing a portion of the costs for the benefit of patients at section
340B participating clinics on a sliding fee scale; and (3) expanding
access to prescription medication assistance programs by making
expenditures to support operating costs of assistance programs: And
provided further, That funded clinics shall be not-for-profit or publicly
funded primary care clinics or dental clinics, including federally
qualified community health centers and federally qualified community
health center look-alikes, as defined by 42 U.S.C. § 330, that provide
comprehensive primary healthcare or dental services, offer sliding fee
discounts based upon household income and serve any person
regardless of ability to pay and have a unique patient panel that, at a
minimum, represents the income-based disparities of the community:
And provided further, That policies determining patient eligibility due
to income or insurance status may be determined by each community
but must be clearly documented and posted: And provided further, That
of the moneys appropriated in the aid to local units – primary health
projects account, not less than $18,750,690 shall be distributed for
community-based primary care grants and services provided by the
community care network of Kansas.
Infant and toddler program (264-00-1000-0570)....................$9,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the infant and toddler
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from the infant and toddler program account in the
amount of $8,000,000 for the purposes of aid to local units and other
assistance: And provided further, That such moneys shall not be

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 96
expended for administrative costs incurred by the above agency: And
provided further, That expenditures of at least $1,500,000 shall be made
from such account to provide early childhood vision services for
children served by the Kansas state school for the blind.
Aid to local units –
women's wellness (264-00-1000-0610).....................................$444,296
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aid to local units –
women's wellness account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all
expenditures from the aid to local units – women's wellness account
shall be in accordance with grant agreements entered into by the
secretary of health and environment and grant recipients.
Teen pregnancy
prevention activities (264-00-1000-0650).................................$338,846
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the teen pregnancy
prevention activities account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Lyme disease prevention and research (264-00-1000-0670).....$140,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the lyme disease
prevention and research account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Tobacco cessation program (264-00-1000-0680)......................$938,756
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the tobacco cessation
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Lab equipment replacement (264-00-1000-0800).....................$280,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the lab equipment
replacement account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Vaccine purchases (264-00-1000-0900).....................................$329,607
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the vaccine purchases
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Pregnancy maintenance
initiative (264-00-1000-1100)....................................................$677,692
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the pregnancy
maintenance initiative account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Breast cancer
screening program (264-00-1000-1300).................................$1,219,336
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the breast cancer
screening program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Immunization programs (264-00-1000-1400)...........................$397,418
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the immunization
programs account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Specialty healthcare access programs (264-00-1000-1450)......$550,000
Cerebral palsy
posture seating (264-00-1000-1500)..........................................$303,537
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the cerebral palsy posture
seating account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made by the above agency from the cerebral palsy posture
seating account for posture seating for adults.
Child abuse review
and evaluation (264-00-1000-1550)...........................................$875,970
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the child abuse review
and evaluation account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 97
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
shall be made from the child abuse review and evaluation program
account to train healthcare providers to recognize signs of child abuse
and reimburse reviews and examinations conducted by such trained
healthcare providers: And provided further, That on or before January
12, 2026, the above agency shall submit a report to the house of
representatives committee on appropriations and the senate committee
on ways and means on services provided and the location of services
provided by the program.
PKU treatment (264-00-1000-1710)..........................................$199,274
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the PKU treatment
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
State trauma fund (264-00-1000-1720)......................................$300,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state trauma fund
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Laboratory (264-00-1000-0290).............................................$3,028,982
Adult inpatient behavioral health services............................$10,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the adult inpatient
behavioral health services account for providing adult inpatient
behavioral health services at AdventHealth Shawnee Mission,
ascension Via Christi St. Joseph campus, Hutchinson regional medical
center, Salina regional health center, Stormont Vail regional medical
center and the university of Kansas health system and such
expenditures shall be distributed based on the number of adult
behavioral health beds available at each facility.
Cerebral palsy research..............................................................$263,000
Donated dental services...............................................................$55,000
Rural community health centers
with primary family medicine
resident educational sites........................................................$1,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such account to the community health center of southeast Kansas and
the Salina health education foundation for support of their rural family
medicine graduate medical education programs.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
KDHE lab (264-00-1000-8750), childcare pilot (264-00-1000-0580),
laboratory move (264-00-1000), specialty healthcare access programs
(264-00-1000-1450).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Kansas newborn
screening fund (264-00-2027-2027)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide for screening tests of
newborns for Krabbe disease and GAMT (Guanidinoacetate
methyltransferase) condition pursuant to the newborn screening
program established in K.S.A. 65-180, and amendments thereto.
Power generating facility
fee fund (264-00-2131-2130)......................................................No limit
Health and environment training
fee fund – health (264-00-2183-2160).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the health and
environment training fee fund – health for acquisition and distribution

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 98
of division of public health program literature and films and for
participation in or conducting training seminars for training employees
of the division of public health of the department of health and
environment, for training recipients of state aid from the division of
public health of the department of health and environment and for
training representatives of industries affected by rules and regulations
of the department of health and environment relating to the division of
public health: Provided further, That the secretary of health and
environment is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees in
order to recover costs incurred for such acquisition and distribution of
literature and films and for the operation of such seminars: And
provided further, That such fees may be fixed in order to recover all or
part of such costs: And provided further, That all moneys received from
such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the health and environment training fee fund – health: And
provided further, That, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the department of health and
environment for the division of public health from moneys appropriated
from the health and environment training fee fund – health for fiscal
year 2026, expenditures may be made by the department of health and
environment from the health and environment training fee fund – health
for fiscal year 2026 for agency operations for the division of public
health.
Insurance statistical
plan fund (264-00-2243-2840)....................................................No limit
SSA fee fund (264-00-2269-2030)..............................................No limit
Civil registration and health statistics
fee fund (264-00-2291-2295)......................................................No limit
Child care criminal background and
fingerprint fund (264-00-2313-2313)..........................................No limit
Right-to-know
fee fund (264-00-2325-2325)......................................................No limit
Conversion of materials and equipment
fund – health (264-00-2410-2240)..............................................No limit
Nuclear safety emergency preparedness special
revenue fund (264-00-2415-2280)...............................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received by the department of health and
environment – division of public health from the nuclear safety
emergency management fee fund (034-00-2081-2200) of the adjutant
general shall be credited to the nuclear safety emergency preparedness
special revenue fund of the department of health and environment –
division of public health: Provided further, That expenditures from the
nuclear safety emergency preparedness special revenue fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $2,500.
Health facilities review fund (264-00-2505-2250)......................No limit
Trauma fund (264-00-2513-2230)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the department of health
and environment for fiscal year 2026 from the trauma fund of the
department of health and environment – division of public health for
the stroke prevention project: Provided further, That expenditures from
the trauma fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $3,000.
Radiation control operations
fee fund (264-00-2531-2530)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the radiation control operations fee
fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Health and environment publication
fee fund – health (264-00-2541-2190).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the health and environment

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 99
publication fee fund – health shall be made only for the purpose of
paying the expenses of publishing documents as required by K.S.A. 75-
5662, and amendments thereto.
Bicycle helmet revolving fund (264-00-2575-2630)...................No limit
District coroners fund (264-00-2653-2320)................................No limit
Maternity centers and child care facilities licensing
fee fund (264-00-2731-2731)......................................................No limit
Rural hospital innovation
grant fund (264-00-2871-2871)...................................................No limit
Sponsored project overhead
fund – health (264-00-2912-2710)..............................................No limit
Cancer registry federal fund (264-00-3008-3040).......................No limit
Child care and development block grant –
federal fund (264-00-3028-3450)................................................No limit
Office of rural health –
federal fund (264-00-3031-3640)................................................No limit
Hospital preparedness and response program for Ebola –
federal fund (264-00-3033-3033)................................................No limit
Campus sexual assault prevention grant –
federal fund (264-00-3035-3035)................................................No limit
Medicare – federal fund (264-00-3064-3062).............................No limit
Provided, That transfers of moneys from the medicare – federal fund to
the state fire marshal may be made during fiscal year 2026 pursuant to
a contract, which is hereby authorized to be entered into by the
secretary of health and environment and the state fire marshal to
provide fire and safety inspections for hospitals.
Migrant health program –
federal fund (264-00-3069-3070)................................................No limit
Comprehensive STD prevention systems –
federal fund (264-00-3070-3080)................................................No limit
Tuberculosis prevention –
federal fund (264-00-3071-4610)................................................No limit
Women, infants and children health program –
federal fund (264-00-3077-3103)................................................No limit
State implementation projects for prevention
of secondary conditions –
federal fund (264-00-3087-4405)................................................No limit
Hospital preparedness Ebola –
federal fund (264-00-3093-3093)................................................No limit
Kansas public health approaches for
ensuring quitline capacity –
federal fund (264-00-3097-3097)................................................No limit
Kansas vital records for quality improvement –
federal fund (264-00-3098-3098)................................................No limit
Kansas early detection works breast & cervical
cancer screening services –
federal fund (264-00-3099-3099)................................................No limit
Kansas survivor care quality initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3101-3610)................................................No limit
Zika birth defects surveillance & referral –
federal fund (264-00-3102-3620)................................................No limit
Disease control and prevention investigations
and technical assistance –
federal fund (264-00-3150).........................................................No limit
Children's mercy hospital lead program –
federal fund (264-00-3152-3154)................................................No limit
Homeland security grant-KHP –
federal fund (264-00-3199-3199)................................................No limit
Make a difference information network –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 100
federal fund (264-00-3234-3234)................................................No limit
CDC multipurpose grant
federal fund (264-00-3243-3243)................................................No limit
IDEA infant toddler-part C-ARRA –
federal fund (264-00-3282-3282)................................................No limit
SAMHSA project launch intv. –
federal fund (264-00-3284-3284)................................................No limit
Expanding public health
workforce fund (264-00-3287-3287)...........................................No limit
Emergency medical services for children –
federal fund (264-00-3292-3292)................................................No limit
Primary care offices –
federal fund (264-00-3293-3293)................................................No limit
Injury intervention –
federal fund (264-00-3294-3294)................................................No limit
Childhood lead poisoning prevention program –
federal fund (264-00-3296-3296)................................................No limit
Oral health workforce activities –
federal fund (264-00-3297-3297)................................................No limit
Rural hospital flex program –
federal fund (264-00-3298-3298)................................................No limit
Title IV-E – federal fund (264-00-3326-3900)............................No limit
Ryan White title II –
federal fund (264-00-3328-3310)................................................No limit
HIV care formula grant
federal fund (264-00-3328-3311)................................................No limit
Homeland security –
federal fund (264-00-3329-3319)................................................No limit
Plant/animal disease and
pest control (264-00-3360-3539).................................................No limit
HRSA small hospital improvement grant program –
federal fund (264-00-3371-3371) ...............................................No limit
Immunization grant –
federal fund (264-00-3372-3150)................................................No limit
Refugee assistance –
federal fund (264-00-3378-3345)................................................No limit
Small hospital improvement program –
federal fund (264-00-3392-3392)................................................No limit
Refugee health – federal fund (264-00-3393-3393)....................No limit
ARRA – migrant –
federal fund (264-00-3396-3396)................................................No limit
Hospital bioterrorism preparedness –
federal fund (264-00-3398-3398)................................................No limit
HIV/AIDS surveillance –
federal fund (264-00-3399-3399)................................................No limit
Cardiovascular health program –
federal fund (264-00-3401-3407)................................................No limit
Kansas senior farmers market nutrition program –
federal fund (264-00-3406-3406)................................................No limit
Universal newborn hearing screening –
federal fund (264-00-3459-3459)................................................No limit
ARRA – transfer from SRS –
federal fund (264-00-3471-3471)................................................No limit
ARRA ambulatory surgical center ASC/HAI medicare –
federal fund (264-00-3486-3486)................................................No limit
Health information exchange –
federal fund (264-00-3493-3493)................................................No limit
Personal responsibility education program –
federal fund (264-00-3494-3494)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 101
Adult lead surveillance data –
federal fund (264-00-3496-3496)................................................No limit
Medical reserve corps contract –
federal fund (264-00-3502-3502)................................................No limit
Home visiting grant –
federal fund (264-00-3503-3503)................................................No limit
Carbon monoxide detector/fire injury prevention –
federal fund (264-00-3508-3508)................................................No limit
Diagnostic x-ray program –
federal fund (264-00-3511-3160)................................................No limit
Infants & toddlers Prt C –
federal fund (264-00-3516-3171)................................................No limit
Affordable care act – federal fund (264-00-3546-3546).............No limit
Strengthening public health infrastructure –
federal fund (264-00-3547-3547)................................................No limit
Improving minority health –
federal fund (264-00-3548-3548)................................................No limit
Abstinence education –
federal fund (264-00-3549-3549)................................................No limit
Tuberculosis elimination and laboratory –
federal fund (264-00-3559-3559)................................................No limit
Strengthen public health immunization infrastructure –
federal fund (264-00-3568-3568)................................................No limit
Healthy homes and lead poisoning prevention –
federal fund (264-00-3572-3572)................................................No limit
Federal supplemental funding for tobacco prevention
and control – federal fund (264-00-3574-3574)..........................No limit
Coordinated chronic disease prevention
and health promotion program –
federal fund (264-00-3575-3575)................................................No limit
Kansas tobacco control program –
federal fund (264-00-3598-3598)................................................No limit
Colorectal cancer screening –
federal fund (264-00-3599-3599)................................................No limit
Public health crisis response –
federal fund (264-00-3602-3602)................................................No limit
Diabetes & heart disease &
stroke prevention programs –
federal fund (264-00-3603-3603)................................................No limit
Innovative state & local public health
strategies to prevent & manage
diabetes and heart disease and stroke –
federal fund (264-00-3604-3604)................................................No limit
Alzheimer's association inclusion –
federal fund (264-00-3607-3607)................................................No limit
ESSA preschool development grants birth through
five – federal fund (264-00-3608-3608)......................................No limit
Kansas newborn screening information system
maintenance and enhancement
federal fund (264-00-3612-3612)................................................No limit
Preventive health block grant –
federal fund (264-00-3614-3200)................................................No limit
Maternal and child health block grant –
federal fund (264-00-3616-3210)................................................No limit
National center for health statistics –
federal fund (264-00-3617-3220)................................................No limit
Title X family planning services program –
federal fund (264-00-3622-3271)................................................No limit
Lead poisoning preventive health –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 102
federal fund (264-00-3626-4132)................................................No limit
Lifting young families toward excellence
federal fund (264-00-3627-3627)................................................No limit
Adult viral hepatitis prevention and
control fund (264-00-3641-3641)................................................No limit
SHIP COVID testing and
mitigation fund (264-00-3651-3651)...........................................No limit
Drug endangered children in
Kansas fund (264-00-3657-3657)................................................No limit
Solid waste infrastructure for
recycling fund (264-00-3659-3659)............................................No limit
Kansas environmental health capacity
program fund (264-00-3660-3660)..............................................No limit
COVID 19 health
disparities fund (264-00-3683-3683)...........................................No limit
Falls prevention fund (264-00-3704-3704).................................No limit
Self-management ed fund (264-00-3705-3705)..........................No limit
Child care capacity fund (264-00-3713-3713)............................No limit
Maternal deaths due to
violence fund (264-00-3724-3724)..............................................No limit
HIV prevention projects –
federal fund (264-00-3740-3521)................................................No limit
Immunization capacity building assistance –
federal fund (264-00-3744-3744)................................................No limit
ARRA – survey, licensure and epidemiology –
federal fund (264-00-3746-3746)................................................No limit
Immunization and vaccines for children grants –
federal fund (264-00-3747-3741)................................................No limit
Actions to prevent and control diabetes,
heart disease, and obesity –
federal fund (264-00-3749-3742)................................................No limit
ARRA – WIC grants to states –
federal fund (264-00-3750-3750)................................................No limit
Healthy start initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3751-3751)................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (264-00-3753-3753)..............................No limit
Arthritis evidence based interventions –
federal fund (264-00-3755-3756)................................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (264-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
State loan repayment program –
federal fund (264-00-3760-3755)................................................No limit
Census of trauma occp fatal. –
federal fund (264-00-3797-3670)................................................No limit
Opt-out testing initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3801-3801)................................................No limit
Bicycle helmet distribution –
federal fund (264-00-3815-3815)................................................No limit
Community health workers for
COVID response and resilient
communities fund (264-00-3832-3832).......................................No limit
State indoor radon grant –
federal fund (264-00-3884-3930)................................................No limit
Climate pollution reduction
grants fund (264-00-3897-3897).................................................No limit
ARRA collaborative component I –
federal fund (264-00-3890-3891)................................................No limit
ARRA collaborative component III –
federal fund (264-00-3890-3892)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 103
Preventing maternal deaths –
federal fund (264-00-3896-3896)................................................No limit
Adv. health equity for
diabetes fund (264-00-3901-3901)..............................................No limit
Kansas coalition against sexual and domestic violence –
federal fund (264-00-3907-3907)................................................No limit
Kansas actions to improve oral health outcomes –
federal fund (264-00-3921-3921)................................................No limit
Strengthening U.S. public
health fund (264-00-3926-3926).................................................No limit
Expanding COVID-19
vaccination fund (264-00-3931-3931).........................................No limit
WISEWOMAN fund (264-00-3933-3933).................................No limit
KS CCR state permitting
program fund (264-00-3934-3934)..............................................No limit
School-based services (264-00-3935-3935)................................No limit
School-based
data collection (264-00-3936-3936)............................................No limit
Gifts, grants and donations
fund – health (264-00-7311-7090)...............................................No limit
Special bequest fund – health (264-00-7366-7050).....................No limit
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:
Healthcare upskilling training program..................................$1,000,000
(d) On July 1, 2025, and on other occasions during fiscal year
2026, when necessary as determined by the secretary of health and
environment, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts
specified by the secretary of health and environment that constitute
reimbursements, credits and other amounts received by the department
of health and environment for activities related to federal programs
from specified special revenue funds of the department of health and
environment – division of public health or of the department of health
and environment – division of environment to the sponsored project
overhead fund – health (264-00-2912-2715) of the department of health
and environment – division of public health.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or amounts specified by
the secretary of health and environment from any one or more special
revenue funds of the department of health and environment – division
of public health that have available moneys to the sponsored project
overhead fund – health (264-00-2912-2710) of the department of health
and environment – division of public health for expenditures, as the
case may be, for administrative expenses.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the amounts
transferred by the director of accounts and reports from each of the
special revenue funds of the department of health and environment –
division of public health to the sponsored project overhead fund –
health (264-00-2912-2710) of the department of health and
environment – division of public health pursuant to this section may
include amounts not to exceed 25% of the expenditures from such
special revenue fund or funds, excepting expenditures for contractual
services.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
health and environment, with the approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state general fund for the department of health and
environment – division of public health or the department of health and
environment – division of environment to another item of appropriation

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 104
for fiscal year 2026 from the state general fund for the department of
health and environment – division of public health or the department of
health and environment – division of environment. The secretary of
health and environment shall certify each such transfer to the director
of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(h) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the department of health and environment – division of
public health from moneys appropriated from the district coroners fund
(264-00-2653-2320) for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, and
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 22a-245, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made by the
department of health and environment – division of public health from
such moneys appropriated from the district coroners fund of the
department of health and environment – division of public health for
fiscal year 2026 pursuant to K.S.A. 22a-242, and amendments thereto.
(i) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $200,000 from the health care stabilization fund (270-00-7404-
2100) of the health care stabilization fund board of governors to the
health facilities review fund (264-00-2505-2250) of the department of
health and environment – division of public health for the purpose of
financing a review of records of licensed medical care facilities and an
analysis of quality of healthcare services provided to assist in
correcting substandard services and to reduce the incidence of liability
resulting from the rendering of healthcare services and implementing
the risk management provisions of K.S.A. 65-4922 et seq., and
amendments thereto.
(j) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the department of health and environment – division of
public health during fiscal year 2026 from moneys appropriated from
the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds by this or
any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made from such moneys to contract
for the services of one or more persons to survey and certify dialysis
treatment facilities located in the state of Kansas: Provided, That, if the
above agency has not surveyed a newly constructed dialysis treatment
facility within one year after the operator of the facility notifies the
above agency that the facility is operational, then the above agency
may charge the cost of any survey performed on the facility to the
operator of such facility: Provided further, That any expenditure of
moneys and any survey conducted pursuant to this subsection shall
comply with requirements imposed by federal law.
(k) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-242, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys to
distribute to each local health department an amount of not less than
$12,000 upon application therefor in accordance with K.S.A. 65-242,
and amendments thereto: Provided, That any remaining moneys
appropriated for such purpose, if any, after making distributions in
accordance with this subsection shall be distributed in accordance with
K.S.A. 65-242, and amendments thereto: Provided, however, That, if
sufficient funds are not available to make a minimum distribution of
$12,000, then the provisions of K.S.A. 65-242, and amendments

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 105
thereto, shall control.
(l) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the moneys that are identified as
moneys from the federal government for coronavirus relief aid to the
state of Kansas and appropriated in any special revenue fund or funds
for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made
by the above agency from such moneys appropriated from such special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 to reimburse for testing
certified testing laboratories that have entered into an agreement with
the above agency and are providing community COVID-19 testing to
the general public.
Sec. 84.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF HEALTH CARE FINANCE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) (264-00-1000-0010)...............$3,405,786
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $51,836,512
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 79(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the children's health insurance
program account (264-00-1000-0060), $19,653,311 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $728,305,486
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 79(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the other medical assistance
account (264-00-1000-3026), $28,060,632 is hereby lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 79(b) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the medical
programs fee fund (264-00-2395-110) of the department of health and
environment – division of health care finance is hereby decreased from
$126,123,554 to $110,153,554.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2025 as authorized by
section 79 of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, section
37 of chapter 110 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys for
fiscal year 2025 to submit to the United States centers for medicare and
medicaid services an approval request to no longer apply a 12-month
continuous eligibility period for adults made eligible for the medical
assistance program under 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(I), 42 U.S.C.
1396u-1(b), or 42 U.S.C. 1396u-1(d): Provided, That the department of
health and environment shall cause notice of such approval by the
United States centers for medicare and medicaid services to be
published in the Kansas register: And provided further, That the
changes in eligibility described in this subsection shall take effect on
and after January 1 or July 1 immediately following such publication:
And provided further, That, after such date, no additional moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund
shall be expended to support a 12-month continuous eligibility period
for the population described.
Sec. 85.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 106
DIVISION OF HEALTH CARE FINANCE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (264-00-1000-0010)........................$31,429,246
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
shall be made from the operating expenditures account of the above
agency for the drug utilization review board to perform an annual
review of the approved exemptions to the current single source limit by
program.
Children's health
insurance program (264-00-1000-0060)...............................$51,836,512
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the children's health
insurance program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Special enhanced FMAP (264-00-1000-0449).......................$4,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the special enhanced
FMAP account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Other medical assistance (264-00-1000-3026)...................$820,237,702
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the other medical
assistance account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from the other medical assistance account by the above
agency for the purpose of implementing or expanding any prior
authorization project: And provided further, That an evaluation of the
automated implementation, savings obtained from implementation and
other outcomes of the implementation or expansion shall be submitted
to the Robert G. (Bob) Bethell joint committee on home and
community based services and KanCare oversight prior to the start of
the regular session of the legislature in 2026: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account
during fiscal year 2026 to establish a system to compile and publish
data concerning the change in the number of dentists enrolled as
medicaid dental providers, providers accepting new medicaid patients
and utilization of medicaid dental coverage based on the increase in the
medicaid dental rate in fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account
during fiscal year 2026 to implement and provide reimbursement under
the medicaid state plan for services under CPT 99483 for cognitive
assessment and care planning: And provided further, That expenditures
shall be made from such moneys to submit to the centers for medicare
and medicaid services any required state plan amendments needed to
implement the provisions of this proviso section for fiscal year 2026:
And provided further, That the above agency shall expend moneys in
such account to provide coverage under the medicaid state plan for
patients who have a prescription for a complex power wheelchair
subject to the following: (1) For the service and repair of complex
wheelchairs, cover the complex rehabilitation supplier's time for
evaluation, diagnoses and repair needs by a repair technician using the
current labor rate; and (2) cover an annual preventative maintenance
appointment and any necessary repairs for such wheelchair using a
preventative maintenance reimbursement code established by the above
agency and amount based on current market rate: And provided further,
That the above agency shall not require prior authorization for the
services, repairs and appointments established in paragraphs (1) and
(2): And provided further, That expenditures shall be made from such
moneys to submit to the centers for medicare and medicaid services any

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 107
required state plan amendments needed to implement the provisions of
this proviso section for fiscal year 2026.
Wichita center for graduate
medical education (264-00-1000-3027)..................................$2,950,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Wichita center for
graduate medical education account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Graduated medical education (264-00-1000-3028)................$1,300,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the graduated medical
education account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
MMIS and data analysis fund (264-00-2002-2002)....................No limit
Medical assistance fee fund (264-00-2185-2185).......................No limit
Division of health care finance special
revenue fund (264-00-2360-2350)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the division of health care finance
special revenue fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Association assistance
plan fund (264-00-2391-2391)....................................................No limit
Medical programs fee fund (264-00-2395-0110)................$110,153,554
Other state fees fund (264-00-2440-0100)..................................No limit
Health care access
improvement fund (264-00-2443-2215)......................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-6217, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the interest earnings transferred from the state general
fund to the health care access improvement fund pursuant to K.S.A. 65-
6217(d), and amendments thereto, shall not include any amount
attributable to the credit received pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6217(f)(1), and
amendments thereto: Provided further, That the amount credited
pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6217(f)(1), and amendments thereto, shall be
limited to the amount estimated by the department of health and
environment that is necessary to maintain a positive cash balance in the
health care access improvement fund: And provided further, That such
credit shall not exceed 80% of the moneys estimated by the director of
the budget to be received from the assessment imposed on hospital
providers pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6208, and amendments thereto, and
credited to the health care access improvement fund during such fiscal
year.
Health committee
insurance fund (264-00-2569-2500)............................................No limit
Health care database
fee fund (264-00-2578-2570)......................................................No limit
Quality based community
assessment fund (264-00-2760-2760).........................................No limit
Energy assistance
block grant (264-00-3305-3305).................................................No limit
Temporary assistance for
needy families (264-00-3323-3530)............................................No limit
Ryan White title II –
federal fund (264-00-3328-3310)................................................No limit
HIV care formula grant
federal fund (264-00-3328-3311)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 108
Title IV-E – adoption
assistance (264-00-3357-3357)....................................................No limit
Medical assistance program
federal fund (264-00-3414-0440)................................................No limit
Children's health insurance program
federal fund (264-00-3424-0540)................................................No limit
State planning – health care –
uninsured fund (264-00-3483-3483)...........................................No limit
KEES interagency
transfer fund (264-00-6001-6001)...............................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, any moneys
donated or granted to the division of health care finance of the
department of health and environment and any federal funds received
as a match to such donations or grants by the division of health care
finance of the department of health and environment for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, shall only be expended by the division of health
care finance of the department of health and environment to assist the
clearinghouse in reducing any backlogs or waiting lists, unless
otherwise specified by the donor or grantor: Provided, That any
donated or granted moneys, and the matching moneys received therefor
from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, shall not
be used to supplant or replace funds already budgeted for the
clearinghouse or to restore any other reductions in funding to the
clearinghouse or the agency, unless otherwise specified by the donor or
grantor.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the department
of health and environment – division of health care finance from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys to
set the monthly protected income level for purposes of determining the
person's client obligation at an amount equal to 300% of federal
supplemental security income for any person in Kansas receiving home
and community-based services administered under section 1915(c) of
the federal social security act and any person in Kansas receiving
services from a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly
administered by the Kansas department for aging and disability
services.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the department
of health and environment – division of health care finance from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys to
implement analytical and publicly available reporting that is compliant
with the privacy rule of the administrative simplification subtitle of the
health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996 (Pub. L. No.
104-191), and any federal regulations adopted thereunder, to measure
outcomes and effectiveness of the health homes program known as
onecare Kansas and to assist providers with the provisions of the health
homes program.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the department
of health and environment – division of health care finance from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or any

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 109
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys to
submit to the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services
a waiver request to allow for medicaid reimbursement for inpatient
psychiatric acute care.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 38-2001, and amendments thereto, or any
other statute to the contrary, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency to provide coverage
under the state children's health insurance program for children residing
in a household that has a gross household income not to exceed 250%
of the federal poverty guidelines.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year 2026, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures shall be made from such moneys to
work with hospice stakeholders to identify and submit to the centers for
medicare and medicaid services any required state plan amendments
needed to implement new payment and systems for hospice providers
for fiscal year 2026.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by
this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by such agency from such
moneys to study the required billing codes and costs of providing
remote non-stress tests and ultrasound procedures to pregnant women
through the medicaid program: Provided, That the results of such study
shall be submitted to the senate committee on public health and welfare
and house of representatives committee on health and human services
on or before January 12, 2026.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 65-6208, and amendments thereto, or any
other statute to the contrary, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the department of health and
environment – division of health care finance from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by such agency from such moneys during
fiscal year 2026 to submit to the United States centers for medicare and
medicaid services an approval request to increase the hospital provider
assessment rate to an amount not less than 5% and not greater than 6%,
to include hospital inpatient and outpatient net operating revenue in the
hospital provider assessment and to base such assessment on each
hospital's fiscal year 2022: Provided, That the department of health and
environment shall cause notice of such approval by the United States
centers for medicare and medicaid services to be published in the
Kansas register: And provided further, That the changes to the hospital
provider assessment described in this subsection shall take effect on
and after January 1 or July 1 immediately following such publication:
And provided further, That, after such date, no additional moneys

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 110
appropriated from the state general fund shall be expended to support
rate enhancements under the hospital provider assessment.
(k) On July 1, 2025, the director of the budget shall calculate and
certify to the director of accounts and reports the amount of interest
deposited to the health care access improvement fund attributable to the
credit received pursuant to K.S.A. 65-6217(f)(1), and amendments
thereto, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025: Provided, That upon
receipt of such certification, or as soon thereafter as moneys are
available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer such
certified amount from the health care access improvement fund to the
state general fund: Provided further, That when the director of the
budget transmits such certification to the director of accounts and
reports, the director of the budget shall transmit a copy of such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(l) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 65-6208 and 65-6209, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, in addition to the other
purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this
or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by such agency from such
moneys to impose or collect the assessment imposed by K.S.A. 65-
6208, and amendments thereto, during fiscal year 2026 from any
critical access hospital, as defined in K.S.A. 65-468, and amendments
thereto, or any rural emergency hospital licensed under the rural
emergency hospital act, K.S.A. 65-481 et seq., and amendments
thereto, if such hospital has annual revenues above the threshold
established by the healthcare access improvement panel established in
K.S.A. 65-6218, and amendments thereto.
(m) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the department
of health and environment – division of health care finance from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys to
set the monthly protected income level for clients who are eligible
under the category of medically needy at an amount equal to 100% of
federal supplemental security income.
(n) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $8,696,232 from the
health care access improvement fund (264-00-2443-2215) of the
department of health and environment – division of health care finance
to the state general fund.
(o) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this
or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from moneys
appropriated for fiscal year 2026 to submit to the United States centers
for medicare and medicaid services an approval request to no longer
apply a 12-month continuous eligibility period for adults made eligible
for the medical assistance program under 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)
(I), 42 U.S.C. 1396u-1(b), or 42 U.S.C. 1396u-1(d): Provided, That the
department of health and environment shall cause notice of such
approval by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid
services to be published in the Kansas register: And provided further,

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 111
That the changes in eligibility described in this subsection shall take
effect on and after January 1 or July 1 immediately following such
publication: And provided further, That, after such date, no additional
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue
fund shall be expended to support a 12-month continuous eligibility
period for the population described.
Sec. 86.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF ENVIRONMENT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (264-00-1000-0300)...................................$350,000
Sec. 87.
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT –
DIVISION OF ENVIRONMENT
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including official
hospitality) (264-00-1000-0300).............................................$2,974,345
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Air quality fee fund (264-00-2020-2830)....................................No limit
Laboratory medicaid cost recovery fund –
environment (264-00-2092-2060)...............................................No limit
Hazardous waste
collection fund (264-00-2099-2010)...........................................No limit
Driving under the
influence fund (264-00-2101-2020)............................................No limit
Office of laboratory services
operating fund (264-00-2161-2161)............................................No limit
Health and environment training fee fund –
environment (264-00-2175-2170)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the health and
environment training fee fund – environment for acquisition and
distribution of division of environment program literature and films and
for participation in or conducting training seminars for training
employees of the division of environment of the department of health
and environment, for training recipients of state aid from the division of
environment of the department of health and environment and for
training representatives of industries affected by rules and regulations
of the department of health and environment relating to the division of
environment: Provided further, That the secretary of health and
environment is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees in
order to recover costs incurred for such acquisition and distribution of
literature and films and for the operation of such seminars: And
provided further, That such fees may be fixed in order to recover all or
part of such costs: And provided further, That all moneys received from
such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the health and environment training fee fund – environment:
And provided further, That, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the department of health and

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 112
environment for the division of environment from moneys appropriated
from the health and environment training fee fund – environment for
fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the department of
health and environment from the health and environment training fee
fund – environment for fiscal year 2026 for agency operations for the
division of environment.
Chemical control fee fund (264-00-2212-2360)..........................No limit
Subsurface hydrocarbon
storage fund (264-00-2228-2380)................................................No limit
Mined-land conservation and reclamation
fee fund (264-00-2233-2220)......................................................No limit
Salt solution mining well
plugging fund (264-00-2247-2390).............................................No limit
Solid waste management fund (264-00-2271-2075)...................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the solid waste
management fund during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
official hospitality: Provided further, That such expenditures for official
hospitality shall not exceed $2,500.
Public water supply fee fund (264-00-2284-2085)......................No limit
Voluntary cleanup fund (264-00-2288-2120)..............................No limit
Lead-based paint hazard
fee fund (264-00-2289-2140)......................................................No limit
Environmental use
control fund (264-00-2292-2310)................................................No limit
Storage tank fee fund (264-00-2293-2090).................................No limit
Small employer cafeteria plan
development program (264-00-2386-2382)................................No limit
QuantiFERON TB
laboratory fund (264-00-2458-2460)...........................................No limit
Hazardous waste
management fund (264-00-2519-2290).......................................No limit
Health and environment publication fee fund –
environment (264-00-2544-2195)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the health and environment
publication fee fund – environment shall be made only for the purpose
of paying the expenses of publishing documents as required by K.S.A.
75-5662, and amendments thereto.
Waste tire management fund (264-00-2635-2820)......................No limit
Local air quality control authority regulation
services fund (264-00-2657-2330) .............................................No limit
Environmental response fund (264-00-2662-2400)....................No limit
Mined-land reclamation fund (264-00-2685-2560).....................No limit
Water program
management fund (264-00-2798-2798).......................................No limit
Sponsored project overhead
fund – environment (264-00-2911-2720)....................................No limit
Environmental response RMDL act –
federal fund (264-00-3005-3010)................................................No limit
USDA conservation partnership –
federal fund (264-00-3022-3022)................................................No limit
EPA – core support –
federal fund (264-00-3040-3000)................................................No limit
Environmental response remedial activity specific
sites – federal fund (264-00-3040-3003).....................................No limit
Environmental response –
federal fund (264-00-3066-3010)................................................No limit
Emergency environmental response – nonspecific
sites federal fund (264-00-3067-3030)........................................No limit
Department of defense and state cooperative

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 113
agreement – federal fund (264-00-3067-3031)............................No limit
Air quality program –
federal fund (264-00-3072-3090)................................................No limit
Increasing technical assistance for
regenerative agriculture peer mentoring
programs fund (264-00-3083-3083)............................................No limit
EPA water monitoring –
federal fund (264-00-3086-4200)................................................No limit
Intoxilyzer replacement –
federal fund (264-00-3092-3092)................................................No limit
Other federal grants –
federal fund (264-00-3095-5450)................................................No limit
Medicare program – environment –
federal fund (264-00-3096-3050)................................................No limit
EPA multi-purpose grant –
federal fund (264-00-3103-3630)................................................No limit
Alcohol impaired driving
countermeasures incentive grants –
federal fund (264-00-3247-3247)................................................No limit
Air quality section 103 –
federal fund (264-00-3248-3246)................................................No limit
Air quality section 105 –
federal fund (264-00-3249-3249)................................................No limit
Kansas clean diesel grant –
federal fund (264-00-3249-3250)................................................No limit
Air quality program –
federal fund (264-00-3253-3253)................................................No limit
Water related grants –
federal fund (264-00-3254-3260)................................................No limit
Operator outreach training program –
federal fund (264-00-3259-3259)................................................No limit
Water protection state grants –
federal fund (264-00-3264-3264)................................................No limit
Network exchange grant –
federal fund (264-00-3267-3267)................................................No limit
Multi-media capacity building –
federal fund (264-00-3277-3277)................................................No limit
Brownfields revolving loan program –
federal fund (264-00-3278-3278)................................................No limit
Expanding public health
workforce fund (264-00-3287-3287)...........................................No limit
Water supply – federal fund (264-00-3295-3130).......................No limit
EPA underground injection control –
federal fund (264-00-3295-3288)................................................No limit
Public water supply loan
operations fund (264-00-3295-3295)...........................................No limit
Plant/animal disease and
pest control (264-00-3360-3539).................................................No limit
EPA state response program –
federal fund (264-00-3370-3915)................................................No limit
Ticket to work grant –
federal fund (264-00-3417-4367)................................................No limit
Demo to maintenance-indep. employer –
federal fund (264-00-3419-3419)................................................No limit
Health watershed initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3558-3558)................................................No limit
Resource conservation and recovery act –
federal fund (264-00-3586-3190)................................................No limit
EPA underground injection control –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 114
federal fund (264-00-3618-3230)................................................No limit
Sec. 106 monitoring initiative –
federal fund (264-00-3619-3240)................................................No limit
EPA pollution prevention –
federal fund (264-00-3619-3240)................................................No limit
Assistance for small and disadvantaged
communities drinking water grant
program fund (264-00-3655-3655)..............................................No limit
Solid waste infrastructure for
recycling fund (264-00-3659-3659)............................................No limit
Drinking water lead testing in school and
child care programs –
federal fund (264-00-3670-3601)................................................No limit
Gulf of Mexico
program fund (264-00-3703-3703)..............................................No limit
Environmental justice fund (264-00-3706-3706)........................No limit
Sewer overflow municipal grants
program fund (264-00-3707-3707)..............................................No limit
104G outreach training program –
federal fund (264-00-3722-3500)................................................No limit
Underground storage tank –
federal fund (264-00-3732-3510)................................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (264-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
Leaking underground storage tank trust –
federal fund (264-00-3812-3700)................................................No limit
Surface mining control and reclamation act –
federal fund (264-00-3820-3760)................................................No limit
Abandoned mined-land –
federal fund (264-00-3821-3770)................................................No limit
EPA non-point source –
federal fund (264-00-3889-3940)................................................No limit
Climate pollution reduction
grants fund (264-00-3897-3897).................................................No limit
Adv. health equity for
diabetes fund (264-00-3901-3901)..............................................No limit
Pollution prevention program –
federal fund (264-00-3908-3990)................................................No limit
Inspections Kansas infrastructure projects –
federal fund (264-00-3910-3950)................................................No limit
EPA nonpoint source implementation –
federal fund (264-00-3915-3915)................................................No limit
Strengthening U.S. public
health fund (264-00-3926-3926).................................................No limit
Expanding COVID-19
vaccination fund (264-00-3931-3931).........................................No limit
WISEWOMAN fund (264-00-3933-3933).................................No limit
KS CCR state permitting
program fund (264-00-3934-3934)..............................................No limit
Natural resources damages
trust fund (264-00-7265-7265)....................................................No limit
Volkswagen environmental fund (264-00-7269-7269)................No limit
Gifts, grants and donations
fund – environment (264-00-7314-7095)....................................No limit
Asbestos remediation fund (264-00-7342-7342).........................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-5309, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, all fees or other moneys
collected by the above agency during fiscal year 2026 related to
asbestos remediation, as certified by the secretary of health and

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 115
environment, shall be credited to the asbestos remediation fund.
Special bequest fund –
environment (264-00-7367-7040)...............................................No limit
Environmental
stewardship fund (264-00-7396-7096)........................................No limit
UST redevelopment fund (264-00-7397-7080)...........................No limit
Provided, That, in addition to the other purposes authorized by K.S.A.
65-34,132, and amendments thereto, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 65-34,139(a)(3), and amendments thereto, expenditures shall be
made from the UST redevelopment fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
purposes of reimbursing eligible owners of underground storage tanks,
if, pursuant to K.S.A. 65-34,139, and amendments thereto, the owner
replaces all components of a single-wall storage tank system with a
secondary containment system that complies with K.S.A. 65-34,138,
and amendments thereto, after August 8, 2005.
Aboveground petroleum storage tank release
trust fund (264-00-7398-7070)....................................................No limit
Underground petroleum storage tank release
trust fund (264-00-7399-7060)....................................................No limit
Risk management fund (264-00-7402-7402)..............................No limit
Drycleaning facility release
trust fund (264-00-7407-7250)....................................................No limit
Brownfields revolving loan
program fund (264-00-7526-7103)..............................................No limit
Certification of environmental
liability fund (264-00-7527-7230)...............................................No limit
Kansas water pollution control
revolving fund (264-00-7530-7400)............................................No limit
Provided, That the proceeds from revenue bonds issued by the Kansas
development finance authority to provide matching grant payments
under the federal clean water act of 1987 (P.L. 92-500) shall be credited
to the Kansas water pollution control revolving fund: Provided further,
That expenditures from this fund shall be made to provide for the
payment of such matching grants.
Cost of issuance fund for Kansas water
pollution control revolving fund
revenue bonds (264-00-7531-7600)............................................No limit
Surcharge operations fund for Kansas
water pollution control revolving
fund revenue bonds (264-00-7531-7620)....................................No limit
Public water supply
loan fund (264-00-7539-7800)....................................................No limit
Surcharge fund for Kansas water
pollution control revolving fund
revenue bonds (264-00-7539-7805)............................................No limit
P/C safety net clinic loan
guarantee fund (264-00-7551-7595)............................................No limit
Kansas water pollution control
operations fund (264-00-7960-8300)...........................................No limit
KWPC surcharge
services fees (264-00-7961-8400)...............................................No limit
KPWS revolving fund (264-00-7968-8500)................................No limit
KPWS surcharge service fees (264-00-7969-8600)....................No limit
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the state water
plan project or projects specified as follows:
Contamination remediation (264-00-1800-1802)...................$3,117,220
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the contamination
remediation account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 116
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Local environmental protection program (264-00-1800-1803).$800,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the local environmental
protection program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Nonpoint source program (264-00-1800-1804).........................$446,213
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nonpoint source
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
TMDL initiatives and use attainability
analysis (264-00-1800-1805).....................................................$395,942
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the TMDL initiatives and
use attainability analysis account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Drinking water protection (264-00-1800-1806)........................$800,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the drinking water
protection account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Watershed restoration and protection
plan (264-00-1800-1808)........................................................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the watershed restoration
and protection plan account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Aquifer recharge basin (264-00-1800-1809)........................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aquifer recharge basin
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Milford and Marion reservoirs harmful algae bloom
pilot (264-00-1800-1810)...........................................................$155,934
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Milford and Marion
reservoirs harmful algae bloom pilot account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Stream trash removal (264-00-1800-1816)...........................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the stream trash removal
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Small town infrastructure support.........................................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the small town
infrastructure account of the state water plan fund (264-00-1800-1817)
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to the
small town infrastructure support account for fiscal year 2026.
Equus beds...................................................................................$75,000
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
health and environment, with the approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state water plan fund for the department of health and
environment – division of environment to another item of appropriation
for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the department of
health and environment – division of environment: Provided, That the
secretary of health and environment shall certify each such transfer to
the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each
such certification to the director of legislative research, the chairperson
of the house of representatives agriculture and natural resources budget
committee and the chairperson of the subcommittee on health and
environment/human resources of the senate committee on ways and
means.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 65-3024, and amendments thereto, the director
of accounts and reports shall not make the transfers of amounts of

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 117
interest earnings from the state general fund to the air quality fee fund
(264-00-2020-2830) of the department of health and environment,
which are directed to be made on or before the 10th day of each month
by K.S.A. 65-3024, and amendments thereto.
(f) On July 1, 2025, and on other occasions during fiscal year
2026 when necessary, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
amounts specified by the secretary of health and environment that
constitute reimbursements, credits and other amounts received by the
department of health and environment for activities related to federal
programs, from specified special revenue fund or funds of the
department of health and environment – division of public health or of
the department of health and environment – division of environment, to
the sponsored project overhead fund – environment (264-00-2911-
2720) of the department of health and environment – division of
environment.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or amounts specified by
the secretary of health and environment from any one or more special
revenue fund or funds of the department of health and environment –
division of environment that have available moneys to the sponsored
project overhead fund – environment (264-00-2911-2720) of the
department of health and environment – division of environment or to
the sponsored project overhead fund – health (264-00-2912-2710) of
the department of health and environment – division of public health,
as the case may be, for expenditures for administrative expenses.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
health and environment, with approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state general fund for the department of health and
environment – division of public health or the department of health and
environment – division of environment to another item of appropriation
for fiscal year 2026 from the state general fund for the department of
health and environment – division of public health or the department of
health and environment – division of environment. The secretary of
health and environment shall certify each such transfer to the director
of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the amounts
transferred by the director of accounts and reports from each of the
special revenue funds of the department of health and environment –
division of environment to the sponsored project overhead fund –
environment (264-00-2911-2720) of the department of health and
environment – division of environment pursuant to this section may
include amounts equal to not more than 25% of the expenditures from
such special revenue fund, excepting expenditures for contractual
services.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
health and environment, with approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state water plan fund for the department of health and
environment – division of environment to any item of appropriation for
fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the Kansas water
office, Kansas department of agriculture, university of Kansas or
Kansas department of wildlife and parks: Provided, That the secretary
of health and environment shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and upon receipt of such certification,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer such certified amount
to the certified item of appropriation: Provided further, That when the
secretary of health and environment provides certification to the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 118
director of accounts and reports under this section, the secretary shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research, the chairperson of the house of representatives agriculture and
natural resources budget committee and the appropriate chairperson of
the subcommittee on natural resources of the senate committee on ways
and means.
Sec. 88.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Kan-care caseloads (039-00-1000-0610)................................$8,501,496
Aging services grants (039-00-1000-3006)...............................$140,000
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $140,000
shall be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal
year 2025 to provide in-home services to low-income older individuals
who would be able to remain in their homes for independence and self-
sufficiency if such individuals received such services.
Osawatomie state hospital –
operating expenditures (494-00-1000-0100)..........................$8,000,000
Larned state hospital
operating expenditures (410-00-1000-0103)........................$30,000,000
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $67,188,000
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the non-KanCare caseloads
account (039-00-1000-0611), the sum of $6,068,257 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $470,843,123
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the KanCare non-caseloads
account (039-00-1000-0612), the sum of $144,523,782 is hereby
lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, of the $41,501,607
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the state operations account (039-
00-1000-0801), the sum of $3,684,286 is hereby lapsed.
(e) On the effective date of this act, of the $54,184,328
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the community mental health
centers support account (039-00-1000-3001), the sum of $2,200,441 is
hereby lapsed.
(f) On the effective date of this act, of the $29,883,075
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the behavioral health services
account (039-00-1000-3004), the sum of $435,000 is hereby lapsed.
(g) On the effective date of this act, of the $5,000,000
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 83(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the counties and hospitals
reimbursement account (039-00-1000-3005), the sum of $3,584,188 is
hereby lapsed.
(h) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the Larned state
hospital fee fund (410-00-2073-2100) is hereby increased from

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 119
$3,755,249 to $5,933,759.
(i) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the problem
gambling and addictions grant fund (039-00-2371-2371) is hereby
increased from $8,420,470 to $8,970,470.
Sec. 89.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Mental health intervention team pilot (039-00-1000-0160)..$16,034,722
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the mental health
intervention team pilot account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account
during fiscal year 2026 in an amount of $1,500,000 for qualified
schools: And provided further, That expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026, to establish
the mental health intervention team program as provided by the
provisions of this proviso:
(1) And provided further, That such school district program
shall be a continuation of the mental health intervention team pilot
program first established pursuant to section 1 of chapter 57 of the
2018 Session Laws of Kansas and K.S.A. 72-9943, and amendments
thereto, and continued and expanded through subsequent appropriation
acts of the legislature: And provided further, That the purposes of the
mental health intervention team program are to: Provide greater access
to behavioral health services for students enrolled in kindergarten or
any of the grades one through 12 and establish a coherent structure
between school districts and mental health intervention team providers
to optimize scarce behavioral health resources and workforce; identify
students, communicate with families and link students and their
families to the statewide behavioral health systems and resources
within the network of mental health intervention team providers;
alleviate the shortage of staff with specialized degrees or training such
as school counselors, psychologists and social workers and reduce the
competition for such staff between school districts and other private
and governmental service providers to provide broader-based and
collaborative services to students, especially in rural districts that do
not have enough students to justify a full-time staff position; provide
and coordinate mental health services to students throughout the
calendar year, not only during school hours over nine months of the
school year; and reduce barriers that families experience to access
mental health services and maintain consistency for a child to attend
recurring sessions and coordination between the child's classroom
schedule and the provision of such services: And provided further, That
the program shall focus on the following students: Any student who has
been adjudicated as a child in need of care and is in the custody of the
secretary for children and families or has been referred for a families
first program or family preservation program; and any other student
who is in need of mental health support services: And provided further,
That the secretary for aging and disability services shall appoint a
mental health intervention team program manager and, within the limits
of appropriations therefor, such additional staff as necessary to support
such manager: And provided further, That the above agency shall
oversee and implement the mental health intervention team program in
accordance with the requirements of this proviso and the policies and
procedures established by the above agency pursuant to this proviso:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 120
And provided further, That during fiscal year 2026, the board of
education of a school district may apply to the above agency to
establish or maintain a mental health intervention team program within
such school district: And provided further, That the application shall be
in such form and manner as the above agency requires and submitted at
a time determined and specified by such agency: And provided further,
That each application submitted by a school district shall specify the
mental health intervention team provider that the school intends to
coordinate with to provide school-based services to students who need
assistance during the applicable school year: And provided further, That
the school district shall provide notice to the mental health intervention
team provider, as soon as they are able, of their intent to partner for the
following school year: And provided further, That the above agency
shall establish an application review committee that shall include
representatives from mental health intervention team providers and the
department of education: And provided further, That if a school district
and mental health intervention team provider are approved to establish
or maintain a mental health intervention team program, the school
district shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with a
partnering mental health intervention team provider: And provided
further, That if the school district chooses to partner with more than one
mental health intervention team provider, the school district shall enter
into a separate memorandum of understanding with each such mental
health intervention team provider: And provided further, That the above
agency may establish requirements for a memorandum of
understanding, including contractual provisions that are required to be
included in each memorandum of understanding and that are optional
and subject to agreement between the school district and the mental
health intervention team provider: And provided further, That each
memorandum of understanding shall be submitted to the above agency
for final approval: And provided further, That the above agency may
authorize another category of provider other than a mental health
intervention team provider to serve as a partnering provider under the
mental health intervention team program pursuant to this proviso: And
provided further, That such category of provider shall provide the
required services and otherwise meet the requirements of a partnering
mental health intervention team provider under this proviso: And
provided further, That if the above agency authorizes another category
of provider other than a mental health intervention team provider, such
agency shall provide notification of this decision to the mental health
intervention team provider that provides services in that county: And
provided further, That, subject to appropriations therefor, a school
district and mental health intervention team provider that have been
approved by the above agency to establish or maintain a mental health
intervention team program shall be eligible to receive a mental health
intervention team program grant and a mental health intervention team
provider pass-through grant: Provided, however, That the amount of a
school district's mental health intervention team program grant shall be
determined in each school year by calculating the total amount of the
salary and fringe benefits paid by the school district to each school
liaison: And provided further, That the amount of a school district's
mental health intervention team provider pass-through grant shall be an
amount equal to 35% of the amount of the school district's mental
health intervention team grant: And provided further, That moneys
provided to a school district for the mental health intervention team
provider pass-through grant shall be paid to any mental health
intervention team provider that partners with the school district: And
provided further, That if the amount of appropriations are insufficient to
pay in full the amount of all grants school districts are entitled to

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 121
receive for the school year, the above agency shall prorate the amount
appropriated among all districts: And provided further, That the above
agency shall be responsible for the allocation and distribution of grants
in accordance with appropriation acts: And provided further, That the
above agency may make grant payments in installments and may
provide for payments in advance or by way of reimbursement and may
make any necessary adjustments for any overpayment to a school
district: And provided further, That the above agency shall not award
any grant to a school district unless such district has entered into a
memorandum of understanding with a partnering mental health
intervention team provider in accordance with this proviso: And
provided further, That any remaining appropriations that were not
allocated to the mental health intervention team program shall provide
funding in the form of grants from the above agency to the association
of mental health intervention team providers of Kansas to fund training
for school districts participating in the mental health intervention team
program pursuant to this proviso: And provided further, That the above
agency shall seek advice from mental health intervention team
providers prior to awarding any grant under this subsection: And
provided further, That the above agency may waive the requirement
that a school district employ a school liaison and may instead authorize
a mental health intervention team provider that partners with the school
district to employ a school liaison: And provided further, That such
waiver shall only be granted by the above agency in limited
circumstances: And provided further, That a school district that is
granted a waiver pursuant to this proviso shall continue to be eligible to
receive the mental health intervention team program grant and the
mental health intervention team provider pass-through grant authorized
pursuant to this proviso: And provided further, That the amount of the
mental health intervention team program grant shall be determined in
the same manner as provided under this proviso as though the school
liaison was employed by such school district: And provided further,
That upon receipt of any moneys awarded pursuant to the mental health
intervention team program grant to any such school district, the school
district shall direct payment of such amount to the mental health
intervention team provider that employs the school liaison: And
provided further, That on or before January 12, 2026, the above agency
shall prepare and submit a report on the mental health intervention team
program for the preceding school year to the house of representatives
standing committees on appropriations, social services budget and
health and human services, or their successor committees, and the
senate standing committees on ways and means, ways and means
subcommittee on human services and public health and welfare, or their
successor committees: And provided further, That such report shall
provide a summary of the program, including, but not limited to, the
school districts that applied to participate or continued participating
under the program, the mental health intervention team providers, the
grant amount each such school district received and the payments made
by school districts from the mental health intervention team program
fund of each school district: And provided further, That the staff
required for the establishment and maintenance of a mental health
intervention team program shall include a combination of one or more
behavioral health liaisons employed by the school district and one or
more case managers and therapists licensed by the behavioral sciences
regulatory board who are employed by the partnering mental health
intervention team provider: And provided further, That all staff working
together under a school district's program shall be known as the mental
health intervention team of the school district: And provided further,
That the school district and the mental health intervention team

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 122
provider shall cooperate and work together to identify needs specific to
the students in the school district, and the families of such students and
shall develop an action plan to implement a school-based program that
is tailored to such needs: And provided further, That a school district
that participates in the program shall employ one or more school
liaisons who will help students in need and coordinate services between
the school district, the student, the student's family and the mental
health intervention team provider: And provided further, That a school
liaison shall have a bachelor's degree in any field of study: And
provided further, That a school liaison's roles and responsibilities
include, but are not limited to: Identifying appropriate student referrals
for the team to engage with; act as a liaison between the school district
and the mental health intervention team provider and be the primary
point of contact for communications between the school district and the
mental health intervention team provider; assist with mental health
intervention team provider staff understanding of the school district's
system and procedures including the school calendar, professional
development, drills and crisis plan protocols; triage prospective student
referrals and help decide how to prioritize interventions; help the
mental health intervention team provider and other school personnel
understand the roles and responsibilities of the mental health
intervention team; facilitate communications and connections between
families of identified students and the mental health intervention team
provider's staff; coordinate a student's treatment schedule with building
administrators and classroom teachers to optimize the clinical
therapist's productivity; troubleshoot problems that arise and work with
the mental health intervention team provider to resolve such problems;
track and compile outcomes to monitor the effectiveness of the
program; maintain and update the department of education mental
health intervention team database as directed by the above agency and
required by this section; follow up with child welfare contacts if a
student has moved schools to get the child's educational history; be an
active part of the school intervention team and relay information back
to mental health intervention team provider staff, including student
observations, intervention feedback from teachers, communications
with family and other relevant information; work with school
administration to identify and provide confidential space for a mental
health intervention team provider therapist; assist in planning
continuity of care through summer services; and submit an annual
report to the above agency on how the liaison complied with the
required roles and responsibilities: And provided further, That within
the scope of employment by a school district, an individual employed
as a school liaison shall primarily perform roles and responsibilities
that are related to the school liaison position as described in this
section: And provided further, That once the initial referral has been
completed for a student, all relevant information shall be entered into
the database within 14 calendar days: And provided further, That a
mental health intervention team provider that partners with a school
district shall employ one or more therapists licensed by the behavioral
sciences regulatory board who will collaborate with the school district
to assist students in need and provide services to such students under
the program: And provided further, That a therapist's roles and
responsibilities under the program include, but are not limited to: Assist
the school liaison with the identification of appropriate student referrals
to the program; triage student referrals with the school liaison to
prioritize treatment interventions for identified students; work with the
school liaison to connect with families or child welfare contacts to
obtain consent to commence treatment; conduct a clinical assessment of
the identified student and make appropriate treatment

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 123
recommendations; engage with the student, family or child welfare
contacts in clinical interventions as identified on the treatment plan and
provide individual and family therapy; administer scales or tests to
detect areas of concern with depression, anxiety, self-harm or other
areas as identified; make referrals to other treatment modalities as
appropriate; communicate educationally appropriate information to the
school liaison, such as interventions and strategies for use by classroom
and school staff; gather outcome data to monitor the effectiveness of
the program; coordinate with the case manager to identify ways to
support the student and family; provide therapy services as determined
by the students' treatment plan; and maintain the treatment plan and
necessary treatment protocols required by the mental health
intervention team provider: And provided further, That a mental health
intervention team provider that partners with a school district shall
employ one or more case managers who will collaborate with the
school district to assist students in need and to coordinate services
under the program: And provided further, That a case manager's roles
and responsibilities under the program include, but are not limited to:
Work with the school liaison and clinical therapist to identify students
and triage priorities for treatment; provide outreach to students,
families and child welfare contacts to help engage in treatment;
participate in the treatment planning process; communicate with the
school liaison and other school district personnel about student needs,
interventions and progress; help maintain communication between all
entities, including the family, student, school, clinical therapist, child
welfare contacts and the community; maintain the treatment plan and
necessary treatment protocols required by the mental health
intervention team provider; make referrals to appropriate community
resources; help reconnect students and families when they are not
following through with the treatment process; help families negotiate
barriers to treatment; and engage with the student in the classroom, the
home or the community to help build skills wherever needed: And
provided further, That each school district that receives moneys for the
mental health intervention team program grant or the mental health
intervention team provider pass-through grant awarded pursuant to this
proviso shall credit the moneys to a mental health intervention team
program fund created by such school district: And provided further,
That moneys in such fund shall be used by a school district to: Pay for
the expenditures that are attributable to the salary and fringe benefits of
any school liaison employed by the school district pursuant to the
mental health intervention team program; and provide payment to each
partnering mental health intervention team provider in an amount equal
to the mental health intervention team provider pass-through grant
received by the school district: And provided further, That the school
district shall keep separate accounting records for the school liaison
expenditures and the pass-through grants to mental health intervention
team providers: And provided further, That the above agency shall
publish on its website an aggregated report of outcomes achieved,
numbers served and associated information by the mental health
intervention team program: And provided further, That the above
agency shall establish a crisis hotline, available 24 hours a day, seven
days a week, that individuals receiving services from the mental health
intervention team program may access outside of the hours that such
individuals are receiving services: And provided further, That such
hotline shall be established for the purposes of providing information
sharing and communications regarding crisis coordination and
emergency response services:
(2) And provided further, That such qualified school district
program shall be established and implemented by the board as

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 124
established in this paragraph: And provided further, That the board shall
be appointed by the secretary as follows: (A) A school psychologist
employed by a qualified school; (B) a school administrator employed
by a qualified school; (C) a mental health professional employed by a
community mental health center; (D) a mental health professional
employed by a federally qualified health center; (E) a representative of
the state board of education; (F) a representative of the above agency;
and (G) a parent or guardian of a qualified school student: And
provided further, That the board shall establish a plan, including
specified criteria, for the allocation of moneys to qualified schools for
the establishment and maintenance of mental health intervention teams:
And provided further, That such teams will provide timely support and
resources to students facing mental health issues in order to promote a
healthier learning environment: And provided further, That the board
shall review the criteria for school district funding as provided in
paragraph (1) and determine which such criteria will work best for the
qualified schools: And provided further, That such criteria may include
student population size, demonstrated need for mental health support
and the availability of qualified staff: And provided further, That any
qualified school seeking funding for mental health intervention teams
shall submit a proposal for funding to the board: And provided further,
That the board shall evaluate each proposal based on the criteria
established by the board: And provided further, That the board shall
make recommendations to the secretary on the allocation of funding
and the secretary shall allocate funding for qualified schools based on
such recommendations: And provided further, That the board shall
oversee the implementation of the qualified school's mental health
intervention teams: And provided further, That the board shall review
the criteria for school district reporting, monitoring and evaluating as
provided in paragraph (1) and determine which such criteria will work
best for the qualified schools: And provided further, That the board shall
establish such reporting, monitoring and evaluating to ensure that the
mental health intervention teams effectively meet the needs of students
and adhere to best practices in mental healthcare program service
delivery: And provided further, That on or before January 12, 2026, the
above agency shall prepare and submit a report summarizing the mental
health intervention team program for qualified schools to the house of
representatives standing committees on appropriations, social services
budget and health and human services, or their successor committees,
and the senate standing committees on ways and means, ways and
means subcommittee on human services and public health and welfare,
or their successor committees: And provided further, That the board
shall provide resources, training and support to qualified schools and
such school's mental health intervention teams, including access to
professional development opportunities, educational materials and
networking opportunities with other qualified schools and mental
health organizations: and
(3) And provided further, That as used in this proviso: (A)
"Mental health intervention team provider" means a center organized
pursuant to article 40 of chapter 19 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated,
and amendments thereto, a mental health clinic organized pursuant to
article 2 of chapter 65 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto, or a federally qualified health center as defined by
section 1905(l)(2)(B) of the federal social security act: And provided
further, That "mental health intervention team provider" includes other
provider categories as authorized by the above agency to serve as a
partnering provider under the mental health intervention team program
pursuant to this proviso: And provided further, That a provider under
this proviso shall provide services, including: Support for students

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 125
available 24 hours a day, seven days a week; person-centered treatment
planning; and outpatient mental health services; (B) "school district"
means a school district as defined in K.S.A. 72-5132, and amendments
thereto; and (C) "qualified school" means any nonpublic school that
provides education to elementary or secondary students and is
accredited by the state board or a national or regional accrediting
agency that is recognized by the state board for the purpose of
satisfying the teaching performance assessment for professional
licensure or is working in good faith toward such accreditation.
Administration
official hospitality (039-00-1000-0204).........................................$1,748
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the administration official
hospitality account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Senior care act (039-00-1000-0260).......................................$5,515,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the senior care act
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That each grant agreement with
an area agency on aging for a grant from the senior care act account
shall require the area agency on aging to submit to the secretary for
aging and disability services a report for fiscal year 2026 by the area
agency on aging, which shall include information about the kinds of
services provided and the number of persons receiving each kind of
service during fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That the secretary
for aging and disability services shall submit to the senate committee
on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on
appropriations at the beginning of the 2026 regular session of the
legislature a report of the information contained in such reports from
the area agencies on aging on expenditures for fiscal year 2025: And
provided further, That all people receiving or applying for services that
are funded, either partially or entirely, through expenditures from this
account shall be placed in appropriate services that are determined to be
the most economical services available with regard to state general
fund expenditures.
Any unencumbered balance in the program for all-inclusive care for the
elderly account (039-00-1000-0270) in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Program grants – nutrition –
state match (039-00-1000-0280).............................................$9,045,725
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the program grants –
nutrition – state match account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That each
grant agreement with an area agency on aging for a grant from the
program grants – nutrition – state match account shall require the area
agency on aging to submit to the secretary for aging and disability
services a report for federal fiscal year 2025 by the area agency on
aging, which shall include information about the kinds of services
provided and the number of persons receiving each kind of service
during federal fiscal year 2025: And provided further, That the secretary
for aging and disability services shall submit to the senate committee
on ways and means and the house of representatives committee on
appropriations at the beginning of the 2026 regular session of the
legislature a report of the information contained in such reports from
the area agencies on aging on expenditures for federal fiscal year 2025:
And provided further, That all people receiving or applying for services
that are funded, either partially or entirely, through expenditures from
this account shall be placed in appropriate services that are determined
to be the most economical services available with regard to state
general fund expenditures.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 126
LTSS Services (039-00-1000-0520)........................................$4,964,860
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the community services
and programs account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated to the LTSS services account for fiscal year 2026.
KanCare caseloads (039-00-1000-0610)............................$684,082,993
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the KanCare caseloads
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures shall be made
by the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to
develop and implement a pilot program for nursing facilities, as defined
in K.S.A. 39-923, and amendments thereto, with residents who are
provided care by the medicaid state plan, to provide an additional daily
reimbursement rate for the behavioral health needs of such residents:
And provided further, That the daily reimbursement rate for the add-on
payment shall be limited to not more than $175 per resident per
medicaid day: And provided further, That expenditures for such pilot
program shall be used for specialized staff training and enhanced care
services by participating facilities and shall be limited to 125 residents:
And provided further, That participating facilities shall be required to
develop and implement for each resident in the program individualized
behavioral support plans and provide monthly psychopharmacological
reviews: And provided further, That participating facilities shall
collaborate with the contracted behavioral support provider to track and
report outcome metrics to the above agency: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account
during fiscal year 2026 to increase the daily reimbursement rate for
substance abuse disorders treatment services for adolescents to $375
per medicaid day.
Non-KanCare caseloads (039-00-1000-0611)......................$69,967,030
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the non-KanCare
caseloads account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all people
receiving or applying for services that are funded, either partially or
entirely, from the non-KanCare caseloads account shall be placed in
appropriate services that are determined to be the most economical
services available with regard to state general fund expenditures.
KanCare non-caseloads (039-00-1000-0612).....................$485,587,604
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the KanCare non-
caseloads account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
State operations (039-00-1000-0801)...................................$27,534,371
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state operations
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures may be made
from this account for the purchase of professional liability insurance for
physicians and dentists at any institution, as defined by K.S.A. 76-
12a01, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That
expenditures in an amount of not less than $190,000 shall be made by
the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to create a
comprehensive statewide resource directory to provide essential
information on long-term care options: And provided further, That such
directory shall be accessible in an up-to-date online version as well as
in a printable version.
Alcohol and drug abuse
services grants (039-00-1000-1010).....................................$14,718,139
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the alcohol and drug
abuse services grants account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures in an amount of not less than $1,800,000 shall be made by

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 127
the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide
for workforce development for substance use disorder providers: And
provided further, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency
from such account during fiscal year 2026 to submit a report on the
distribution and usage of moneys from the state general fund and
federal funds to substance use disorder providers, including the name
of each such provider and the dollar amount received by such provider
during fiscal year 2025 and fiscal year 2026 to date, to the senate
committee on ways and means human services subcommittee and the
house of representatives committee on social services budget on or
before January 12, 2026.
Community mental health
centers support (039-00-1000-3001).....................................$58,184,328
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the community mental
health centers supplemental funding account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to the community mental health
centers support account for fiscal year 2026.
Regional beds (039-00-1000-3003)......................................$14,650,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the regional beds funding
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
to the regional beds account for fiscal year 2026.
Behavioral health services (039-00-1000-3004)...................$21,283,075
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the BH community aid
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
to the behavioral health services account for fiscal year 2026: Provided
further, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $650,000 shall
be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal year
2026 to assist in the renovation of a homeless shelter in southwest
Kansas: And provided further, That expenditures in an amount of not
less than $350,000 shall be made by the above agency from such
account during fiscal year 2026 to provide financial training and peer
mentoring to address poverty: And provided further, That expenditures
in an amount of not less than $250,000 shall be made by the above
agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide aftercare
services for individuals discharged from a psychiatric residential
treatment facility: And provided further, That expenditures in an amount
of not less than $2,000,000 shall be made by the above agency from
such account during fiscal year 2026 to develop and issue a request for
proposal and select a single provider for a school-based pilot program
to provide telehealth mental health services to students during fiscal
year 2026: And provided further, That such provider shall have
demonstrated experience serving at least 50,000 students, have
research-based outcomes from a division one research university, waive
out of pocket costs and cover any uninsured costs.
Counties and hospitals
reimbursement (039-00-1000-3005).......................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the counties and hospitals
reimbursement account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Aging services grants (039-00-1000-3006)............................$5,884,597
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aging services grants
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures in an amount
of not less than $540,000 shall be made by the above agency from such
account during fiscal year 2026 to provide in-home services to low-
income older individuals who would be able to remain in their homes
for independence and self-sufficiency if such individuals received such
services.
CDDO support (039-00-1000-4001).....................................$11,474,857

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 128
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the CDDO support
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Wichita hospital.....................................................................$15,000,000
Crisis funding........................................................................$26,461,100
Kansas neurological institute – operating
expenditures (363-00-1000-0303).........................................$18,110,525
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas neurological
institute – operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided,
however, That expenditures from the Kansas neurological institute –
operating expenditures account for official hospitality by the
superintendent shall not exceed $150: Provided further, That
expenditures shall be made from this account to assist residents of the
institution to take personally used items that are constructed for use by
such residents and which are hereby authorized to be transferred to
such residents from the institution to communities when such residents
leave the institution to reside in the communities.
Osawatomie state hospital – operating
expenditures (494-00-1000-0100).........................................$39,753,873
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Osawatomie state
hospital – operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided,
however, That expenditures from the Osawatomie state hospital –
operating expenditures account for official hospitality by the
superintendent shall not exceed $150.
Osawatomie state hospital – certified
care expenditures (494-00-1000-0101)...................................$8,798,795
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Osawatomie state
hospital – certified care expenditures account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Larned state hospital – operating
expenditures (410-00-1000-0103).........................................$51,074,232
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Larned state hospital
– operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the Larned state hospital – operating expenditures
account for official hospitality by the superintendent shall not exceed
$150: Provided further, That expenditures may be made from this
account for educational services contracts, which are hereby authorized
to be negotiated and entered into by Larned state hospital with unified
school districts or other public educational services providers: And
provided further, That such educational services contracts shall not be
subject to the competitive bidding requirements of K.S.A. 75-3739, and
amendments thereto.
Larned state hospital – sexual predator treatment
program (410-00-1000-0200)...............................................$26,847,730
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Larned state hospital
– sexual predator treatment program account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Osawatomie state hospital –
SPTP MiCo (494-00-1000-0200)............................................$2,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Osawatomie state
hospital – SPTP MiCo account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Parsons state hospital and training center –
operating expenditures (507-00-1000-0100)........................$21,889,653
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Parsons state hospital
and training center – operating expenditures account in excess of $100

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 129
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided, however, That expenditures from the Parsons state hospital
and training center – operating expenditures account for official
hospitality by the superintendent shall not exceed $150: And provided
further, That expenditures may be made from this account for
educational services contracts, which are hereby authorized to be
negotiated and entered into by Parsons state hospital and training center
with unified school districts or other public educational services
providers: And provided further, That such educational services
contracts shall not be subject to the competitive bidding requirements
of K.S.A. 75-3739, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made from this account to assist residents of the
institution to take personally used items that are constructed for use by
such residents and which are hereby authorized to be transferred to
such residents from the institution to communities when such residents
leave the institution to reside in the communities.
Parsons state hospital and
training center – sexual predator
treatment program (507-00-1000-0200).................................$2,595,207
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Parsons state hospital
and training center – sexual predator treatment program account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Other medical assistance account (039-00-1000-3002), Larned state
hospital – SPTP new crimes reimbursement account (410-00-1000-
0110).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Kansas neurological institute title XIX
reimbursements fund (363-00-2060-2200)..................................No limit
Larned state hospital title XIX
reimbursements fund (410-00-2074-2200)..................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital title XIX
reimbursements fund (494-00-2080-4300)..................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital certified care title XIX
reimbursements fund (494-00-2080-4301)..................................No limit
Parsons state hospital title XIX
reimbursements fund (507-00-2083-2300)..................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute
fee fund (363-00-2059-2000)..................................................$1,715,270
Kansas neurological institute –
foster grandparents program –
federal fund (363-00-3115-3200)................................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute – FGP gifts, grants,
donations fund (363-00-7125-7400)............................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute – patient
benefit fund (363-00-7910-7100)................................................No limit
Kansas neurological institute – work therapy patient
benefit fund (363-00-7940-7200)................................................No limit
Larned state hospital
fee fund (410-00-2073-2100)..................................................$4,334,054
Larned state hospital – work therapy patient
benefit fund (410-00-7938-7200)................................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital
fee fund (494-00-2079-4200)..................................................$2,500,205

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 130
Provided, That all moneys received as fees for the use of video
teleconferencing equipment at Osawatomie state hospital shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
video teleconferencing fee account of the Osawatomie state hospital fee
fund: Provided further, That all moneys credited to the video
teleconferencing fee account shall be used solely for the servicing,
technical and program support, maintenance and replacement of
associated equipment at Osawatomie state hospital: And provided
further, That any expenditures from the video teleconferencing fee
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on
the Osawatomie state hospital fee fund.
Osawatomie state hospital certified
care fund (494-00-2079-4201)................................................$4,261,103
Osawatomie state hospital – cottage revenue and
expenditures fund (494-00-2159-2159).......................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital – training fee
revolving fund (494-00-2602-2000)............................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received as fees for training activities for
Osawatomie state hospital shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the Osawatomie state hospital –
training fee revolving fund: Provided further, That the superintendent
of Osawatomie state hospital is hereby authorized to fix, charge and
collect fees for training activities at Osawatomie state hospital: And
provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or
part of the expenses of such training activities for Osawatomie state
hospital.
Osawatomie state hospital – motor pool
revolving fund (494-00-6164-5200)............................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital –
canteen fund (494-00-7807-5600)...............................................No limit
Osawatomie state hospital – work therapy patient
benefit fund (494-00-7939-5800)................................................No limit
Parsons state hospital and training center
fee fund (507-00-2082-2200)..................................................$1,150,000
Provided, That all moneys received as fees for the use of video
teleconferencing equipment at Parsons state hospital and training center
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the video teleconferencing fee account of the Parsons state
hospital and training center fee fund: Provided further, That all moneys
credited to the video teleconferencing fee account shall be used solely
for the servicing, maintenance and replacement of video
teleconferencing equipment at Parsons state hospital and training
center: And provided further, That any expenditures from the video
teleconferencing fee account shall be in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on the Parsons state hospital and training center fee
fund.
Parsons state hospital and training center –
canteen fund (507-00-7808-5500)...............................................No limit
Parsons state hospital and training center – patient
benefit fund (507-00-7916-5600)................................................No limit
DADS social welfare fund (039-00-2141-2195).........................No limit
Indirect cost fund (039-00-2193-2193).......................................No limit
Health occupations credentialing
fee fund (039-00-2315-2315)......................................................No limit
Community mental health center
improvement fund (039-00-2336-2336)......................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 131
Community crisis stabilization
centers fund (039-00-2337-2337)................................................No limit
Clubhouse model
program fund (039-00-2338-2338)..............................................No limit
Medical resources and
collection fund (039-00-2363-2100)...........................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received or collected by the secretary for
aging and disability services due to medicaid overpayments shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
medical resources and collection fund: Provided further, That
expenditures from such fund shall be made for medicaid program-
related expenses and used to reduce state general fund outlays for the
medicaid program: And provided further, That all moneys received or
collected by the secretary for aging and disability services due to civil
monetary penalty assessments against adult care homes shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
medical resources and collection fund: And provided further, That
expenditures from such fund shall be made to protect the health or
property of adult care home residents as required by federal law.
Problem gambling and addictions
grant fund (039-00-2371-2371)..............................................$8,420,470
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
the problem gambling and addictions grant fund, not to exceed
$5,000,000, to provide reimbursement to organizations that provide
substance use disorder treatment for uninsured individuals.
State licensure fee fund (039-00-2373-2370)..............................No limit
General fees fund (039-00-2524-2500).......................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary for aging and disability services is hereby
authorized to collect: (1) Fees from the sale of surplus property; (2)
fees charged for searching, copying and transmitting copies of public
records; (3) fees paid by employees for personal long distance calls,
postage, faxed messages, copies and other authorized uses of state
property; and (4) other miscellaneous fees: Provided further, That such
fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the general fees fund: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made from this fund to meet the obligations of the
Kansas department for aging and disability services or to benefit and
meet the mission of the Kansas department for aging and disability
services.
Title XIX fund (039-00-2595-4130)............................................No limit
Provided, That all receipts resulting from payments under title XIX of
the federal social security act to any of the institutions under mental
health and intellectual disabilities may be credited to the title XIX fund:
Provided further, That moneys in the title XIX fund may be used for
expenditures for contractual services to provide for collecting
additional payments under title XVIII and title XIX of the federal social
security act and for expenditures for premiums and surcharges required
to be paid for physicians' malpractice insurance.
Senior citizen nutrition
check-off fund (039-00-2660-2610)............................................No limit
Other state fees fund – community
alcohol treatment (039-00-2661-0000)........................................No limit
County competency
expense fund (039-00-2893-2893)..............................................No limit
988 suicide prevention and mental health crisis
hotline fund (039-00-2913-2913)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 132
Quality care services fund (039-00-2999-2902)..........................No limit
Provided, That the secretary for aging and disability services, acting as
the agent of the secretary of health and environment, is hereby
authorized to collect the quality care assessment under K.S.A. 75-7435,
and amendments thereto, and notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A.
75-7435, and amendments thereto, all moneys received for such quality
care assessments shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of
the quality care services fund: Provided further, That all moneys in the
quality care services fund shall be used to finance initiatives to
maintain or improve the quantity and quality of skilled nursing care in
skilled nursing care facilities in Kansas in accordance with K.S.A. 75-
7435, and amendments thereto.
Opioid abuse treatment & prevention –
federal fund (039-00-3023-3024)................................................No limit
Kansas national background check program –
federal fund (039-00-3032-3132)................................................No limit
Money follows the person grant –
federal fund (039-00-3054-4000)................................................No limit
Survey & certification –
federal fund (039-00-3064-3064)................................................No limit
Provided, That transfers of moneys from the survey & certification –
federal fund to the state fire marshal may be made during fiscal year
2026 pursuant to a contract, which is hereby authorized to be entered
into by the secretary for aging and disability services with the state fire
marshal to provide fire and safety inspections for adult care homes and
hospitals.
Substance abuse/mental health
services – partnership for success –
federal fund (039-00-3284-1327)................................................No limit
Special program for aging IIID –
federal fund (039-00-3286-3285)................................................No limit
Special program for aging IIIB –
federal fund (039-00-3287-3281)................................................No limit
Special program for aging IV & II –
federal fund (039-00-3288-3297)................................................No limit
National family caregiver support program IIIE –
federal fund (039-00-3289-3201)................................................No limit
Nutrition services incentives –
federal fund (039-00-3291-3305)................................................No limit
Prevention/treatment substance abuse –
federal fund (039-00-3301-0310)................................................No limit
Social service block
grant fund (039-00-3307-3371)..............................................$4,500,000
Provided, That each grant agreement with an area agency on aging for a
grant from the social service block grant fund shall require the area
agency on aging to submit to the secretary for aging and disability
services a report for fiscal year 2026 by the area agency on aging,
which shall include information about the kinds of services provided
and the number of persons receiving each kind of service during fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, That the secretary for aging and disability
services shall submit to the senate committee on ways and means and
the house of representatives committee on appropriations at the
beginning of the 2025 regular session of the legislature a report of the
information contained in such reports from the area agencies on aging
on expenditures for fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That all
people receiving or applying for services that are funded, either
partially or entirely, through expenditures from this fund shall be placed
in appropriate services that are determined to be the most economical
services available.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 133
Community mental health block grant –
federal fund (039-00-3310-0460)................................................No limit
Temporary assistance for needy families –
federal fund (039-00-3323-3323)................................................No limit
PATH – federal fund (039-00-3347-4316)...................................No limit
Special program for aging VII-2 –
federal fund (039-00-3358-3072)................................................No limit
TBI partnership
program fund (039-00-3376-3376)..............................................No limit
Disaster response for Children –
federal fund (039-00-3385-3591)................................................No limit
Special program for aging VII-3 –
federal fund (039-00-3402-3000)................................................No limit
Center for medicare/medicaid service –
federal fund (039-00-3408-3300)................................................No limit
Medicare fund – oasis (039-00-3408-3350)................................No limit
Provided, That all nonfederal reimbursements received by the Kansas
department for aging and disability services shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and credited to the nonfederal reimbursements
fund.
Medicare fund – SHICK (039-00-3408-3400)............................No limit
Medical assistance program –
federal fund (039-00-3414-0442)................................................No limit
Children's health insurance –
federal fund (039-00-3424-3420)................................................No limit
Special program for aging IIIC –
federal fund (039-00-3425-3423)................................................No limit
Medicare enrollment assistance program
fund – federal (039-00-3468-3450)............................................ No limit
Systems of care grant –
federal fund (039-00-3595-3595)................................................No limit
SAMHSA covid-19 supplemental –
federal fund (039-00-3672-3997)................................................No limit
SSA xx ombudsman cares FFY21 –
federal fund (039-00-3680-3083)................................................No limit
KS assisted outpatient treatment –
federal fund (039-00-3733-3101)................................................No limit
ADAS data collection grant –
federal fund (039-00-3887-3887)................................................No limit
KS ccbhc planning grant –
federal fund (039-00-3930-3930)................................................No limit
Long-term care loan and
grant fund (039-00-5110-5100)...................................................No limit
KDFA refunding revenue bond
2013B fund (039-00-7111)..........................................................No limit
Trust fund (039-00-7299)............................................................No limit
Gifts and donations fund (039-00-7309-7000)............................No limit
Provided, That the secretary for aging and disability services is hereby
authorized to receive gifts and donations of money for services to
senior citizens or purposes related thereto: Provided further, That such
gifts and donations of money shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the gifts and donations fund.
Larned state security hospital
KDFA 02N-1 fund (039-00-8703)...............................................No limit
SRS state of Kansas KDFA 04A-1
project fund (039-00-8704).........................................................No limit
State of Kansas projects

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 134
KDFA 2010E-F fund (039-00-8705)...........................................No limit
Parking deduction clearing fund (039-00-9233-9200)................No limit
Medical assistance recovery
clearing fund (039-00-9300)........................................................No limit
Credit card clearing fund (039-00-9400).....................................No limit
American rescue plan
state relief fund (039-00-3756-3536)..........................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, and at other times during fiscal year 2026,
when necessary as determined by the secretary for aging and disability
services, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts
specified by the secretary for aging and disability services, which
amounts constitute reimbursements, credits and other amounts received
by the Kansas department for aging and disability services for activities
related to federal programs from specified special revenue funds of the
Kansas department for aging and disability services to the indirect cost
fund of the Kansas department for aging and disability services.
(d) On July 1, 2025, the superintendent of Osawatomie state
hospital, upon the approval of the director of accounts and reports, shall
transfer an amount specified by the superintendent from the
Osawatomie state hospital – canteen fund (494-00-7807-5600) to the
Osawatomie state hospital – patient benefit fund (494-00-7914-5700).
(e) On July 1, 2025, the superintendent of Parsons state hospital,
upon approval from the director of accounts and reports, shall transfer
an amount specified by the superintendent from the Parsons state
hospital and training center – canteen fund (507-00-7808-5500) to the
Parsons state hospital and training center – patient benefit fund (507-
00-7916-5600).
(f) On July 1, 2025, the superintendent of Larned state hospital,
upon approval of the director of accounts and reports, shall transfer an
amount specified by the superintendent from the Larned state hospital –
canteen fund (410-00-7806-7000) to the Larned state hospital – patient
benefit fund (410-00-7912-7100).
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, no moneys paid
by the Kansas department for aging and disability services from the
CDDO support account (039-00-1000-4001) of the state general fund
shall be expended by the entity receiving such moneys to pay
membership dues and fees to any entity that does not provide the
Kansas department for aging and disability services, the legislative
division of post audit or another state agency, access to its financial
records upon request for such access.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
aging and disability services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal
year 2026 from the state general fund for the Kansas department for
aging and disability services or any institution or facility under the
general supervision and management of the secretary for aging and
disability services to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state general fund for the Kansas department for aging and
disability services or any institution or facility under the general
supervision and management of the secretary for aging and disability
services. The secretary for aging and disability services shall certify
each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
aging and disability services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal
year 2026 from the state institutions building fund for the Kansas
department for aging and disability services or any institution or facility

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 135
under the general supervision and management of the secretary for
aging and disability services to another item of appropriation for fiscal
year 2026 from the state institutions building fund for the Kansas
department for aging and disability services or any institution or facility
under the general supervision and management of the secretary for
aging and disability services. The secretary for aging and disability
services shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(j) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the Kansas department for children and families from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for the Kansas department for
children and families and in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the department of health and
environment – division of public health from moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026 for the department of health and environment –
division of public health, as authorized by this or other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be
made by the secretary for children and families and the secretary of
health and environment for fiscal year 2026 to enter into a contract with
the secretary for aging and disability services, which is hereby
authorized and directed to be entered into by such secretaries, to
provide for the secretary for aging and disability services to perform the
powers, duties, functions and responsibilities prescribed by and to
conduct investigations pursuant to K.S.A. 39-1404, and amendments
thereto, in conjunction with the performance of such powers, duties,
functions, responsibilities and investigations by the secretary for
children and families and the secretary of health and environment under
such statute, with respect to reports of abuse, neglect or exploitation of
residents or reports of residents in need of protective services on behalf
of the secretary for children and families or the secretary of health and
environment, as the case may be, in accordance with and pursuant to
K.S.A. 39-1404, and amendments thereto, during fiscal year 2026:
Provided, That, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the Kansas department for aging and
disability services from moneys appropriated from the state general
fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for the
Kansas department for aging and disability services, as authorized by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the secretary for aging and
disability services for fiscal year 2026 to provide for the performance
of such powers, duties, functions and responsibilities and to conduct
such investigations: Provided further, That, the words and phrases used
in this subsection shall have the meanings respectively ascribed thereto
by K.S.A. 39-1401, and amendments thereto.
(k) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
aging and disability services, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal
year 2026 from the title XIX fund (039-00-2595-4130) of the Kansas
department for aging and disability services to any institution or facility
under the general supervision and management of the secretary for
aging and disability services. The secretary for aging and disability
services shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(l) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-5958, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, and subject to appropriations,

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 136
the secretary for aging and disability services may provide rate
increases for nursing facilities for fiscal year 2026.
(m) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this
or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by such agency from such
moneys to operate, or contract for the operation of, eight acute inpatient
psychiatric care beds for children in the city of Hays, Kansas, or the
surrounding area: Provided, however, That expenditures for such
purposes during fiscal year 2026 shall not exceed $4,000,000.
(n) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds, as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by such agency from such moneys to
implement a process for certification and funding for certified
community behavioral health clinics: Provided, That such agency shall
certify as a certified community behavioral health clinic any
community behavioral health center licensed by such agency that
provides the following services: Crisis services; screening, assessment
and diagnosis, including risk assessment; person-centered treatment
planning; outpatient mental health and substance use services; primary
care screening and monitoring of key indicators of health risks; targeted
case management; psychiatric rehabilitation services; peer support and
family supports; medication-assisted treatment; assertive community
treatment; and community-based mental healthcare for military
servicemembers and veterans.
(o) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds, as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by such agency from such moneys to
submit a report on a quarterly basis, in collaboration with the Kansas
department of health and environment, to the Robert G. (Bob) Bethell
joint committee on home and community based services regarding the
home and community-based services brain injury waiver, including the:
(1) Number of members enrolled in such waiver at the end of the
month prior to the committee meeting;
(2) unduplicated number of such members over the course of the
calendar year;
(3) number of such members receiving services for a period longer
than 2 years and longer than 4 years;
(4) number of such members who did not receive services within a
period of 60, 90 or 120 or more days after being enrolled;
(5) number of such members who did not receive a specific waiver
service within a period of 30, 60, 90 or 120 or more days prior to the
date such member was officially unenrolled from such waiver;
(6) amount of the per-member, per-month enhanced dollar rate
provided to a managed care organization for each member enrolled in
such waiver;
(7) total number of members enrolled in the waiver disaggregated
by county and the per capita enrollment in such waiver disaggregated
by county; and
(8) agency's progress toward new policy implementation.
(p) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 137
other purposes for which the above agency may make expenditures
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or in any special
revenue fund or funds, as authorized by this or any other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, the above agency shall
make expenditures from such moneys to establish guidelines for
nursing facilities, as defined in K.S.A. 39-923, and amendments
thereto, to request a waiver from staffing requirements and to study
establishing similar guidelines for other adult care homes, as defined in
K.S.A. 39-923, and amendments thereto: Provided, That any such
guidelines shall be compatible with rules established by the United
States centers for medicare and medicaid services.
(q) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which the above agency may make expenditures
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or in any special
revenue fund or funds, as authorized by this or any other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, the above agency shall
make expenditures from such moneys to enter into agreements with
community mental health centers for the purpose of establishing rates
for conducting mobile competency evaluations.
(r) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this
or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
moneys for the purpose of preparing a report on such agency's progress
to build capacity for crisis services for Kansans with intellectual or
developmental disability: Provided, That such report shall be submitted
to the senate committee on public health and welfare, the appropriate
subcommittee of the senate committee on ways and means, the house
of representatives committee on health and human services and the
house of representatives committee on social services budget.
(s) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this
or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
moneys during fiscal year 2026, for the purpose of reviewing the
overall costs of providing services within the intellectual and
developmental disability service system and making recommendations
to the legislature for a method to make regular rate adjustments for
such services based on inflationary indexes.
(t) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of any other statute, in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made from moneys appropriated for the
above agency from the state general fund or any special revenue fund
or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such moneys to
submit a report on how much funding goes to each community
developmental disability organization to provide services that are not
reimbursable from other funding sources, including what services are
provided and what percentage of funds go to each service to the senate
committee on ways and means human services subcommittee and the
house of representatives committee on social services budget on or
before January 12, 2026.
(u) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 138
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by
this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by such agency from such
moneys to require all assisted living facilities, residential healthcare
facilities, home plus and boarding care homes, as such terms are
defined in K.S.A. 39-923, and amendments thereto, during fiscal year
2026 to submit a report to the secretary for aging and disability services
upon the completion of every involuntary transfer or discharge of a
resident pursuant to K.A.R. 26-39-102(d) and (f): Provided, however,
That such reports shall include no personally identifiable information:
Provided further, That such report shall include: (1) The date when
notice of transfer or discharge was provided; (2) the date when the
resident left the facility; (3) the type of facility where the resident was
transferred or discharged; (4) the reason that required the transfer or
discharge of the resident pursuant to K.A.R. 26-39-102(d); (5) if the
resident was transferred or discharged pursuant to K.A.R. 26-39-102(f),
the reason that required such transfer or discharge; (6) if the resident
filed a complaint regarding the notice of transfer or discharge; and (7)
any other relevant information required by the secretary: And provided
further, That any facility that fails to submit a report within 60 days of
the completion of the transfer or discharge or resolution of a formal
complaint shall be subject to a civil penalty as provided in K.S.A. 39-
946, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That the secretary
shall establish a system and collect data from the long-term care
ombudsman and such assisted living facilities, residential healthcare
facilities, home plus and boarding care homes on any involuntary
transfers or discharges pursuant to K.A.R. 26-39-102(d) and (f): And
provided further, That the secretary shall compile all such information
and submit a report to the house of representatives committees on
social services budget, health and human services and judiciary and the
senate committees on public health and welfare and ways and means on
the first day of the 2026 regular session of the legislature.
(v) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026 for the above agency as authorized by this or other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 for
the administrative costs incurred by the community developmental
disabilities organizations: Provided however, That such administrative
costs shall not exceed 2.4% of the total amount of moneys expended
during fiscal year 2026 on any new intellectual or developmental
disability (I/DD) waiver slots added during fiscal year 2026.
(w) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026 for the secretary of the above agency, subject
to any federal reporting requirements restricting such action, to share
eligibility information with the department of health and environment
and the Kansas department for children and families concerning
program participants, including, but not limited to, any changes in
SNAP or Medicaid eligibility requirements, in order for such agencies
to accurately allow program eligibility for benefits: Provided, That such
agencies shall take immediate action on any fraudulent payments

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 139
concerning such program participants identified by the inspector
general.
(x) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year
2026 as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from such moneys to decrease the waiting list for eligible
individuals to receive home and community-based services pursuant to
the physical disability (PD) waiver to not more than 1,800 eligible
individuals: Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from such moneys to provide an estimate of the amount of
additional moneys needed by the above agency to provide home and
community-based services pursuant to the PD waiver to eligible
individuals and maintain the waiting list to not more than 1,800 eligible
individuals for fiscal years 2026 and 2027: Provided further, That such
estimate shall be submitted to the senate committees on ways and
means, public health and welfare and appropriate subcommittee of the
committee on ways and means and the house of representatives
committees on appropriations, health and human services and social
services budget on or before January 12, 2026.
(y) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year
2026 as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from such moneys to decrease the waiting list for eligible
individuals to receive home and community-based services pursuant to
the intellectual or developmental disability (I/DD) waiver to not more
than 4,000 eligible individuals: Provided, That expenditures shall be
made by the above agency from such moneys to provide an estimate of
the amount of additional moneys needed by the above agency to
provide home and community-based services pursuant to the I/DD
waiver to eligible individuals and maintain the waiting list to not more
than 4,000 eligible individuals for fiscal years 2026 and 2027:
Provided further, That such estimate shall be submitted to the senate
committees on ways and means, public health and welfare and
appropriate subcommittee of the committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committees on appropriations, health and
human services and social services budget on or before January 12,
2026.
(z) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of any statute, in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made by the Kansas department for aging
and disability services from moneys appropriated from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 by
this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
moneys to rebase the nursing rates for any person in Kansas receiving
services from a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly
administered by the above agency to an amount of 90% of the amount
that otherwise would have been paid based on KanCare long-term care
rates for fiscal year 2026.
(aa) On July 1, 2025, the $4,000,000 appropriated for the above
agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by section 84(a) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state general
fund in the certified community behavioral health clinic planning grants

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 140
account is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 90.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES
(a) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, no expenditures
shall be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2027 as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the
2025 or 2026 regular session of the legislature to utilize contract
agency nursing staff at Larned state hospital.
Sec. 91.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
CHILDREN AND FAMILIES
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $145,578,546
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 86(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the state operations (including
official hospitality) account (629-00-1000-0013), the sum of
$19,316,777 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $14,794,407
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 86(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the cash assistance account (629-
00-1000-2010), the sum of $207,780 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $7,818,235 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 86(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the vocational rehabilitation aid and assistance
account (629-00-1000-5010), the sum of $185,953 is hereby lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, of the $256,483,476
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 86(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the youth services aid and
assistance account (629-00-1000-7020), the sum of $7,116,849 is
hereby lapsed.
(e) On June 30, 2025, the secretary for children and families is
hereby authorized to certify to the director of accounts and reports the
amount of all remaining and unencumbered moneys for the purpose of
the summer ebt program appropriated for the above agency for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 86(a) of chapter 88 of the
2024 Session Laws of Kansas in the state operations (including official
hospitality) account (629-00-1000-0013), and the sum of such
remaining and unencumbered moneys is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 92.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
CHILDREN AND FAMILIES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
State operations (including
official hospitality) (629-00-1000-0013)............................$157,323,948
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state operations
(including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further,
That expenditures in an amount of not less than $375,000 shall be made
by the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to
provide for additional deaf and hard of hearing services.
Hope ranch program for women (629-00-1000-0600)..............$300,000
Provided, That on or before January 12, 2026, the hope ranch program
for women shall report to the Kansas legislature on performance

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 141
measures evaluating the program's effectiveness for fiscal year 2026.
WeKanDrive (629-00-1000-0700)..........................................$1,056,982
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the WeKanDrive
account to expand the WeKanDrive program statewide to support older
youth in foster care and young adults in obtaining their driver's license
in Kansas.
Cash assistance (629-00-1000-2010)....................................$14,699,895
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the cash assistance
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Vocational rehabilitation aid
and assistance (629-00-1000-5010)........................................$8,604,960
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the vocational
rehabilitation aid and assistance account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided
further, That expenditures may be made from this account for the
acquisition of durable medical equipment and assistive technology
devices: And provided further, That expenditures may be made from
this account by the secretary for children and families for the purchase
of workers compensation insurance for consumers of vocational
rehabilitation services and assessments at work sites and job tryout sites
throughout the state: And provided further, That expenditures in an
amount of not less than $600,000 shall be made by the above agency
from such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide a grant to an
organization for such organization to provide home-based services to
individuals of all ages who are blind or have low vision: And provided
further, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $215,000 shall
be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal year
2026 to provide a grant to an organization for such organization to
implement a pilot project to assist young adults with disabilities in
developing life skills.
Youth services aid
and assistance (629-00-1000-7020)....................................$282,237,538
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the youth services aid and
assistance account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Social welfare fund (629-00-2195-0110)....................................No limit
Project maintenance
reserve fund (629-00-2214-0150)................................................No limit
Other state fees fund (629-00-2220)............................................No limit
Disaster relief – federal fund (629-00-3005-7344)......................No limit
Child care discretionary –
federal fund (629-00-3028-0522)................................................No limit
Title IV-B promoting safe/stable families –
federal fund (629-00-3302).........................................................No limit
CSFP ccc - federal fund (629-00-3730).......................................No limit
Low-income home energy assistance –
federal fund (629-00-3305-0350)................................................No limit
Child welfare services state grants –
federal fund (629-00-3306-0341)................................................No limit
Social services block grant –
federal fund (629-00-3307-0370)................................................No limit
Commodity supp food program –
federal fund (629-00-3308-3215)................................................No limit
Social security – disability insurance –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 142
federal fund (629-00-3309-0390)................................................No limit
Supplemental nutrition assistance program –
federal fund (629-00-3311)..........................................................No limit
Emergency food assistance program –
federal fund (629-00-3313-2310)................................................No limit
Rehabilitation services – vocational rehabilitation –
federal fund (629-00-3315).........................................................No limit
Child support enforcement –
federal fund (629-00-3316).........................................................No limit
Child care and development
mandatory and matching –
federal fund (629-00-3318-0523)................................................No limit
Temporary assistance to needy families –
federal fund (629-00-3323-0530)................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $300,000
shall be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal
year 2026 to provide a grant to an organization for such organization to
provide out-of-school time support and community-based and school-
based one-to-one mentoring for youth ages six to 25.
SNAP technology project for success –
federal fund (629-00-3327-3327)................................................No limit
Title IV-E foster care –
federal fund (629-00-3337-0419)................................................No limit
Chafee education and
training vouchers program –
federal fund (629-00-3338-0425)................................................No limit
Adoption incentive payments –
federal fund (629-00-3343-0426)................................................No limit
Adoption assistance –
federal fund (629-00-3357-0418)................................................No limit
Chafee foster care independence program –
federal fund (629-00-3365-0417)................................................No limit
Headstart – federal fund (629-00-3379-6323).............................No limit
Developmental disabilities basic support –
federal fund (629-00-3380-4360)................................................No limit
Children's justice grants to states –
federal fund (629-00-3381-7320)................................................No limit
Child abuse and neglect state grants –
federal fund (629-00-3382-7210)................................................No limit
Independent living state grants –
federal fund (629-00-3387).........................................................No limit
Independent living services for older blind –
federal fund (629-00-3388-5313)................................................No limit
Supported employment for
individuals with severe disabilities –
federal fund (629-00-3389).........................................................No limit
Medical assistance program –
federal fund (629-00-3414).........................................................No limit
Children's health insurance program –
federal fund (629-00-3424-0541)................................................No limit
SNAP employment and training exchange –
federal fund (629-00-3452-3452)................................................No limit
Child-care disaster – federal fund (629-00-3597-3597)..............No limit
Randolph sheppard FRRP –
federal fund (629-00-3647-3647)................................................No limit
Low income water assistance –
federal fund (629-00-3653-3653)................................................No limit
Adult prtctve srvcs eia –
federal fund (629-00-3658-3658)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 143
SNAP pandemic ebt admin-21 –
federal fund (629-00-3661-0431)................................................No limit
SNAP summer ebt admin –
federal fund (629-00-3664-3664)................................................No limit
SNAP data grant –
federal fund (629-00-3674-3674)................................................No limit
Adult protective services crrsa21 –
federal fund (629-00-3680-3680)................................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (629-00-3756)................No limit
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $380,748
shall be made by the above agency from such fund during fiscal year
2026 to purchase 800 licenses for client management software.
Title IV-E kinship navigator –
federal fund (629-00-3712-0429)................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (629-00-3753).......................................No limit
Prevention services grant fund (629-00-3813-0428)...................No limit
SRS enterprise fund (629-00-5105).............................................No limit
Receipt suspense
clearing fund (629-00-9212-0910)..............................................No limit
Client assistance payment
clearing fund (629-00-9214-0930)..............................................No limit
Child support collections
clearing fund (629-00-9218-0970)..............................................No limit
EBT settlement fund (629-00-9219-0980)..................................No limit
CAP settlement fund (629-00-9219-0990)..................................No limit
Credit card clearing fund (629-00-9405-9400)............................No limit
SparkWheel program fund...........................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
children and families, with the approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the Kansas
department for children and families to another item of appropriation
for fiscal year 2026 from the state general fund for the Kansas
department for children and families. The secretary for children and
families shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary for
children and families, with the approval of the director of the budget
and subject to the provisions of federal grant agreements, may transfer
moneys received under a federal grant that are credited to a federal
fund of the Kansas department for children and families to another
federal fund of the Kansas department for children and families. The
secretary for children and families shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(e) On June 30, 2026, the secretary for children and families is
hereby authorized to certify to the director of accounts and reports the
amount of all remaining and unencumbered moneys for the purpose of
the summer ebt program appropriated for the above agency for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by an appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature in the state operations (including
official hospitality) account (629-00-1000-0013), and the sum of such
remaining and unencumbered moneys is hereby lapsed.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 144
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026 for the secretary of the above agency, subject
to any federal reporting requirements restricting such action, to share
eligibility information with the department of health and environment
and the Kansas department for aging and disability services concerning
program participants, including, but not limited to, any changes in
SNAP or Medicaid eligibility requirements, in order for such agencies
to accurately allow program eligibility for benefits: Provided, That such
agencies shall take immediate action on any fraudulent payments
concerning such program participants identified by the inspector
general.
(g) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 8-1,148 or 38-1808, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer $50,000 from the family and children trust
account of the family and children investment fund (652-00-7375-
7900) of the department of education to the SparkWheel program fund
of the Kansas department for children and families.
(h) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $380,748 from the
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief – federal fund (252-00-3756)
of the governor's department to the American rescue plan state relief
fund (629-00-3756) of the department for children and families.
Sec. 93.
CHILDREN'S INITIATIVES FUND
(a) There is appropriated for the Kansas department for children
and families from the children's initiatives fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Child care (629-00-2000-2406)..............................................$5,033,679
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the child care account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the department of health and
environment ‒ division of public health from the children's initiatives
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Healthy start (264-00-2000-2105)..........................................$1,660,924
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the healthy start account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Infants and toddlers program (264-00-2000-2107).................$5,800,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the infants and toddlers
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Smoking prevention (264-00-2000-2109)..............................$1,001,960
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the smoking prevention
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
SIDS network grant (264-00-2000-2115)..................................$122,106
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the SIDS network grant
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
(c) There is appropriated for the department of education from the
children's initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
Children's cabinet accountability fund (652-00-2000-2402).....$375,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the children's cabinet
accountability fund account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 145
CIF grants (652-00-2000-2408)............................................$23,720,493
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the CIF grants account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Parent education program (652-00-2000-2510)......................$9,437,635
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the parent education
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
from the parent education program account for each such grant shall be
matched by the school district in an amount that is equal to not less
than 50% of the grant.
Pre-K pilot (652-00-2000-2535).............................................$4,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the pre-K pilot account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Early childhood infrastructure (652-00-2000-2555)...............$1,419,196
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the early childhood
infrastructure account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Imagination library (652-00-2000-2560)................................$1,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the imagination library
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Childcare accelerator grants.......................................................$250,000
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $250,000
shall be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal
year 2026 for a public-private partnership for childcare facility
operations in southwestern Kansas facilitated by the children's cabinet.
Sec. 94.
KANSAS GUARDIANSHIP PROGRAM
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Kansas guardianship
program (261-00-1000-0300).................................................$1,437,932
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas guardianship
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 95.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
KPERS – school employer
contributions – non-USDs (652-00-1000-0100).....................$1,379,498
KPERS – school employer
contributions-USDs (652-00-1000-0110).............................$10,325,891
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $5,060,528
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 2(a) of chapter 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the school district juvenile
detention facilities and Flint Hills job corps center grants account (652-
00-1000-0290), the sum of $2,078,502 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $2,825,725,000
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 3(a) of chapter 98 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas
from the state general fund in the state foundation aid account (652-00-
1000-0820), the sum of $130,628,717 is hereby lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, of the $590,000,000
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 3(a) of chapter 98 of the 2023 Session Laws of Kansas

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 146
from the state general fund in the supplemental state aid account (652-
00-1000-0840), the sum of $12,706,178 is hereby lapsed.
(e) On the effective date of this act, or as soon thereafter as
moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$328 from the department of education school district capital
improvement fund to the state general fund.
(f) On the effective date of this act, the appropriation of all
moneys credited to and available in the SparkWheel program fund
(652-00-2221) of the department of education for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025, by section 2(b) of chapter 111 of the 2024 Session Laws
of Kansas is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 96.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (652-00-1000-0053)..............................$16,047,297
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Center for READing (652-00-1000-0080)...................................$80,000
Provided, That the above agency shall expend moneys in such account
to provide a project manager grant to the center for reading at Pittsburg
state university to: (1) Assist in the development and support of a
science of reading curricula for the state educational institutions and
colleges based on the knowledge and practice standards that have been
adopted by the state department of education; (2) develop and support a
recommended dyslexia textbook list for in-class learning for school
districts to use; (3) develop and support a recommended dyslexia
resources list for in-class learning for school districts to use; (4)
provide knowledge and support for a train the trainer program and
professional development curriculum for school districts to use; and (5)
provide knowledge and support for developing a list of qualified
trainers for school districts to hire.
KPERS – school employer
contributions – non-USDs (652-00-1000-0100)...................$33,881,520
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the KPERS – school
employer contributions – non-USDs account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
KPERS – school employer
contributions – USDs (652-00-1000-0110).........................$527,622,580
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the KPERS – school
employer contributions – USDs account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
ACT and workkeys assessments
program (652-00-1000-0140).................................................$2,800,000
Career and technical education
transportation state aid (652-00-1000-0190)...........................$1,482,338
Education commission of
the states (652-00-1000-0220).....................................................$67,700
School district juvenile detention
facilities and Flint Hills job corps
center grants (652-00-1000-0290)..........................................$5,060,528
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the school district
juvenile detention facilities and Flint Hills job corps center grants
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures shall be made
from the school district juvenile detention facilities and Flint Hills job
corps center grants account for grants to school districts in amounts

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 147
determined pursuant to and in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
72-1173, and amendments thereto.
School food assistance (652-00-1000-0320)...........................$2,510,486
Virtual math education
program (652-00-1000-0330).................................................$2,000,000
Provided, That expenditures from the virtual math education program
account shall be used by the above agency for the purpose of
implementing a virtual math program to be used by school districts:
Provided further, That the above agency is hereby authorized to select
and implement a virtual math program that shall be customized to
Kansas curriculum standards, be evidence-based, not impose any fee or
cost upon students, provide tutoring in multiple languages, provide
professional development for the implementation of the program and
have been implemented in other states during the preceding eight fiscal
years: And provided further, That any school district shall be authorized
to use such program: And provided further, That the above agency shall
recommend that all school districts use such program: And provided
further, That all school districts shall track and report to the above
agency twice during school year 2025-2026, as determined by the
above agency, on the number of attendance centers and students who
are and are not using such program or other virtual math program, the
number of teachers participating in the professional development
provided by such program or other virtual math program and the effect
of any such virtual math program on student academic proficiency: And
provided further, That the above agency shall compile such reports and
submit a summary report to the house of representatives standing
committee on K-12 education budget and the senate standing
committee on education during the 2026 regular session of the
legislature: And provided further, That such report shall include all
available information reported to the above agency for school year
2025-2026.
Special education services aid (652-00-1000-0700).............$10,000,000
Provided, That, when reporting and publishing the district-level excess
costs pursuant to K.S.A. 72-3422a(c), and amendments thereto, the
above agency shall ensure that each such report and publication
includes each individual school district's excess costs percentage and
specific dollar amount.
Educable deaf-blind and severely handicapped
children's programs aid (652-00-1000-0630).............................$110,000
Childcare accelerator grants....................................................$1,000,000
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $1,000,000
shall be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal
year 2026 for a public-private partnership for childcare facility
operations in southwestern Kansas facilitated by the children's cabinet.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law and transfers to other state agencies shall not exceed the
following:
School district capital improvement fund....................................No limit
School district capital outlay state aid fund.................................No limit
Educational technology
coordinator fund (652-00-2157)..................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the educational technology
coordinator fund of the department of education to provide data on the
number of school districts served and cost savings for those districts in
fiscal year 2026 in order to assess the cost effectiveness of the position

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 148
of the educational technology coordinator.
Inservice education workshop
fee fund (652-00-2230)................................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the inservice education
workshop fee fund for operating expenditures, including official
hospitality, incurred for inservice workshops and conferences:
Provided further, That the state board of education is hereby authorized
to fix, charge and collect fees for inservice workshops and conferences:
And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover
all or part of such operating expenditures incurred for inservice
workshops and conferences: And provided further, That all fees
received for inservice workshops and conferences shall be deposited in
the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the inservice
education workshop fee fund.
Federal indirect cost
reimbursement fund (652-00-2312).............................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (652-00-2420)....................................................No limit
School bus safety fund (652-00-2532)........................................No limit
State safety fund (652-00-2538)..................................................No limit
Provided, That notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 8-272, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, funds shall be distributed
during fiscal year 2026 as soon as moneys are available.
Motorcycle safety fund (652-00-2633)........................................No limit
Teacher and administrator
fee fund (652-00-2723)................................................................No limit
Service clearing fund (652-00-2869)...........................................No limit
NAEP fee fund (652-00-2888)....................................................No limit
ARPA supplemental (652-00-3028).............................................No limit
Reimbursement for
services fund (652-00-3056)........................................................No limit
ESSA – student support academic enrichment –
federal fund (652-00-3113)..........................................................No limit
Educationally deprived
children – state operations –
federal fund (652-00-3131).........................................................No limit
Food assistance –
federal fund (652-00-3230).........................................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school aid –
federal fund (652-00-3233).........................................................No limit
Education of handicapped children
fund – federal (652-00-3234)......................................................No limit
Community-based
child abuse prevention –
federal fund (652-00-3319).........................................................No limit
TANF children's programs –
federal fund (652-00-3323).........................................................No limit
21st century community learning centers –
federal fund (652-00-3519).........................................................No limit
State assessments –
federal fund (652-00-3520).........................................................No limit
Rural and low-income schools program –
federal fund (652-00-3521).........................................................No limit
Language assistance state grants –
federal fund (652-00-3522).........................................................No limit
State grants for improving teacher quality –
federal fund (652-00-3526).........................................................No limit
State grants for improving

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 149
teacher quality – federal fund –
state operations (652-00-3527)....................................................No limit
Food assistance – school
breakfast program –
federal fund (652-00-3529).........................................................No limit
Food assistance – national
school lunch program –
federal fund (652-00-3530).........................................................No limit
Food assistance – child
and adult care food program –
federal fund (652-00-3531).........................................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school aid –
federal fund – local education
agency fund (652-00-3532).........................................................No limit
Education of handicapped
children fund – state operations –
federal fund (652-00-3534).........................................................No limit
Education of handicapped
children fund – preschool –
federal fund (652-00-3535).........................................................No limit
Education of handicapped
children fund – preschool state
operations – federal (652-00-3536).............................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school
aid – federal fund – migrant
education fund (652-00-3537).....................................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school aid –
federal fund – migrant education –
state operations (652-00-3538)....................................................No limit
Vocational education title II –
federal fund (652-00-3539).........................................................No limit
Vocational education title II – federal fund –
state operations (652-00-3540)....................................................No limit
Educational research grants and
projects fund (652-00-3592)........................................................No limit
ARPA agency state fiscal
recovery fund (652-00-3756).......................................................No limit
ARPA capital projects fund (652-00-3761).................................No limit
Local school district contribution program
checkoff fund (652-00-7005).......................................................No limit
Provided, That notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 79-3221n, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, any moneys in such fund where a taxpayer fails to
designate a unified school district on such taxpayer's individual income
tax return may be expended by the above agency to distribute to unified
school districts.
Governor's teaching excellence
scholarships program
repayment fund (652-00-7221)....................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the governor's teaching excellence
scholarships program repayment fund shall be made in accordance with
K.S.A. 72-2166, and amendments thereto: Provided further, That each
such grant shall be required to be matched on a $1-for-$1 basis from
nonstate sources: And provided further, That award of each such grant
shall be conditioned upon the recipient entering into an agreement
requiring the grant to be repaid if the recipient fails to complete the
course of training under the national board for professional teaching
standards certification program: And provided further, That all moneys
received by the department of education for repayment of grants made

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 150
under the governor's teaching excellence scholarships program shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
governor's teaching excellence scholarships program repayment fund.
Private donations, gifts, grants and
bequests fund (652-00-7307).......................................................No limit
Family and children
investment fund (652-00-7375)...................................................No limit
(c) On March 30, 2026, and June 30, 2026, or as soon thereafter as
moneys are available, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 8-267
or 8-272, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer $550,000 from the state safety fund
(652-00-2538-2030) to the state general fund: Provided, That the
transfer of such amount shall be in addition to any other transfer from
the state safety fund to the state general fund as prescribed by law:
Provided further, That the amount transferred from the state safety fund
to the state general fund pursuant to this subsection is to reimburse the
state general fund for accounting, auditing, budgeting, legal, payroll,
personnel and purchasing services and any other governmental services
that are performed on behalf of the department of education by other
state agencies that receive appropriations from the state general fund to
provide such services.
(d) On July 1, 2025, and quarterly thereafter, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer $93,750 from the state highway fund
(276-00-4100-4100) of the department of transportation to the school
bus safety fund (652-00-2532-2300) of the department of education.
(e) On July 1, 2025, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer an amount certified by the commissioner of education from the
motorcycle safety fund (652-00-2633-2050) of the department of
education to the motorcycle safety fund (561-00-2366-2360) of the
state board of regents: Provided, That the amount to be transferred shall
be determined by the commissioner of education based on the amounts
required to be paid pursuant to K.S.A. 8-272(b)(2), and amendments
thereto.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $70,000 from the
USAC E-rate program federal fund (561-00-3920-3920) of the state
board of regents to the education technology coordinator fund (652-00-
2157-2157) of the department of education.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the commissioner
of education, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from
the state general fund for the department of education to another item
of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state general fund for the
department of education. The commissioner of education shall certify
each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(h) There is appropriated for the above agency from the expanded
lottery act revenues fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
KPERS – school employer
contribution (652-00-1700-1700).........................................$41,427,779
Provided, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the amount
appropriated from the expanded lottery act revenues fund in the
KPERS – school employer contribution account (652- 00-1700-1700)
for the department of education shall be for the purpose of reducing the
unfunded actuarial liability of the Kansas public employees retirement
system attributable to the state of Kansas and participating employers

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 151
under K.S.A. 74-4931, and amendments thereto, in accordance with
K.S.A. 74-8768, and amendments thereto.
(i) On July 1, 2025, of the $3,027,848,697 appropriated for the
above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by section 3(a)
of chapter 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the state foundation aid account (652-00-1000-0820),
the sum of $156,085,651 is hereby lapsed.
(j) On July 1, 2025, of the $601,800,000 appropriated for the
above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by section 3(a)
of chapter 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state
general fund in the supplemental state aid account (652-00-1000-0840),
the sum of $4,000,000 is hereby lapsed.
(k) There is appropriated for the above agency from the Kansas
endowment for youth fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
Children's cabinet administration (652-00-7000-7001).............$285,059
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the children's cabinet
administration account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(l) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by
chapters 110 and 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from such moneys for
fiscal year 2026 for the above agency to expand current contracted
efforts to train elementary school teachers, including middle school
teachers, in order to assist students who have not reached grade-level
literacy competency: Provided, That the legislature encourages the
above agency to make such expenditures for fiscal year 2026.
(m) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by
chapters 110 and 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures in an amount of not less than $500,000 shall be made by
the above agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to provide the
state match for the e-rate program.
(n) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by
chapters 110 and 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures in an amount of not to exceed $2,000,000 shall be made
by the above agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to develop
and issue a request for proposal and select a provider for a
supplemental American history online curriculum: Provided, That such
curriculum shall include history lessons, reporting tools and
professional development for educators: Provided further, That the
above agency shall submit a report concerning the implementation,
student engagement and learning outcomes for such curriculum to the
house of representatives standing committees on appropriations and
education and the senate standing committees on ways and means and
education on or before January 12, 2026.
(o) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 152
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by
chapters 110 and 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures in an amount of not less than $320,000 shall be made by
the above agency from such moneys during fiscal year 2026 to provide
for the development and implementation of a pilot program that uses
virtual reality technology to introduce youth in grades 6 through 8 to
career opportunities and assists them with career planning, including
support for developing individual plans of study that guide their high
school curriculum: Provided, That the pilot program shall be
administered through the department of education and implemented by
the Kansas youth career discovery partners: Provided further, That
expenditures from such moneys for the pilot program shall require a
match of nonstate or private moneys on the basis of $1 of nonstate or
private moneys to $2 of state moneys.
(p) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 as authorized by
chapters 110 and 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or any
other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures in an amount of not less than $1,258,000 shall be made by
the above agency from such moneys during fiscal year 2026 to provide
for student success through the SparkWheel program.
(q) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this
or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
moneys during fiscal year 2026, for a payment in the amount of
$354,500 to central plains unified school district no. 112 for 500
compliant adult virtual school credits that were submitted for funding
in the 2021-2022 school year.
(r) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of K.S.A. 72-3123, and amendments thereto, or any
other statute, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 as authorized by chapters 110 and 111 of the 2024 Session
Laws of Kansas, this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 for a foreign exchange
student who resides with a host family in a school district to be
permitted to enroll in and attend such school district as if the student is
a resident of the school district: Provided, That any such foreign
exchange student shall not be excluded from enrolling in and attending
school in such school district and subject to the open-seat lottery.
(s) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, to identify and certify to the director of
accounts and reports, in consultation with the director of the budget,
moneys in the state foundation aid account (652-00-1000-0820) that are

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 153
identified as the moneys from the consumer price increase for base
state aid per pupil pursuant to K.S.A. 72-5132, and amendments
thereto, in an amount of $1,500,000 to be used for school safety and
security grants: Provided, That at the same time as the above agency
transmits such certification to the director of accounts and reports, the
above agency shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director
of legislative research and the director of the budget: Provided further,
That expenditures in an amount of not less than $250,000 shall be made
by the above agency from such identified moneys in such account
during fiscal year 2026 to provide grants to school districts for
instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external
defibrillator use through the health education curriculum in
kindergarten or any of the grades one through 12 or similar nonpublic
school curriculum: And provided further, That expenditures in an
amount of not less than $1,000,000 shall be made by the above agency
from such identified moneys in such account during fiscal year 2026 to
provide grants to school districts for the purchase of automated external
defibrillators and necessary maintenance equipment: And provided
further, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $125,000 shall
be made by the above agency from such identified moneys in such
account during fiscal year 2026 to provide grants to accredited
nonpublic schools for instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and
automated external defibrillator use: And provided further, That
expenditures in an amount of not less than $125,000 shall be made by
the above agency from such identified moneys in such account during
fiscal year 2026 to provide grants to accredited nonpublic schools for
the purchase of automated external defibrillators and necessary
maintenance equipment.
Sec. 97.
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the following:
State foundation aid (652-00-1000-0820)........................$2,921,724,116
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state foundation aid
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2027.
Supplemental state aid (652-00-1000-0840).......................$637,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the supplemental state aid
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2027.
Special education services aid (652-00-1000-0700)...........$611,018,818
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the special education
services aid account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2026, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2027: Provided further, That expenditures
shall not be made from the special education services aid account for
the provision of instruction for any homebound or hospitalized child,
unless the categorization of such child as exceptional is conjoined with
the categorization of the child within one or more of the other
categories of exceptionality: And provided further, That expenditures
shall be made from this account for grants to school districts in
amounts determined pursuant to and in accordance with the provisions
of K.S.A. 72-3425, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made from the amount remaining in this account,
after deduction of the expenditures specified in the foregoing provisos,
for payments to school districts in amounts determined pursuant to and
in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 72-3422, and amendments
thereto: And provided further, That, when reporting and publishing the
district-level excess costs pursuant to K.S.A. 72-3422a(c), and
amendments thereto, the above agency shall ensure that each such

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 154
report and publication includes each individual school district's excess
costs percentage and specific dollar amount.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law and transfers to other state agencies shall not exceed the
following:
State school district finance fund (652-00-7393)........................No limit
Mineral production
education fund (652-00-7669-7669)............................................No limit
Sec. 98.
STATE LIBRARY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (434-00-1000-0300)..........................$1,564,477
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the operating expenditures account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $755.
Grants to libraries and library systems – grants
in aid (434-00-1000-0410)......................................................$1,321,717
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the grants to libraries and
library systems – grants in aid account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Grants to libraries and library systems – interlibrary
loan development (434-00-1000-0420)..................................$1,133,729
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the grants to libraries and
library systems – interlibrary loan development account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Grants to libraries and library systems – talking
book services (434-00-1000-0430)............................................$493,438
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the grants to libraries and
library systems – talking book services account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Blind information
access program (434-00-1000-0500)...........................................$95,399
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the blind information
access program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
State library fund (434-00-2076-2500)........................................No limit
Federal library services and technology
act – fund (434-00-3257-3000)....................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (434-00-3753).......................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal
relief – federal fund (434-00-3756).............................................No limit
Grants and gifts fund (434-00-7304-7000)..................................No limit
Sec. 99.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Extended school year program (604-00-1000-0400)...................$41,738
Sec. 100.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 155
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (604-00-1000-0303)..........................$7,620,575
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the operating expenditures account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Extended school
year program (604-00-1000-0400).............................................$550,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the extended school year
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Arts for the handicapped (604-00-1000-0502)..........................$133,847
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Local services
reimbursement fund (604-00-2088).............................................No limit
Provided, That the Kansas state school for the blind is hereby
authorized to assess and collect a fee of 20% of the total cost of
services provided to local school districts: Provided further, That all
moneys received from such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury
in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the local services reimbursement fund.
General fees fund (604-00-2093)................................................No limit
Student activity
fees fund (604-00-2146)..............................................................No limit
Chapter I handicapped FDF –
federal fund (604-00-3039).........................................................No limit
Special education state grants –
federal fund (604-00-3234).........................................................No limit
School breakfast program –
federal fund (604-00-3529).........................................................No limit
Federal school lunch –
federal fund (604-00-3530).........................................................No limit
Child and adult care food program –
federal fund (604-00-3531).........................................................No limit
Safe schools – federal fund (604-00-3569).................................No limit
Deaf-blind project –
federal fund (604-00-3583).........................................................No limit
Summer food service program –
federal fund (604-00-3591).........................................................No limit
ESSER II federal fund (604-00-3638)........................................ No limit
American rescue plan – state relief –
federal fund (604-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Education improvement –
federal fund (604-00-3898).........................................................No limit
Gift fund (604-00-7329-5100).....................................................No limit
Special bequest fund (604-00-7333)............................................No limit
Sec. 101.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Operating expenditures (610-00-1000-0303).............................$156,164
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $387,565 appropriated

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 156
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 94(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the language assessment program account
(367-00-1000-0220), the sum of $156,164 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 102.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (610-00-1000-0303)........................$11,951,017
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the operating expenditures account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $2,000: Provided further, That expenditures
in an amount of not less than $300,000 shall be made by the above
agency from such account for fiscal year 2026 for classroom resource
teachers.
Language assessment program...................................................$399,652
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the language assessment
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Classroom resource teachers......................................................$300,000
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Local services
reimbursement fund (610-00-2091-2200)...................................No limit
Provided, That the Kansas state school for the deaf is hereby authorized
to assess and collect a fee of 20% of the total cost of services provided
to local school districts: Provided further, That all moneys received
from such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and
shall be credited to the local services reimbursement fund.
General fees fund (610-00-2094)................................................No limit
Student activity fees fund (610-00-2147)....................................No limit
Language assessment fee fund (610-00-2891)............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the language
assessment fee fund for operating expenditures to implement a fee-for-
service model to fund the implementation of a language assessment
program for children ages three through eight: Provided further, That
the above agency is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees
from unified school districts, special education cooperatives and
interlocals to fund the operations of the language assessment program
authorized pursuant to K.S.A. 75-5397e, and amendments thereto: And
provided further, That all fees received for such programs shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
language assessment fee fund: And provided further, That all
expenditures from the language assessment fee fund shall be only for
the operations of the language assessment program.
Special education state grants –
federal fund (610-00-3234).........................................................No limit
Universal newborn screening –
federal fund (610-00-3459).........................................................No limit
School breakfast program –
federal fund (610-00-3529).........................................................No limit
School lunch program –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 157
federal fund (610-00-3530).........................................................No limit
Special education preschool grants –
federal fund (610-00-3535).........................................................No limit
Summer food service program –
federal fund (610-00-3591).........................................................No limit
Elementary and secondary school emergency
relief – federal fund (610-00-3638).............................................No limit
COVID-19 federal relief fund –
federal fund (610-00-3649).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan – state relief –
federal fund (604-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Special bequest fund (610-00-7321)............................................No limit
Gift fund (610-00-7330)..............................................................No limit
Special workshop fund (610-00-7504)........................................No limit
Sec. 103.
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Quindaro ruins archaeological park task force.............................$40,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such moneys during fiscal years 2025 and 2026 to establish the
Quindaro ruins archaeological park task force: Provided further, That
the task force shall be appointed as follows: A member of the
legislature appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, a
member of the legislature appointed by the president of the senate, a
member of the legislature appointed by the minority leader of the house
of representatives, a member of the legislature appointed by the
minority leader of the senate, a member appointed by the executive
director of the state historical society, a member appointed by the
governor, a member representing the unified government appointed by
the unified government of Wyandotte county Kansas city, Kansas, a
member appointed by the African methodist episcopal church and a
member appointed by the unified government of Wyandotte county
Kansas city, Kansas, representing the Young memorial church of God
in Christ: And provided further, That the speaker of the house of
representatives shall appoint the chairperson of the task force: And
provided further, That the task force shall convene stakeholders
involved in the Quindaro ruins archaeological park for the purpose of
collaboration and delineation of roles, responsibilities, timelines and
goals concerning renovations and developments to the Quindaro ruins
archaeological park: And provided further, That the task force shall: (1)
Clarify the boundaries and property ownership of the Quindaro ruins
archaeological park area; (2) recommend and assist in the preparation
of any memorandums of understanding for the interested parties
concerning the relationship between property owners and development
agreements of the area; (3) research and record all state and federal
opportunities for the area, including proposals for submission of state
and federal historic designations; (4) review and provide an accounting
of all private grants, gifts, contributions and bequests and state, federal
and local funding; (5) share, review and consolidate any existing plans
and reach an agreement by the stakeholders on a plan moving forward:
And provided further, That the above agency shall provide assistance as
may be requested by the task force: And provided further, That each
member of the task force attending a meeting so authorized shall be
paid compensation, subsistence allowances, mileage and other expenses
as provided in K.S.A. 75-3223, and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That the task force shall submit such plan and report to the
house of representatives committee on appropriations and the senate
committee on ways and means on or before January 12, 2026.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 158
Sec. 104.
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (288-00-1000-0083)..........................$5,027,001
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the operating expenditures account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Humanities Kansas (288-00-1000-0600).....................................$50,501
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts as of June 30,
2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Quindaro ruins
archaeological park task force.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (288-00-2047-2300).......................................No limit
Records center fee fund (288-00-2132-2100).............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the records center fee
fund for operating expenses for state records and for the trusted digital
repository for electronic government records.
Museum and historic sites visitor
donation fund (288-00-2142-2250).............................................No limit
Historic properties fund (288-00-2144-2400).............................No limit
Historic properties fee fund (288-00-2164-2310).......................No limit
Insurance collection replacement/
reimbursement fund (288-00-2182-2320)...................................No limit
State historical society
facilities fund (288-00-2192-2420).............................................No limit
Land survey fee fund (288-00-2234-2330).................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 58-2011, and
amendments thereto, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the land survey fee fund for the fiscal year 2026 for operating
expenditures that are not related to administering the land survey
program.
Microfilm fees fund (288-00-2246-2370)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the microfilm fees fund
for operating expenses for providing imaging services: Provided
further, That the state historical society is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect fees for the sale of such services: And provided
further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of
the operating expenses incurred in providing imaging services: And
provided further, That all fees received for such services shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
microfilm fees fund.
Property sale proceeds fund (288-00-2414-2500).......................No limit
Provided, That proceeds from the sale of property pursuant to K.S.A.
75-2701, and amendments thereto, shall be deposited in the state
treasury and credited to the property sale proceeds fund.
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (288-00-2436-2700)..........................................No limit
Archeology fee fund (288-00-2638-2350)..................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the archeology fee
fund for operating expenses for providing archeological services by
contract: Provided further, That the state historical society is hereby

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 159
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for the sale of such services:
And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover
all or part of the operating expenses incurred in providing archeological
services by contract: And provided further, That all fees received for
such services shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the archeology fee fund.
Kansas historic site fund (288-00-2872).....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such fund during fiscal year 2026 to distribute to state-owned historic
sites in accordance with the selections of taxpayers for the purpose of
the operation, maintenance and preservation of such site pursuant to
K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3221q, and amendments thereto.
Historic preservation overhead
fees fund (288-00-2916-2380).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the historic preservation overhead
fees fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Archeology federal fund (288-00-3083-3110)............................No limit
National historic preservation act
fund – local (288-00-3089-3000)................................................No limit
Highway planning/
construction fund (288-00-3333-3333).......................................No limit
National trails fund (288-00-3553-3353)....................................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal
relief – federal fund (288-00-3756).............................................No limit
Native American graves protection and
repatriation fund (288-00-3903-3903).........................................No limit
National archives and records fund.............................................No limit
Save America's
treasures fund (288-00-3923-4000).............................................No limit
National endowment for the
humanities fund (288-00-3925-3925)..........................................No limit
Private gifts, grants and
bequests fund (288-00-7302-7000).............................................No limit
Law enforcement
memorial fund (288-00-7344-7300)............................................No limit
Heritage trust fund (288-00-7379-7600).....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the heritage trust fund for state
operations shall not exceed $120,354.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-2721, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from the state general fund or from
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 to fix admission fees at constitution hall in Lecompton,
Kansas, at $3 per adult single admission, $1 per student single
admission, $2 per student for guided tours and $3 per adult for guided
tours: Provided, however, That such admission fees may be increased
by the above agency during fiscal year 2026 if all moneys from such
admission fees are invested in constitution hall and the total amount of
such admission fees exceeds the amount of the Lecompton historical
society's constitution hall promotional expenses as determined by the
average of such promotional expenses for the preceding three calendar
years: Provided further, That the state historical society may request
annual financial statements from the Lecompton historical society for
the purpose of calculating such three-year average of promotional

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 160
expenses.
Sec. 105.
FORT HAYS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (246-00-1000-0013)..............................$41,646,637
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Master's-level
nursing capacity (246-00-1000-0100)........................................$147,668
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the master's-level nursing
capacity account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas wetlands education center at
Cheyenne bottoms (246-00-1000-0200)....................................$275,928
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas wetlands
education center at Cheyenne bottoms account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas academy of math
and science (246-00-1000-0300)...............................................$785,253
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas academy of
math and science account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (246-00-1000-0350)................$3,537,490
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for
financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Regional stabilization (246-00-1000-0400)............................$3,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the regional stabilization
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Western Kansas nursing workforce
development instruction (246-00-1000-0700)...........................$400,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the western Kansas
nursing workforce development instruction account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Telehealth certification for mental
health providers (246-00-1000-0600) .......................................$250,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the telehealth
certification for mental health providers account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Fort
Hays state university professional workforce development (246-00-
1000-0340).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (246-00-2035-2000).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may
be made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Oil and gas royalties fund (246-00-2036-2010)..........................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (246-00-2471-2400)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (246-00-2510-2040)....................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 161
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the
following accounts: Special events; technology equipment; Gross
coliseum services; capital improvements; performing arts center
services; farm income; choral music clinic; yearbook; off-campus
tours; memorial union activities; student activity (unallocated); tiger
media; conferences, clinics and workshops – noncredit; summer
laboratory school; little theater; library services; student affairs; speech
and debate; student government; counseling center services; interest on
local funds; student identification cards; nurse education programs;
athletics; placement fees; virtual college classes; speech and hearing;
child care services for dependent students; computer services;
interactive television contributions; midwestern student exchange;
departmental receipts for all sales, refunds and other collections not
specifically enumerated above: Provided, however, That the state board
of regents, with the approval of the state finance council acting on this
matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative
delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-
3711c(c), and amendments thereto, may amend or change this list of
restricted fees: Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
appropriate account of the restricted fees fund and shall be used solely
for the specific purpose or purposes for which collected: And provided
further, That expenditures may be made from this fund to purchase
insurance for equipment purchased through research and training grants
only if such grants include money for and authorize the purchase of
such insurance: And provided further, That all amounts of tuition
received from students participating in the midwestern student
exchange program shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and
shall be credited to the midwestern student exchange account of the
restricted fees fund: And provided further, That expenditures may be
made from the restricted fees fund for official hospitality.
Commencement fees fund (246-00-2511-2050)..........................No limit
Kansas career work study
program fund (246-00-2548-2060)..............................................No limit
Institutional overhead fund (246-00-2900-2070)........................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (246-00-2914-2080).............................................No limit
Economic opportunity act –
federal fund (246-00-3034-3000)................................................No limit
University federal fund (246-00-3141-3140)..............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the university federal fund to purchase insurance for equipment
purchased through research and training grants only if such grants
include money for and authorize the purchase of such insurance:
Provided further, That expenditures may be made by the above agency
from such fund to procure a policy of accident, personal liability and
excess automobile liability insurance insuring volunteers participating
in the senior companion program against loss in accordance with
specifications of federal grant guidelines as provided in K.S.A. 75-
4101, and amendments thereto.
Education opportunity act –
federal fund (246-00-3394-3500)................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (246-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (246-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (246-00-3756).........................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 162
Health fees fund (246-00-5101-5000).........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the health fees fund may be made for
the purchase of medical malpractice liability coverage for individuals
employed on the medical staff, including pharmacists and physical
therapists, at the student health center.
Student union fees fund (246-00-5102-5010).............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the student union fees
fund for official hospitality.
Housing system
revenue fund (246-00-5103-5020)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the housing system
revenue fund for official hospitality.
Parking fees fund (246-00-5185-5050).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fees fund
for a capital improvement project for parking lot improvements.
Housing system
suspense fund (246-00-5707-5090).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (246-00-6000)...........................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Computer services, storeroom for official supplies
including office supplies, paper products, janitorial supplies, printing
and duplicating, carpool, postage, copy center, and telecommunications
and such other internal service activities as are authorized by the state
board of regents under K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Kansas distinguished
scholarship fund (246-00-7204-7000).........................................No limit
Federal Perkins student
loan fund (246-00-7501-7050)....................................................No limit
Nine month payroll clearing
account fund (246-00-7709-7060)...............................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (246-00-9013-9400).............................No limit
Federal receipts
suspense fund (246-00-9105-9410).............................................No limit
Suspense fund (246-00-9134-9420)............................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (246-00-9136-9430)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (246-00-9163-9440)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (246-00-9197-9450)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (246-00-9220-9200)..............................................No limit
University payroll fund (246-00-9800).......................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount specified
by the president of Fort Hays state university of not to exceed $125,000
from the general fees fund (246-00-2035-2000) to the federal Perkins
student loan fund (246-00-7501-7050).
Sec. 106.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $2,200,000 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 100(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the biosecurity research account (367-00-1000-
0220), $3,900 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, the amount of the $3,100,000
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 100(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the pure imagination facility

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 163
(Kansas advanced immersive research for emerging systems center)
account (367-00-1000-0240) is hereby lapsed.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Crime victim assistance –
federal fund (367-00-3260).........................................................No limit
Sec. 107.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (367-00-1000-0003)............................$117,412,263
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas state university Salina (including
official hospitality) (367-00-1000-0150)................................$9,465,238
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas state
university polytechnic campus (including official hospitality) account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated to the
Kansas state university Salina (including official hospitality) account
for fiscal year 2026.
Midwest institute for comparative stem
cell biology (367-00-1000-0170)...............................................$127,178
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the midwest institute for
comparative stem cell biology account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Global food systems (367-00-1000-0190)..............................$5,144,062
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the global food systems
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all moneys in the global
food systems account expended for fiscal year 2026 shall be matched
by Kansas state university on a $1-for-$1 basis from other moneys of
Kansas state university: And provided further, That Kansas state
university shall submit a plan to the house committee on
appropriations, the senate committee on ways and means and the
governor as to how the global food systems-related activities create
additional jobs in the state and other economic value, particularly for
and with the private sector, for fiscal year 2026.
Biomanufacturing institute (367-00-1000-0200)....................$5,011,678
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the biomanufacturing
institute account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all
expenditures for the biomanufacturing institute shall require a match of
local nonstate or private moneys on a $1-for-$1 basis.
Biosecurity research................................................................$2,191,600
Water wide institute.................................................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water wide institute
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures shall be made
by the above agency from such account to submit a plan and report on
the goals, accomplishments and return on investment regarding the
state's vital interests in water quality and quantity to the house of
representatives committee on appropriations, the senate committee on
ways and means and the governor on or before January 12, 2026.
Student aid for financial need (367-00-1000-0350)................$3,949,980
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 164
financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas state university college of aviation jet (367-00-1000-0360)
.................................................................................................$1,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas state
university college of aviation jet account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Central immersive training hub account (367-00-1000-0370):
Provided, That all expenditures shall be made by the above agency
from the central immersive training hub account for the central
immersive training hub at the Kansas state university Salina campus.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Animal health
research fund (367-00-2053-2053)..............................................No limit
National bio agro-defense
facility fund (367-00-2058-2058)................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the national bio agro-defense
facility fund shall be approved by the president of Kansas state
university.
General fees fund (367-00-2062-2000).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may
be made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Kan-grow engineering
fund – KSU (367-00-2154-2154)................................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (367-00-2472-2500)............................................No limit
State emergency fund –
building repair (367-00-2451-2451)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (367-00-2520-2080)....................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the
following accounts: Technology equipment; flight services;
communications and marketing; computer services; copy centers;
standardized test fees; placement center; recreational services; Kansas
state university Salina; motor pool; music; professorships; student
activities fees; biology sales and services; chemistry; field camps;
physics storeroom; sponsored research, sponsored instruction,
sponsored public service, equipment and facility grants; contract-post
office; library collections; sponsored construction or improvement
projects; attorney, educational and personal development; human
capital services; student financial assistance; application for
undergraduate programs; speech and hearing; gifts; human
development and family research and training; college of education –
publications and services; guaranteed student loan application
processing; auditorium receipts; catalog sales; interagency consulting;
sales and services of educational programs; transcript fees; facility use
fees; college of health and human sciences storeroom; college of health
and human sciences sales; application for post baccalaureate programs;
art exhibit fees; college of education – Kansas careers; foreign student
application fee; student union repair and replacement reserve;
departmental receipts for all sales, refunds and other collections;
institutional support fee; miscellaneous renovations – construction;
speech receipts; art museum; exchange program; flight training lab
fees; administrative reimbursements; parking fees; printing; short

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 165
courses and conferences; student government association receipts; late
registration fee; engineering equipment fee; architecture equipment fee;
biotechnology facility; English language program; international
programs; Bramlage coliseum; planning and analysis;
telecommunications; comparative medicine; Marlatt memorial park;
departmental student organization receipts; other specifically
designated receipts not available for general operations of the
university: Provided, however, That the state board of regents, with the
approval of the state finance council acting on this matter, which is
hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to
the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments
thereto, may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided
further, That all restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate account of the restricted
fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific purpose or purposes
for which collected: And provided further, That expenditures from the
restricted fees fund may be made for the purchase of insurance for
operation and testing of completed project aircraft and for operation of
aircraft used in professional pilot training, including coverage for
public liability, physical damage, medical payments and voluntary
settlement coverages: And provided further, That expenditures may be
made from this fund for official hospitality.
Kansas career work study
program fund (367-00-2540-2090)..............................................No limit
Interest bearing grants fund (367-00-2630-2630).......................No limit
Provided, That, on or before the 10th day of each month commencing
during fiscal year 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer from the state general fund to the interest bearing grants fund
interest earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance in the interest
bearing grants fund for the preceding month; and (2) the net earnings
rate for the pooled money investment portfolio for the preceding
month.
Sponsored research
overhead fund (367-00-2901-2160).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the sponsored research
overhead fund for official hospitality.
University federal fund (367-00-3142)........................................No limit
Crime victim assistance –
federal fund (367-00-3260).........................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (367-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (367-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (367-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Federal award advance payment –
U.S. department of education
awards fund (367-00-3855-3350)................................................No limit
Student health fees fund (367-00-5109-4410).............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the student health fees fund may be
made for the purchase of medical malpractice liability coverage for
individuals employed on the medical staff, including pharmacists and
physical therapists, at the student health center.
Salina student life center
revenue fund (367-00-5111-5120)...............................................No limit
Salina – student union
fees fund (367-00-5114-4420).....................................................No limit
Salina – housing system
revenue fund (367-00-5117-4430)...............................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 166
Child care facility
revenue fund (367-00-5125-5101)...............................................No limit
Housing system operations fund (367-00-5163).........................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the housing system
operations fund for official hospitality.
Parking fees fund (367-00-5181).................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fees fund
for capital improvement projects for parking improvements.
Student union renovation expansion
revenue fund (367-00-5191-4650)...............................................No limit
Housing system repair, equipment and
improvement fund (367-00-5641-4740)......................................No limit
Coliseum system repair, equipment and
improvement fund (367-00-5642-4750)......................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (367-00-5708-4830).............................................No limit
Salina – housing system
suspense fund (367-00-5724-4890).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (367-00-6003-7000).................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Supplies stores; telecommunications services;
photographic services; K-State printing services; postage; facilities
services; facilities carpool; public safety services; facility planning
services; facilities storeroom; computing services; and such other
internal service activities as are authorized by the state board of regents
under K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Interest on endowment fund (367-00-7100-7200).......................No limit
Scholarship funds fund (367-00-7201-7210)..............................No limit
Kansas comprehensive
grant fund (367-00-7223-7300)...................................................No limit
Perkins student loan fund (367-00-7506-7260)...........................No limit
State agricultural
university fund (367-00-7400-7250)...........................................No limit
Nine month payroll
clearing fund (367-00-7710-7270)..............................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (367-00-9020-9300).............................No limit
Temp dep fund
external source (367-00-9065-9305)...........................................No limit
Business procurement card
clearing fund (367-00-9102-9400)..............................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (367-00-9137-9310)..............................................No limit
Suspense fund (367-00-9146-9320)............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (367-00-9164-9330)..............................................No limit
Fed ext emp clearing fund –
employee deduct (367-00-9182-9340)........................................No limit
Fed ext emp clearing fund –
employer deduct (367-00-9183-9350).........................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (367-00-9186-9360)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (367-00-9221-9200)..............................................No limit
Payroll clearing fund (367-00-9801-9000)..................................No limit
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Kansas state university (367-00).................................................No limit
Sec. 108.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY EXTENSION SYSTEMS
AND AGRICULTURE RESEARCH PROGRAMS

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 167
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Cooperative extension service (including
official hospitality) (369-00-1000-1020)..............................$21,863,222
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the cooperative extension
service (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Agricultural experiment stations (including
official hospitality) (369-00-1000-1030)..............................$35,013,049
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the agricultural
experiment stations (including official hospitality) account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Wildfire suppression/state forest service (369-00-1000-1040)..$699,973
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the wildfire
suppression/state forest service account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Restricted fees fund (369-00-2697-1100)....................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the
following accounts: Plant pathology; Kansas artificial breeding service
unit; technology equipment; professorships; agricultural experiment
station, director's office; agronomy – Ashland farm; KSU agricultural
research center – Hays; KSU southeast agricultural research center;
KSU southwest research extension center; agronomy – general;
agronomy – experimental field crop sales; entomology sales; grain
science and industry – Kansas state university; food and nutrition
research; extension services and publication; sponsored construction or
improvement projects; gifts; comparative medicine; sales and services
of educational programs; animal sciences and industry livestock and
product sales; horticulture greenhouse and farm products sales; Konza
prairie operations; departmental receipts for all sales, refunds and other
collections; institutional support fee; KSU northwest research extension
center operations; sponsored research, public service, equipment and
facility grants; statistical laboratory; equipment/pesticide storage
building; miscellaneous renovation – construction; other specifically
designated receipts not available for general operations of the
university: Provided, however, That the state board of regents, with the
approval of the state finance council acting on this matter, which is
hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to
the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments
thereto, may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided
further, That all restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate account of the restricted
fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific purpose or purposes
for which collected: And provided further, That expenditures may be
made from the Kansas agricultural mediation service account of the
restricted fees fund during fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund for official hospitality.
Fertilizer research fund (369-00-2263-1150)..............................No limit
Agricultural land
use-value fund (369-00-2364-1180)............................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (369-00-2479-1190).............................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (369-00-2921-1200).............................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 168
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the sponsored research
overhead fund for official hospitality.
Smith-Lever special program grant –
federal fund (369-00-3047-1330)................................................No limit
University federal fund (369-00-3144)........................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (369-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (369-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Federal awards – advance
payment fund (369-00-3872-1360).............................................No limit
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:
Agricultural experiment stations (369-00-1900-1900)..............$336,064
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this act or any statute to the
contrary, no expenditures or transfers shall be made by the above
agency from any state general fund account of the above agency during
fiscal year 2026 for the responsibility centered budget model
implemented by the main campus of Kansas state university.
Sec. 109.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
VETERINARY MEDICAL CENTER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (368-00-1000-5003)..............................$14,114,469
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Veterinary training program for
rural Kansas (368-00-1000-5013)..............................................$650,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the veterinary training
program for rural Kansas account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Operating enhancement (368-00-1000-5023).........................$5,544,539
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
enhancement account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all
expenditures from the operating enhancement account shall be
expended in accordance with the plan submitted by the board of regents
for improving the rankings of the Kansas state university veterinary
medical center and shall be approved by the president of Kansas state
university.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (368-00-2129-5500).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may
be made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (368-00-2478-5220)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (368-00-2590-5530)....................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the
following accounts: Sponsored research, instruction, public service,
equipment and facility grants; sponsored construction or improvement
projects; technology equipment; pathology fees; laboratory test fees;
miscellaneous renovations or construction; dean of veterinary medicine

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 169
receipts; gifts; application for postbaccalaureate programs;
professorship; embryo transfer unit; swine serology; rapid focal
fluorescent inhibition test; comparative medicine; storerooms;
departmental receipts for all sales, refunds and other collections;
departmental student organization receipts; other specifically
designated receipts not available for general operation of the Kansas
state university veterinary medical center: Provided, however, That the
state board of regents, with the approval of the state finance council
acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of
legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A.
75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, may amend or change this list of
restricted fees: Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
appropriate account of the restricted fees fund and shall be used solely
for the specific purpose or purposes for which collected: And provided
further, That expenditures may be made from this fund for official
hospitality.
University federal fund (368-00-3143-5140)..............................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (368-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (368-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (368-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Vet health center revenue fund (including
official hospitality) (368-00-5160-5300).....................................No limit
Health professions student
loan fund (368-00-7521-5710)....................................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount specified
by the president of Kansas state university of not to exceed a total of
$15,000 from the general fees fund (368-00-2129-5500) to the health
professions student loan fund (368-00-7521-5710).
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this act or any statute to the
contrary, no expenditures or transfers shall be made by the above
agency from any state general fund account of the above agency during
fiscal year 2026 for the responsibility centered budget model
implemented by the main campus of Kansas state university.
Sec. 110.
EMPORIA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (379-00-1000-0083)..............................$39,121,546
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Nat'l board cert/future
teacher academy (379-00-1000-0200).......................................$327,844
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nat'l board cert/future
teacher academy account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from the nat'l board cert/future teacher
academy account for official hospitality.
Regional stabilization (379-00-1000-0270)............................$3,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the regional stabilization
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (379-00-1000-0350)................$1,227,910

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 170
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for
financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
SMaRT Kansas 21 (379-00-1000-0500)....................................$513,051
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the SMaRT Kansas 21
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Cybersecurity academic programming center (379-00-1000-0600)
.................................................................................................$1,107,612
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the cybersecurity
academic programming center account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Program reduction expenses...................................................$2,200,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such account during fiscal year 2026 only for the purpose of paying
legal fees and costs associated with program reductions, including
salaries and wages, and associated fringe benefits.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Emporia state model investment.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (379-00-2069-2010).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may
be made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (379-00-2473-2400)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (379-00-2526-2040)....................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the
following accounts: Computer services; student activity; technology
equipment; student union; sponsored research; computer services;
extension classes; gifts and grants (for teaching, research and capital
improvements); capital improvements; business school contributions;
state department of education (vocational); library services; library
collections; interest on local funds; receipts from conferences, clinics,
and workshops held on campus for which no college credit is given;
physical plant reimbursements from auxiliary enterprises; midwestern
student exchange; departmental receipts – for all sales, refunds and
other collections or receipts not specifically enumerated above:
Provided, however, That the state board of regents, with the approval of
the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided further, That
all restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and
shall be credited to the appropriate account of the restricted fees fund
and shall be used solely for the specific purpose or purposes for which
collected: And provided further, That expenditures may be made from
this fund to purchase insurance for equipment purchased through
research and training grants only if such grants include money for and
authorize the purchase of such insurance: And provided further, That all
amounts of tuition received from students participating in the
midwestern student exchange program shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the midwestern student

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 171
exchange account of the restricted fees fund: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from the restricted fees fund for official
hospitality.
Commencement fees fund (379-00-2527-2050)..........................No limit
Kansas career work study
program fund (379-00-2549-2060)..............................................No limit
Kansas distinguished
scholarship fund (379-00-2762-2700).........................................No limit
Research and institutional
overhead fund (379-00-2902-2070).............................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (385-00-2903-2903).............................................No limit
Economic opportunity act – work study –
federal fund (379-00-3128-3000)................................................No limit
Educational opportunity grants –
federal fund (379-00-3129-3010)................................................No limit
Basic opportunity grant program –
federal fund (379-00-3130-3020)................................................No limit
University federal fund (379-00-3145)........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the university federal fund to purchase insurance for equipment
purchased through research and training grants only if such grants
include money for and authorize the purchase of such insurance.
Leveraging educational assistance partnership
federal fund (379-00-3224-3200)................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (379-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (379-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (379-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Student health fees fund (379-00-5115-5010).............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the student health fees fund may be
made for the purchase of medical malpractice liability coverage for
individuals employed on the medical staff, including pharmacists and
physical therapists, at the student health center.
Bureau of educational
measurements fund (379-00-5118-5020).....................................No limit
Twin towers project
revenue fund (379-00-5120-5030)...............................................No limit
Student union refurbishing fund (379-00-5161-5040)................No limit
Housing system
operations fund (379-00-5169-5050)...........................................No limit
Parking fees fund (379-00-5186).................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fees fund
for a capital improvement project for parking lot improvements.
Housing system repairs, equipment and
improvement fund (379-00-5650-5120)......................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (379-00-5701-5130).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (379-00-6004)...........................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Telecommunications services; state car operation;
ESU press including duplicating and reproducing; postage; physical
plant storeroom including motor fuel inventory; and such other internal
service activities as are authorized by the state board of regents under
K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Interest on state normal
school fund (379-00-7101-7000).................................................No limit
Kansas comprehensive

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 172
grant fund (379-00-7224-7060)...................................................No limit
National direct student
loan fund (379-00-7507-7040)....................................................No limit
Nine month payroll
clearing fund (379-00-7712-7050)..............................................No limit
Suspense fund (379-00-9021)......................................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (379-00-9022-9510).............................No limit
Federal receipts
suspense fund (379-00-9085-9520).............................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (379-00-9138-9530)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (379-00-9165-9540)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (379-00-9196-9550)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (379-00-9222-9200)..............................................No limit
University payroll fund (379-00-9802).......................................No limit
Sec. 111.
PITTSBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (385-00-1000-0063)..............................$42,134,641
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
School of construction (385-00-1000-0200)..............................$802,086
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the school of construction
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Global center for STEM (385-00-1000-0260)........................$2,001,084
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the global center for
STEM account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Regional stabilization (385-00-1000-0270)............................$3,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the regional stabilization
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Center for emerging technologies (385-00-1000-0280).........$2,002,510
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the center for emerging
technologies account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Polymer science program (385-00-1000-0300)......................$1,064,189
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the polymer science
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (385-00-1000-0350)................$1,818,970
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for
financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following account or accounts as of
June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: NIMA
manufacturing prove out facility (385-00-1000-0250); and institute for
emerging technologies center for graphene (385-00-1000-0310).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 173
General fees fund (385-00-2070-2010).......................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received for tuition received from students
participating in the gorilla advantage program or the midwestern
student exchange program shall be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the general fees fund: Provided further, That expenditures may
be made from the general fees fund to match federal grant moneys: And
provided further, That expenditures may be made from the general fees
fund for official hospitality.
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (385-00-2474-2400)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (385-00-2529-2040)....................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the
following accounts: Computer services; capital improvements;
instructional technology fee; technology equipment; student activity fee
accounts; commencement fees; ROTC activities; continuing education
receipts; vocational auto parts and service fees; receipts from camps,
conferences and meetings held on campus; library service collections
and fines; grants from other state agencies; Midwest Quarterly;
chamber music series; contract – post office; gifts and grants; intensive
English program; business and technology institute; public sector radio
station activities; economic opportunity – state match; Kansas career
work study; regents supplemental grants; departmental receipts, and
other specifically designated receipts not available for general
operations of the university: Provided, however, That the state board of
regents, with the approval of the state finance council acting on this
matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative
delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-
3711c(c), and amendments thereto, may amend or change this list of
restricted fees: Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
appropriate account of the restricted fees fund and shall be used solely
for the specific purpose or purposes for which collected: And provided
further, That expenditures may be made from this fund to purchase
insurance for equipment purchased through research and training grants
only if such grants include money for and authorize the purchase of
such insurance: And provided further, That surplus restricted fees
moneys generated by the music department may be transferred to the
Pittsburg state university foundation, inc., for the express purpose of
awarding music scholarships: And provided further, That expenditures
may be made from this fund for official hospitality.
Kansas career work study
program fund (385-00-2552-2060)..............................................No limit
Overman student center
renovation fund (385-00-2820-2820)..........................................No limit
Student health center
revenue fund (385-00-2828-2851)...............................................No limit
Horace Mann building
renovation fund (385-00-2833)...................................................No limit
University federal fund (385-00-3146)........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the university federal fund to purchase insurance for equipment
purchased through research and training grants only if such grants
include money for and authorize the purchase of such insurance.
College work study
federal fund (385-00-3498-3030)................................................No limit
Nurse faculty loan program federal fund (385-00-3596-3596)...No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (385-00-3638)............................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 174
Coronavirus relief federal fund (385-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (385-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Revenue 2014A fund (385-00-5106-5105)..................................No limit
Hospital and student health
fees fund (385-00-5126-5010).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the hospital and student health fees
fund may be made for the purchase of medical malpractice liability
coverage for individuals employed on the medical staff, including
pharmacists and physical therapists, at the student health center:
Provided further, That expenditures may be made from this fund for
capital improvement projects for hospital and student health center
improvements.
Housing system
operations fund (385-00-5165-5050)...........................................No limit
Parking fees fund (385-00-5187-5060).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fees fund
for capital improvement projects for parking lot improvements.
Housing system repairs, equipment and
improvement fund (385-00-5646-5160)......................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (385-00-5703-5170).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (385-00-6005)...........................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Duplicating and printing services; instructional media
division; office stationery and supplies; motor carpool; postage
services; photo services; telephone services; and such other internal
service activities as are authorized by the state board of regents under
K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Kansas comprehensive
grant fund (385-00-7227-7200)...................................................No limit
Nursing student loan fund (385-00-7508-7010)..........................No limit
Perkins student loan fund (385-00-7509-7020)...........................No limit
Nine month payroll
clearing fund (385-00-7713-7030)..............................................No limit
Payroll clearing fund (385-00-9023-9500)..................................No limit
Suspense fund (385-00-9024-9510)............................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (385-00-9025-9520).............................No limit
Federal receipts
suspense fund (385-00-9104-9530).............................................No limit
BPC clearing fund (385-00-9109-9570)......................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (385-00-9139-9540)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (385-00-9166-9550)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (385-00-9195-9560)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (385-00-9223-9200)..............................................No limit
University payroll fund (385-00-9803).......................................No limit
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Pittsburg state university (385-00)...............................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer amounts specified by the president
of Pittsburg state university of not to exceed a total of $145,000 for all
such amounts, from the general fees fund (385-00-2070-2010) to the
following specified funds and accounts of funds: Perkins student loan
fund (385-00-7509-7020); nursing student loan fund (385-00-7508-
7010); and nurse faculty loan program federal fund (385-00-3596-

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 175
3596).
Sec. 112.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
university of Kansas (682-00).....................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (682-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (682-00-3756-3536).......No limit
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $760,809
shall be made by the above agency from such fund during fiscal year
2025 for airborne electromagnetic surveys at the Kansas geological
survey.
(b) On the effective date of this act, or as soon thereafter as
moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$760,809 from the American rescue plan – state fiscal relief – federal
fund (252-00-3756) of the governor's department to the American
rescue plan state relief fund (682-00-3756-3536) of the university of
Kansas.
Sec. 113.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (682-00-1000-0023)............................$162,312,449
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Geological survey (682-00-1000-0170)................................$10,167,566
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the geological survey
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That in addition to the other
purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the geological survey account of the state general fund for fiscal
year 2026, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
account for fiscal year 2026 for seismic surveys in an amount of not
less than $100,000.
Student aid for financial need (682-00-1000-0350)................$4,099,160
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for
financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Umbilical cord
matrix project (682-00-1000-0370)...........................................$153,734
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the umbilical cord matrix
project account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas law enforcement training center
operating expenditures (682-00-1000-0380)........................$12,073,048
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas law
enforcement training center operating expenditures account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (682-00-2107-2000).......................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 176
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys.
Fire service training fund (682-00-2123-2170)...........................No limit
Kan-grow engineering
fund – KU (682-00-2153-2153)..................................................No limit
Child care facility revenue
bond fund (682-00-2372).............................................................No limit
Johnson county education research
triangle fund (682-00-2393-2390)...............................................No limit
Standard water data
repository fund (682-00-2463-2463)...........................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (682-00-2475-2500)............................................No limit
Kansas career work study
program fund (682-00-2534-2050)..............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (682-00-2545).............................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the
following accounts: Institute for policy and social research; technology
equipment; capital improvements; concert course; speech, language and
hearing clinic; perceptual motor clinic; application for admission fees;
named professorships; summer institutes and workshops; dramatics;
economic opportunity act; executive management; continuing
education programs; geology field trips; gifts and grants; extension
services; counseling center; investment income from bequests;
reimbursable salaries; music and art camp; child development lab
preschools; orientation center; educational placement; press
publications; Rice estate educational project; sponsored research;
student activities; sale of surplus books and art objects; building use
charges; Kansas applied remote sensing program; executive master's
degree in business administration; applied English center; cartographic
services; economic education; study abroad programs; computer
services; recreational activities; animal care activities; geological
survey; midwestern student exchange; department commercial receipts
for all sales, refunds, and all other collections or receipts not
specifically enumerated above: Provided, however, That the state board
of regents, with the approval of the state finance council acting on this
matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative
delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-
3711c(c), and amendments thereto, may amend or change this list of
restricted fees: Provided further, That all restricted fees shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
appropriate account of the restricted fees fund and shall be used solely
for the specific purpose or purposes for which collected: And provided
further, That moneys received for student fees in any account of the
restricted fees fund may be transferred to one or more other accounts of
the restricted fees fund.
Law enforcement training center
fees fund (682-00-2763-2700).....................................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received for tuition from students enrolling
in the basic law enforcement training program for undergraduate or
graduate credit shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the law enforcement training center fees fund.
Student recreation fitness center
KDFA fund (682-00-2864-2860).................................................No limit
University of Kansas and
Wichita state university health
collaboration fund (682-00-2878-2878)......................................No limit
Multicultural rescr center

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 177
construction fund (682-00-2890-2890).......................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (682-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (682-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (682-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (682-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
University of Kansas ARPA health
collaboration fund (682-00-3756)...............................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (682-00-2905-2160).............................................No limit
University federal fund (682-00-3147)........................................No limit
Educational opportunity act –
federal fund (682-00-3842-3020)................................................No limit
Health service fund (682-00-5136-5030)....................................No limit
Student union fund (682-00-5137-5040).....................................No limit
Housing system
operations fund (682-00-5142-5050)...........................................No limit
Student union renovation
revenue fund (682-00-5171-5060)...............................................No limit
Parking facility KDFA 1993G
revenue fund (682-00-5175-5070)...............................................No limit
Parking facilities
revenue fund (682-00-5175-5070)...............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking facilities
revenue fund for capital improvement projects for parking
improvements.
Housing system repairs, equipment and
improvement fund (682-00-5621-5110)......................................No limit
Student health facility
maintenance, repair and equipment
fee fund (682-00-5640-5120)......................................................No limit
Housing system
suspense fund (682-00-5704-5150).............................................No limit
Service clearing fund (682-00-6006)...........................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Residence hall food stores; university motor pool;
military uniforms; telecommunications service; and such other internal
service activities as are authorized by the state board of regents under
K.S.A. 76-755, and amendments thereto.
Interest fund (682-00-7103-7000)...............................................No limit
Kansas comprehensive
grant fund (682-00-7226-7110)...................................................No limit
Loans for disadvantaged
students fund (682-00-7510-7100)..............................................No limit
Federal Perkins loan fund (682-00-7512-7040)..........................No limit
Health professions student
loan fund (682-00-7513-7050)....................................................No limit
Prepaid tuition fees
clearing fund (682-00-7765)........................................................No limit
Suspense fund (682-00-9060-9010)............................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (682-00-9061-9020).............................No limit
GTA/GRA emp health insurance
clearing fund (682-00-9063-9070)..............................................No limit
BPC clearing fund (682-00-9119-9050)......................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (682-00-9142-9030)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 178
clearing fund (682-00-9167-9040)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (682-00-9193-9060)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking clearing fund (682-00-9224-9200).....................No limit
University payroll fund (682-00-9806).......................................No limit
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
university of Kansas (682-00).....................................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts specified by
the chancellor of the university of Kansas of not to exceed a total of
$325,000 for all such amounts, from the general fees fund (682-00-
2107-2000) to the following specified funds and accounts of funds:
Federal Perkins loan fund (682-00-7512-7040); educational opportunity
act – federal fund (682-00-3842-3020); university federal fund (682-
00-3147-3140); health professions student loan fund (682-00-7513-
7050); loans for disadvantaged students fund (682-00-7510-7100).
(d) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
water plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the water
plan project or projects specified, the following:
Water quantity/aquifer (682-00-1800-9991)..............................$740,000
Water quality (682-00-1800-9993).........................................$1,000,000
Any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, in
the geological survey account (682-00-1800-1810) is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the chancellor of
the university of Kansas, with the approval of the director of the
budget, may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal
year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the university of Kansas to
another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water
plan fund for the university of Kansas: Provided, That the chancellor of
the university of Kansas shall certify each such transfer to the director
of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research, the chairperson of
the house of representatives agriculture and natural resources budget
committee and the chairperson of the subcommittee on natural
resources of the senate committee on ways and means.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the chancellor of
the university of Kansas, with approval of the director of the budget,
may transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026
from the state water plan fund for the university of Kansas to any item
of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for
the Kansas water office, Kansas department of agriculture, Kansas
department of wildlife and parks or the department of health and
environment – division of environment: Provided, That the chancellor
of the university of Kansas shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and upon receipt of such certification,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer such certified amount
to the certified item of appropriation: Provided further, That when the
chancellor of the university of Kansas provides certification to the
director of accounts and reports under this section, the chancellor shall
transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of legislative
research, the chairperson of the house of representatives agriculture and
natural resources budget committee and the appropriate chairperson of
the subcommittee on natural resources of the senate committee on ways
and means.
Sec. 114.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS MEDICAL CENTER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 179
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (683-00-1000-0503)............................$120,300,302
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That expenditures from this account may be used to
reimburse medical residents in residency programs located in Kansas
City at the university of Kansas medical center for the purchase of
health insurance for residents' dependents: Provided, however, That no
expenditure shall be made by the above agency from such account for
the purchase of or payment for the use of a secure online platform that
allows the user access to health information, including, but not limited
to, medications, test results, appointments and bills, unless the above
agency submits a written report to the state board of regents stating that
the above agency is allowing parents and guardians of a minor child
access to such online platform concerning the health information of
such minor child without prior authorization or consent of such minor
child and in accordance with state law: And provided further, That a
copy of such report shall be transmitted to the chairperson of the house
of representatives committee on appropriations and the chairperson of
the senate committee on ways and means: And provided further, That if
the above agency fails to submit such report, then on June 30, 2026,
any moneys used for such platform is hereby lapsed from such account.
Student aid for financial need (683-00-1000-0350)................$1,120,150
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for
financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Medical scholarships
and loans (683-00-1000-0600)................................................$4,488,171
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the medical scholarships
and loans account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
OBGYN medical residency
bridging loan (683-00-1000-0630)...............................................$30,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the OBGYN medical
residency bridge loan account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Midwest stem cell
therapy center (683-00-1000-0800)...........................................$787,830
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the midwest stem cell
therapy center account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Rural health bridging (683-00-1000-1010)................................$140,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rural health bridging
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Rural health bridging psychiatry (683-00-1000-1015)................$30,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rural health bridging
psychiatry account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Specialty medical student loan program.................................$1,913,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the medical scholarships
and loans psychiatry account and the OBGYN medical student loan
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
to the specialty medical student loan program account for fiscal year
2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following account or accounts as of
June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Health
science center KUMed and WSU (683-00-1000-0810); and KUMC

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 180
Wichita residency program (683-00-1000-0650): Provided, That
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the KUMC
Wichita residency program account to the department of family and
community medicine of the university of Kansas school of medicine
Wichita for use in the Smoky Hill family medicine residency program,
Wesley family medicine residency program and Ascension Via Christi
family medicine residency program.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Midwest stem cell therapy
center fund (683-00-2072-2072).................................................No limit
General fees fund (683-00-2108-2500).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys.
Rural health bridging
psychiatry fund (683-00-2218-2218)...........................................No limit
Johnson county education research
triangle fund (683-00-2394-2390)...............................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (683-00-2476-2400)............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (683-00-2551).............................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to the following
accounts: Technology equipment; capital improvements; computer
services; expenses reimbursed by the Kansas university endowment
association; postgraduate fees; pathology fees; student health insurance
premiums; gift receipts; designated research collaboration; facilities
use; photography; continuing education; student activity fees; student
application fees; department duplicating; student health services;
student identification badges; student transcript fees; loan
administration fees; fitness center fees; occupational health fees;
employee health; telekid care fees; area outreach fees; police fees;
endowment payroll reimbursement; rental property; e-learning fees;
surplus property sales; outreach air travel; student loan legal fees;
hospital authority salary reimbursements; graduate medical education
contracts; Kansas university physicians inc., salaries reimbursements;
housestaff activity fees; anatomy cadavers; biotechnology services;
energy center funded depreciation; biostatistics; electron microscope
services; Wichita faculty contracts; physical therapy services; legal fee
reimbursements; sponsored research; departmental commercial receipts
for all sales, refunds and all other collections of receipts not specifically
enumerated above; and Kansas department for children and families
cost-sharing: Provided, however, That the state board of regents, with
the approval of the state finance council acting on this matter, which is
hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to
the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments
thereto, may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided
further, That all restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate account of the restricted
fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific purpose or purposes
for which collected: And provided further, That expenditures may be
made from this fund to purchase health insurance coverage for all
students enrolled in the school of allied health, school of nursing and
school of medicine.
Cancer center research (683-00-2551-2700)...............................No limit
Medical student loan programs provider
assessment fund (683-00-2625-2650).........................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 181
Kansas breast cancer
research fund (683-00-2671-2660)..............................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (683-00-2907-2800).............................................No limit
Services to hospital
authority fund (683-00-2915-2900).............................................No limit
Direct medical education
reimbursement fund (683-00-2918-3000)...................................No limit
Graduate medical education
reimbursement fund (683-00-2918-3050)...................................No limit
Cancer research and public information
trust fund (683-00-2925-2925)....................................................No limit
Scientific research and development – special
revenue fund (683-00-2926)........................................................No limit
Federal scholarship for disadvantaged
students fund (683-00-3094-3100)..............................................No limit
University federal fund (683-00-3148)........................................No limit
Leveraging educational assistance partnership
federal fund (683-00-3223-3200)................................................No limit
Federal Pell grant fund (683-00-3252-3500)...............................No limit
Federal student educational opportunity
grant fund (683-00-3255-3510)...................................................No limit
Federal college work
study fund (683-00-3256-3520)...................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (683-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (683-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (683-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Parking facility revenue fund –
KC campus (683-00-5176-5550).................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking facility
revenue fund – KC campus for capital improvement projects for
parking improvements.
Parking fee fund –
Wichita campus (683-00-5180-5590)..........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the parking fee fund –
Wichita campus for capital improvement projects for parking
improvements.
Graduate medical education administration
reserve fund (683-00-5652-5640)................................................No limit
University of Kansas medical center
private practice foundation
reserve fund (683-00-5659-5660)................................................No limit
Service clearing fund (683-00-6007)...........................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Printing services; purchasing storeroom; university
motor pool; physical plant storeroom; photo services;
telecommunications services; facilities operations discretionary repairs;
animal care; instructional services; and such other internal service
activities as are authorized by the state board of regents under K.S.A.
76-755, and amendments thereto.
AMA education and
research grant fund (683-00-7207-7500).....................................No limit
Medical loan repayment fund (683-00-7214-7520)....................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the medical loan repayment fund for
attorney fees and litigation costs associated with the administration of
the medical scholarship and loan program shall be in addition to any
expenditure limitation imposed on the operating expenditures account

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 182
of the medical loan repayment fund.
Psychiatry medical loan
repayment fund (683-00-7233-7233)..........................................No limit
Educational nurse faculty loan
program fund (683-00-7505-7540)..............................................No limit
Federal Perkins student
loan fund (683-00-7515-7550)....................................................No limit
Federal health professions/
primary care student
loan fund (683-00-7516-7560)....................................................No limit
Federal nursing student
loan fund (683-00-7517-7570)....................................................No limit
Suspense fund (683-00-9057-9500)............................................No limit
Robert Wood Johnson
award fund (683-00-7328-7530).................................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (683-00-9058-9510).............................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (683-00-9143-9520)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (683-00-9168-9530)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (683-00-9194-9600)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking clearing fund (683-00-9225-9200).....................No limit
University payroll fund (683-00-9807).......................................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer amounts specified by
the chancellor of the university of Kansas of not to exceed a total of
$125,000 for all such amounts, from the general fees fund (683-00-
2108-2500) to the following funds: Federal nursing student loan fund
(683-00-7517-7570); federal student education opportunity grant fund
(683-00-3255-3510); federal college work study fund (683-00-3256-
3520); educational nurse faculty loan program fund (683-00-7505-
7540); federal health professions/primary care student loan fund (683-
00-7516-7560).
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and within the
limits of appropriations therefor, the university of Kansas medical
center may enter into contracts to purchase additional malpractice
insurance for medical students enrolled at the university of Kansas
medical center while in clinical training at the university of Kansas
medical center or at other healthcare institutions.
Sec. 115.
WICHITA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (715-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Sec. 116.
WICHITA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (715-00-1000-0003)..............................$79,951,342
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Technology transfer facility (715-00-1000-0005)...................$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the technology transfer

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 183
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Aviation infrastructure (715-00-1000-0010)...........................$5,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aviation infrastructure
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of any other
statute, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be
made from the aviation infrastructure account for fiscal year 2026 by
Wichita state university, as authorized by this or other appropriation act
of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, the moneys appropriated
in the aviation infrastructure account for fiscal year 2026 may only be
expended for training and equipment expenditures of the national
center for aviation training.
Aviation research (715-00-1000-0015).................................$15,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the aviation research
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all moneys in the aviation
research account expended for fiscal year 2026 shall be matched by
Wichita state university on a $1-for-$1 basis from other moneys of
Wichita state university: And provided further, That Wichita state
university shall submit a plan to the house committee on
appropriations, the senate committee on ways and means and the
governor as to how aviation research-related activities create additional
jobs in the state and other economic value, particularly for and with the
private sector, for fiscal year 2026.
Student aid for financial need (715-00-1000-0350)................$4,246,340
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the student aid for
financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Business partnership...............................................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the business partnership
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Dentistry feasibility study..........................................................$750,000
Any unencumbered balance in the following account or accounts as of
June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Health
science center WSU (715-00-1000-0800).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Aviation research fund (715-00-2052-2052)...............................No limit
General fees fund (715-00-2112).................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund to
match federal grant moneys: Provided further, That expenditures may
be made from the general fees fund for official hospitality.
Kan-grow engineering
fund – WSU (715-00-2155-2155)...............................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
matching fund (715-00-2477-2400)............................................No limit
Kansas career work study
program fund (715-00-2536-2020)..............................................No limit
Restricted fees fund (715-00-2558).............................................No limit
Provided, That restricted fees shall be limited to receipts for the
following accounts: Summer school workshops; technology equipment;
concert course; dramatics; continuing education; flight training; gifts
and grants (for teaching, research, and capital improvements); capital
improvements; testing service; state department of education

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 184
(vocational); investment income from bequests; sale of surplus books
and art objects; public service; veterans counseling and educational
benefits; sponsored research; campus privilege fee; student activities;
national defense education programs; engineering equipment fee;
midwestern student exchange; departmental receipts – for all sales,
refunds and other collections or receipts not specifically enumerated
above: Provided, however, That the state board of regents, with the
approval of the state finance council acting on this matter, which is
hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to
the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments
thereto, may amend or change this list of restricted fees: Provided
further, That all restricted fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the appropriate account of the restricted
fees fund and shall be used solely for the specific purpose or purposes
for which collected: And provided further, That expenditures may be
made from this fund to purchase insurance for equipment purchased
through research and training grants only if such grants include money
for and authorize the purchase of such insurance: And provided further,
That expenditures from this fund may be made for the purchase of
medical malpractice liability coverage for individuals employed on the
medical staff at the student health center: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund for official hospitality.
Center of innovation for biomaterials in
orthopaedic research – Wichita state
university fund (715-00-2750-2700)...........................................No limit
Wichita state university and
university of Kansas health
collaboration fund (715-00-2878-2878)......................................No limit
Sponsored research
overhead fund (715-00-2908-2080).............................................No limit
University federal fund (715-00-3149-3140)..............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the university federal fund to purchase insurance for equipment
purchased through research and training grants only if such grants
include money for and authorize the purchase of such insurance.
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (715-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Economic opportunity act –
federal fund (715-00-3265-3100)................................................No limit
Educational opportunity grant –
federal fund (715-00-3266-3110)................................................No limit
Pell grants federal fund (715-00-3366-3120)..............................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (715-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (715-00-3753)...........................No limit
Wichita state university ARPA health
collaboration fund (715-00-3756)...............................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (715-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
WSU housing systems
revenue fund (715-00-5100-5250)...............................................No limit
Parking system project KDFA bond
revenue fund (715-00-5148-5000)...............................................No limit
Parking system project
maintenance KDFA revenue
bond fund (715-00-5159-5040)...................................................No limit
WSU housing system
surplus fund (715-00-5620-5270)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 185
Housing system
suspense fund (715-00-5705-5160).............................................No limit
WSU housing system depreciation and
replacement fund (715-00-5800-5260)........................................No limit
Service clearing fund (715-00-6008)...........................................No limit
Provided, That the service clearing fund shall be used for the following
service activities: Central service duplicating and reproducing bureau;
automobiles; furniture stores; postal clearing; telecommunications;
computer services; and such other internal service activities as are
authorized by the state board of regents under K.S.A. 76-755, and
amendments thereto.
Scholarship funds fund (715-00-7211-7000)...............................No limit
Nine month payroll clearing
account fund (715-00-7717-7030)...............................................No limit
National direct student
loan fund (715-00-7519-7010)....................................................No limit
Temporary deposit fund (715-00-9059-9500).............................No limit
Suspense fund (715-00-9077)......................................................No limit
Mandatory retirement annuity
clearing fund (715-00-9144-9520)..............................................No limit
Voluntary tax shelter annuity
clearing fund (715-00-9169-9530)..............................................No limit
Agency payroll deduction
clearing fund (715-00-9198-9400)..............................................No limit
Pre-tax parking
clearing fund (715-00-9226-9200)..............................................No limit
Engineer graduate incentive fund –
Wichita state university (715-00)................................................No limit
Sec. 117.
STATE BOARD OF REGENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Tuition for technical education (561-00-1000-0120).................$358,836
Sec. 118.
STATE BOARD OF REGENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (including
official hospitality) (561-00-1000-0103)................................$5,256,170
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That, during fiscal year 2026, notwithstanding the
provisions of any other statute, in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made from the operating expenditures
(including official hospitality) account for fiscal year 2026 by the state
board of regents, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, the state board of regents is
hereby authorized to make expenditures from the operating
expenditures (including official hospitality) account for fiscal year
2026 for attendance at an in-state meeting by members of the state
board of regents for participation in matters of educational interest to
the state of Kansas, upon approval of such attendance and participation
by the state board of regents: And provided further, That each member
of the state board of regents attending an in-state meeting so authorized
shall be paid compensation, subsistence allowances, mileage and other
expenses as provided in K.S.A. 75-3212, and amendments thereto, for
members of the legislature: And provided further, That, during fiscal
year 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute and in

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 186
addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made
from the operating expenditures (including official hospitality) account
for fiscal year 2026 by the state board of regents, as authorized by this
or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
the state board of regents is hereby authorized to make expenditures
from the operating expenditures (including official hospitality) account
for fiscal year 2026 for attendance at an out-of-state meeting by
members of the state board of regents whenever under any provision of
law such members of the state board of regents are authorized to attend
the out-of-state meeting or whenever the state board of regents
authorizes such members to attend the out-of-state meeting for
participation in matters of educational interest to the state of Kansas:
And provided further, That each member of the state board of regents
attending an out-of-state meeting so authorized shall be paid
compensation, subsistence allowances, mileage and other expenses as
provided in K.S.A. 75-3212, and amendments thereto, for members of
the legislature.
Tuition for technical education (561-00-1000-0120)............$47,050,000
Provided, That, any unencumbered balance in the tuition for technical
education account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from the tuition for technical education account of the state
general fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from the tuition for technical education account of the
state general fund for fiscal year 2026 for the payment of technical
education tuition for adult students who are enrolled in technical
education classes while obtaining a high school equivalency (HSE)
credential using the accelerating opportunity program and for the
postsecondary education institution to provide a transcript to each
student who completes such technical education course: And provided
further, That such expenditures shall be in an amount of not less than
$500,000: And provided further, That during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, not later than 60 days following the class start date,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account for
tuition reimbursement.
NISS playbook(651-00-1000-0140).......................................$5,827,300
Technical colleges operating grants (561-00-1000-0150).......$7,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the technical colleges
operating grants account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account to
divide the moneys equally between the technical colleges.
Osteopathic service scholarship (561-00-1000-0180)............$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the osteopathic service
scholarship account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas education
opportunity scholarships (561-00-1000-0230)........................$1,700,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas education
opportunity scholarships account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Midwest higher education
commission (561-00-1000-0250)...............................................$115,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the midwest higher
education commission account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Community and technical college

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 187
capital outlay aid (561-00-1000-0310)..................................$12,419,311
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, in the career technical capital outlay aid account is hereby
reappropriated to the community and technical college capital outlay
aid account for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all expenditures
from such account shall require a local match of nonstate moneys or
donated equipment on a $1-for-$1 basis from either a nonstate or
private donation: And provided further, That expenditures shall be made
by the above agency from such account to the following institutions in
the following amounts: Allen community college, $335,649; Barton
community college, $507,299; Butler community college, $623,047;
Cloud county community college, $369,376; Coffeyville community
college, $360,160; Colby community college, $390,442; Cowley
community college, $439,114; Dodge City community college,
$392,729; Flint Hills technical college, $388,072; Fort Scott
community college, $371,216; Garden City community college,
$402,725; Highland community college, $375,580; Hutchinson
community college, $675,986; Independence community college,
$324,719; Johnson county community college, $1,226,400; Kansas
City Kansas community college, $596,536; Labette community college,
$366,503; Manhattan area technical college, $393,036; Neosho county
community college, $384,949; Fort Hays state university – north
central Kansas technical college, $459,442; Fort Hays state university –
northwest Kansas technical college, $416,890; Pratt community
college, $375,189; Salina area technical college, $401,108; Seward
county community college, $387,723; institute of technology at
Washburn university, $492,345; and Wichita state university campus of
applied sciences and technology, $963,076.
Washburn university student aid for
financial need (561-00-1000-0350)........................................$1,784,260
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Washburn university
student aid for financial need account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Regional growth and development.......................................$12,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such account to the following institutions in the following amounts:
Fort Hays state university, $4,400,000; Emporia state university,
$3,800,000; and Pittsburg state university, $3,800,000.
Non-tiered course credit
hour grant (561-00-1000-0550)............................................$88,361,538
Provided, Except as provided further, that any unencumbered balance
in the non-tiered course credit hour grant account in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, Except as provided further, that, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 71-1801 through 71-1810, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from such account to the following institutions in the following
amounts: Allen community college, $3,270,135; Barton community
college, $7,323,181; Butler community college, $12,781,595; Cloud
county community college, $2,715,003; Coffeyville community
college, $1,336,638; Colby community college, $1,827,746; Cowley
community college, $3,376,842; Dodge City community college,
$1,612,560; Flint Hills technical college, $813,079; Fort Hays tech
north central, $890,535; Fort Hays tech northwest, $954,353; Fort Scott
community college, $1,763,555; Garden City community college,
$2,238,010; Highland community college, $3,827,268; Hutchinson
community college, $6,236,859; Independence community college,
$999,030; Johnson county community college, $16,873,303; Kansas
City Kansas community college, $4,973,227; Labette community

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 188
college, $1,948,252; Manhattan area technical college, $798,568;
Neosho county community college, $2,018,056; Pratt community
college, $1,501,584; Salina area technical college, $983,319; Seward
county community college, $1,504,714; institute of technology at
Washburn university, $381,927; and Wichita state university campus of
applied sciences and technology, $5,412,199.
Postsecondary tiered technical education
state aid (561-00-1000-0760)................................................$66,453,525
Provided, Except as provided further, that any unencumbered balance
in the postsecondary tiered technical education state aid account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, Except as provided further, that,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 71-1801 through 71- 1810,
and amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures shall be
made by the above agency from such account to the following
institutions in the following amounts: Allen community college,
$473,848; Barton community college, $2,266,994; Butler community
college, $5,079,186; Cloud county community college, $1,181,769;
Coffeyville community college, $853,054; Colby community college,
$1,391,319; Cowley community college, $1,919,674; Dodge City
community college, $951,091; Flint Hills technical college,
$1,696,132; Fort Hays tech north central, $3,087,761; Fort Hays tech
northwest, $1,925,676; Fort Scott community college, $1,181,923;
Garden City community college, $1,205,191; Highland community
college, $1,262,666; Hutchinson community college, $5,782,346;
Independence community college, $235,575; Johnson county
community college, $8,637,305; Kansas City Kansas community
college, $4,156,731; Labette community college, $1,016,383;
Manhattan area technical college, $1,819,187; Neosho county
community college, $1,354,084; Pratt community college, $1,061,068;
Salina area technical college, $1,818,392; Seward county community
college, $1,046,871; institute of technology at Washburn university,
$3,643,102; and Wichita state university campus of applied sciences
and technology, $11,406,197.
Adult basic education (561-00-1000-0900)............................$1,567,031
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the adult basic education
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Municipal university
operating grant (561-00-1000-1010).....................................$17,570,000
Nursing student
scholarship program (561-00-1000-4100)..............................$1,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nursing student
scholarship program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Nursing faculty and supplies
grant program (561-00-1000-4130)........................................$3,787,193
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nursing faculty and
supplies grant program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That the
state board of regents is hereby authorized to make grants to Kansas
postsecondary educational institutions with accredited nursing
programs from the nursing faculty and supplies grant program account
for expansion of nursing faculty, laboratory supplies and tools for
student success: And provided further, That such grants shall be either
need-based or competitive and shall be matched on the basis of $1 from
the nursing faculty and supplies grant program account for $1 from the
postsecondary educational institution receiving the grant.
Two-year college business/industry

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 189
and apprenticeship act...........................................................$14,300,000
Provided, Except as provided further, that all expenditures from the
two-year college business/industry and apprenticeship act account shall
be distributed to the community colleges and technical colleges to be
used for the development of apprenticeships, business and industry
outreach and development of programing to meet the emerging needs
of Kansas businesses: Provided further, Except as provided further, that
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such account to
the following institutions in the following amounts: Allen community
college, $316,423; Barton community college, $998,958; Butler
community college, $1,309,893; Cloud county community college,
$307,278; Coffeyville community college, $323,739; Colby community
college, $307,887; Cowley community college, $509,081; Dodge City
community college, $377,086; Flint Hills technical college, $200,280;
Fort Scott community college, $303,620; Garden City community
college, $448,113; Highland community college, $445,980; Hutchinson
community college, $996,214; Independence community college,
$189,915; Johnson county community college, $2,988,947; Kansas
City Kansas community college, $910,249; Labette community college,
$270,392; Manhattan area technical college, $146,628; Neosho county
community college, $325,263; Fort Hays state university – north
central Kansas technical college, $187,781; Fort Hays state university –
northwest Kansas technical college, $177,721; Pratt community
college, $291,121; Salina area technical college, $185,647; Seward
county community college, $360,015; institute of technology at
Washburn university, $319,471; and Wichita state university campus of
applied sciences and technology, $1,102,298: And provided further,
That each community college shall be eligible to receive the specified
amount from the two-year college business/industry and apprenticeship
act account during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, upon
certification by the chief executive officer of the state board of regents
to the director of accounts and reports that the cash on hand of the
community college is equal to or less than six months for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025: And provided further, That at the same time the
above agency transmits such certification to the director of accounts
and reports, the above agency shall transmit a copy to the director of
legislative research and the director of the budget: And provided
further, That if a community college is found to have cash on hand
greater than six months for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and is
therefore not eligible to receive the specified amount from the two-year
college business/industry and apprenticeship act account for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the board of trustees of such community
college may within 30 days adopt a resolution that either reduces the
current year tax levy on the taxable tangible property of the community
college district or provides a property tax rebate to the taxpayers within
the community college district that is equal to the amount required for
the community college to be eligible to receive the specified amount
from the two-year college business/industry and apprenticeship act
account in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: And provided further,
That upon notice by the county treasurer of the county in which the
community college is located that such taxpayer relief has been
provided, the chief executive officer of the state board of regents may
certify the community college is eligible to receive the specified
amount from the two-year college business/industry and apprenticeship
act account for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
Two-year college student success initiatives.........................$10,500,000
Provided, Except as provided further, that all expenditures from the
two-year college student success initiatives account shall be distributed
to the community colleges and technical colleges to be used for the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 190
development and implementation of initiatives that increase student
success: Provided further, Except as provided further, that expenditures
shall be made by the above agency from such account to the following
institutions in the following amounts: Allen community college,
$232,339; Barton community college, $733,500; Butler community
college, $961,810; Cloud county community college, $225,624;
Coffeyville community college, $237,711; Colby community college,
$226,071; Cowley community college, $373,801; Dodge City
community college, $276,881; Flint Hills technical college, $147,058;
Fort Hays tech north central, $137,881; Fort Hays tech northwest,
$130,495; Fort Scott community college, $222,938; Garden City
community college, $329,034; Highland community college, $327,467;
Hutchinson community college, $731,486; Independence community
college, $139,448; Johnson county community college, $2,194,681;
Kansas City Kansas community college, $668,365; Labette community
college, $198,540; Manhattan area technical college, $107,664; Neosho
county community college, $238,830; Pratt community college,
$213,760; Salina area technical college, $136,314; Seward County
community college, $264,347; Washburn institute of technology,
$234,577; Wichita state university campus of applied sciences and
technology, $809,380: And provided further, That each community
college shall be eligible to receive the specified amount from the two-
year college student success initiatives account during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, upon certification by the chief executive officer
of the state board of regents to the director of accounts and reports that
the cash on hand of the community college is equal to or less than six
months for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025: And provided further,
That at the same time the above agency transmits such certification to
the director of accounts and reports, the above agency shall transmit a
copy to the director of legislative research and the director of the
budget: And provided further, That if a community college is found to
have cash on hand greater than six months for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025, and is therefore not eligible to receive the specified
amount from the two-year college student success initiatives account
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the board of trustees of such
community college may within 30 days adopt a resolution that either
reduces the current year tax levy on the taxable tangible property of the
community college district or provides a property tax rebate to the
taxpayers within the community college district that is equal to the
amount required for the community college to be eligible to receive the
specified amount from the two-year college student success initiatives
account in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: And provided further,
That upon notice by the county treasurer of the county in which the
community college is located that such taxpayer relief has been
provided, the chief executive officer of the state board of regents may
certify the community college is eligible to receive the specified
amount from the two-year college student success initiatives account
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
ESPCOR.....................................................................................$993,265
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Kansas nursing initiative grant program (561-00-1000-4110);
EMERGE program assistance (561-00-1000-0240); community college
capital outlay (561-00-1000-0850); rural family physician residency
program expansion grant (561-00-1000-0220); Kansas blueprint for
literacy; and Washburn university student aid for financial need (561-
00-1000-0350).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 191
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
GED credentials processing
fees fund (561-00-2151-2100).....................................................No limit
Truck driver training fund (561-00-2172-4900)..........................No limit
Inservice education workshop
fee fund (561-00-2266)................................................................No limit
Financial aid services
fee fund (561-00-2280-2800)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the financial aid
services fee fund for operating expenditures directly or indirectly
related to the operating costs associated with student financial
assistance programs administered by the state board of regents:
Provided further, That the chief executive officer of the state board of
regents is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for the
processing of applications and other activities related to student
financial aid assistance programs administered by the state board of
regents: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to
recover all or a part of the direct and indirect operating expenses
incurred for administering such programs: And provided further, That
all moneys received for such fees shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the financial aid services
fee fund.
Motorcycle safety fund (561-00-2366-2360)..............................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (561-00-2433-3200)..........................................No limit
Grants fund (561-00-2525-2500).................................................No limit
Private and out-of-state
postsecondary educational institution
fee fund (561-00-2614-2610)......................................................No limit
Private postsecondary educational institution degree
authorization expense reimbursement
fee fund (561-00-2643-3300)......................................................No limit
Postsecondary education performance-based
incentives fund (561-00-2777-2777)...........................................No limit
KAN-ED services fee fund (561-00-2814-2814)........................No limit
Kansas high school equivalency credential
processing fee fund (561-00-2832-2832)....................................No limit
Adult basic education –
federal fund (561-00-3042-3000)................................................No limit
Carl D. Perkins vocational
and technical education –
federal fund (561-00-3539-3539)................................................No limit
Governor's emergency education
relief fund (561-00-3638)............................................................No limit
Earned indirect costs
fund – federal (561-00-3642-3600).............................................No limit
Coronavirus relief federal fund (561-00-3753)...........................No limit
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief –
federal fund (561-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Paul Douglas teacher scholarship
fund – federal (561-00-3879-3950).............................................No limit
USAC E-rate program
federal fund (561-00-3920-3920)................................................No limit
Faculty of distinction
program fund (561-00-7200-7050)..............................................No limit
State scholarship discontinued
attendance fund (561-00-7213-6100)..........................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 192
Osteopathic medical service scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7216-6300)..........................................No limit
Nursing service scholarship
program fund (561-00-7220-6800)..............................................No limit
Tuition waiver gifts, grants and
reimbursements fund (561-00-7230-7230)..................................No limit
Kansas ethnic minority fellowship
program fund (561-00-7238-7600)..............................................No limit
Optometry education
repayment fund (561-00-7203-7100)..........................................No limit
Teacher scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7205-7200)..........................................No limit
Nursing service scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7210-7400)..........................................No limit
Kansas national guard
educational assistance program
repayment fund (561-00-7228-7000)..........................................No limit
Nurse educator service scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7231-7300)..........................................No limit
ROTC service scholarship
repayment fund (561-00-7232-7232)..........................................No limit
Private donations, gifts, grants
bequest fund (561-00-7262-7700)...............................................No limit
Clearing fund (561-00-9029-9100).............................................No limit
Regents clearing fund (561-00-9052-9200)................................No limit
Transportation research fund.......................................................No limit
Kansas adult learner grant program fund.....................................No limit
Kansas national guard EMERGE program repayment fund........No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the chief
executive officer of the state board of regents, with the approval of the
director of the budget, may transfer any part of any item of
appropriation in an account of the state general fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, to another item of appropriation in an account of
the state general fund for fiscal year 2026. The chief executive officer
of the state board of regents shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research. As used in this
subsection, "account" means any account of the state general fund of
the state board of regents, the university of Kansas, the university of
Kansas medical center, Kansas state university, Kansas state university
Salina, Kansas state university veterinary medical center, Kansas state
university extension systems and agriculture research programs,
Wichita state university, Emporia state university, Pittsburg state
university and Fort Hays state university.
(d) (1) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by any state educational institution from the moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for such state educational institution,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by such state
educational institution from moneys appropriated from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for
the purposes of capital improvement projects making energy and other
conservation improvements: Provided, That such capital improvement
projects are hereby approved for such state educational institution for
the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto, and the
authorization of issuance of one or more series of bonds by the Kansas
development finance authority in accordance with that statute from
time to time during fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That no such

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 193
bonds shall be issued until the state board of regents has first advised
and consulted on any such project with the joint committee on state
building construction: Provided further, That the amount of the bond
proceeds that may be utilized for any such capital improvement project
shall be subject to approval by the state finance council acting on this
matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative
delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-
3711c(c), and amendments thereto, except that such approval also may
be given while the legislature is in session: And provided further, That,
in addition to such project costs, any such amount of bond proceeds
may include costs of issuance, capitalized interest and any required
reserves for the payment of principal and interest on such bonds: And
provided further, That all moneys received from the issuance of any
such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as prescribed by
applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That payments
relating to principal and interest on such bonds shall be subject to and
dependent upon annual appropriations therefor to the state educational
institution for which the bonds are issued: And provided further, That
each energy conservation capital improvement project for which bonds
are issued for financing under this subsection shall be designed and
completed in order to have cost savings sufficient to be equal to or
greater than the cost of debt service on such bonds: And provided
further, That the state board of regents shall prepare and submit a report
to the committee on appropriations of the house of representatives and
the committee on ways and means of the senate on the savings
attributable to energy conservation capital improvements for which
bonds are issued for financing under this subsection at the beginning of
the 2026 regular session of the legislature.
(2) As used in this subsection, "state educational institution"
includes each state educational institution as defined in K.S.A. 76-711,
and amendments thereto.
(e) (1) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by any postsecondary educational institution from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 for such postsecondary
educational institution as authorized by this or other appropriation act
of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be
made by such postsecondary educational institution from such moneys
for fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of deeming any person who is
enrolled as a member of the Kickapoo Tribe of Indians of the Kickapoo
Reservation in Kansas, the Prairie Band Potawatomi Nation, the Iowa
Tribe of Kansas, the Sac and Fox Nation of Missouri in Kansas and
Nebraska or of indigenous nations with historical connections to
Kansas territories named in this subsection, regardless of the residence
of such person prior to admission at a postsecondary educational
institution, as a resident of this state for the purpose of tuition and fees
for attendance at any postsecondary educational institution.
(2) As used in this subsection:
(A) "Postsecondary educational institution" means the same as
defined in K.S.A. 74-3201b, and amendments thereto; and
(B) "indigenous nations with historical connections to Kansas
territories" means any federally recognized tribe containing one or
more references to the following tribal affiliations within such tribe's
name: Apache, Arapaho, Caddo, Cheyenne, Cherokee, Chickasaw,
Chippewa and Ojibwe (including Bay Mills), Choctaw, Comanche,
Delaware, Iowa (Ioway and Baxoje), Kaw (Kanza), Kickapoo, Kiowa,
Miami, Missouria (including Otoe-Missouria), Modoc, Muscogee
(Creek, including Yuchi, Euchee or Uchee), Nez Perce, Omaha,
Oneida, Osage, Otoe, Ottawa (Odawa), Potawatomi (Pottawatomi),

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 194
Pawnee, Peoria, Ponca, Pueblo, Quapaw, Sac and Fox (including
Meskwaki), Seminole, Seneca-Cayuga, Shawnee, Stockbridge-Munsee
(Mohican), Wichita and Affiliated Tribes (Wichita, Keechi, Waco and
Tawakonie) and Wyandotte.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,000,000 from the
state general fund to the Kansas adult learner grant program fund (561-
00-2857-2857) of the state board of regents.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above
agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, to establish the blue ribbon commission on
higher education: Provided, That the purpose of the commission shall
be to study, discuss and make recommendations on higher education in
the state of Kansas: Provided further, That the commission shall consist
of 17 members as follows: (1) One member appointed by the
chairperson of the state board of regents; (2) one member appointed by
the governor; (3) one member of the majority party of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; (4) one member of the majority party of the house of
representatives appointed by the majority leader of the house of
representatives; (5) one member of the minority party of the house of
representatives appointed by the minority leader of the house of
representatives; (6) one member of the majority party of the senate
appointed by the president of the senate; (7) one member of the
majority party of the senate appointed by the majority leader of the
senate; (8) one member of the minority party of the senate appointed by
the minority leader of the senate; (9) one member to represent the
regional universities jointly appointed by the president of the senate
and the speaker of the house of representatives; (10) one member to
represent the big three universities jointly appointed by the president of
the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; (11) one
member appointed by the Kansas association of technical colleges; (12)
one member appointed by the Kansas association of community
colleges; (13) one member who is a student attending a postsecondary
educational institution appointed by the speaker pro tem of the house of
representatives; (14) one member who is the parent of a student
attending a postsecondary educational institution appointed by the vice
president of the senate; (15) one member who is a higher education
expert jointly appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker
of the house of representatives; (16) one member of the public
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and (17) one
member of the public appointed by the president of the senate: And
provided further, That the term of members of the commission shall
expire on January 1, 2027: And provided further, That any vacancy in
members of the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointment: And provided further, That the chairperson of the
commission shall be jointly appointed by the president of the senate
and the speaker of the house of representatives: And provided further,
That the commission may meet at any time, at any place within the
state and through any means upon call of the chairperson: And
provided further, That all actions taken by the commission shall be
made by motion and adopted by a majority of those present when there
is a quorum: And provided further, That a quorum of the commission is
nine members: And provided further, That the members of the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 195
commission attending meetings authorized by the commission shall be
paid amounts for expenses, mileage and subsistence as provided in
K.S.A. 75-3223(e), and amendments thereto, by the state board of
regents: And provided further, That the commission shall study, discuss
and make recommendations on the following: (A) Long-term goals and
priorities for higher education; (B) governing structure, financing, cost,
savings and consolidation of state board of regents schools, community
colleges and technical colleges; (C) accessibility and affordability of
higher education; (D) strengths and weaknesses of higher education
and postsecondary educational institutions; (E) strategies for enrollment
and degree completion; and (F) strategies for right-sizing and
streamlining higher education for the future with a student focus: And
provided further, That on or before January 1, 2026, the commission
shall submit to the legislature a preliminary report on the commission's
findings and recommendations for higher education in the state of
Kansas: And provided further, That the staff of the state board of
regents, office of revisor of statutes, the legislative research department
and the division of legislative administrative services shall provide
assistance as may be requested by the commission: And provided
further, That as used in this subsection, "postsecondary educational
institution" means any public university, municipal university,
community college, technical college and institute of technology.
(h) On July 1, 2025, of the amount appropriated for the above
agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by section 117(a) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state general
fund in the career technical workforce grant (561-00-1000-2200), the
sum of $114,075 is hereby lapsed.
(i) On July 1, 2025, of the amount appropriated for the above
agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by section 117(a) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state general
fund in the computer science preservice grant (561-00-1000-4700), the
sum of $1,000,000 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 119.
BOARD OF REGENTS
(a) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2027,
as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
above agency from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, to continue the studies, discussions
and recommendations of the blue ribbon commission on higher
education pursuant to section 118(g): Provided, That on or before
January 1, 2027, the commission shall submit to the legislature a final
report on the commission's findings and recommendations for higher
education in the state of Kansas.
Sec. 120.
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Treatment and programs –
medical and mental (521-00-1000-0152)................................$5,425,167
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $19,307,030
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 119(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the facilities operations account
(521-00-1000-0303), the sum of $792,000 is hereby lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the $756,213 appropriated

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 196
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 119(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the equipment replacements account (521-00-
1000-0810), the sum of $15,626 is hereby lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, of the amount of moneys
reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 173(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the priority capital improvement
projects account (521-00-1000-0800), the sum of $363,688 is hereby
lapsed.
(e) On the effective date of this act, of the $25,150,855
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 119(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the Kansas juvenile correctional
complex – facilities operations account (352-00-1000-0303), the sum
of $2,023 is hereby lapsed.
(f) On the effective date of this act, notwithstanding the provisions
of K.S.A. 75-52,164, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, of
the amount of moneys appropriated and reappropriated for the above
agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 119(a) of
chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from the state general
fund in the evidence-based programs account (521-00-1000-0050), the
sum of $10,000,000 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 121.
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Evidence-based programs (521-00-1000-0050)....................$13,466,904
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the evidence-based
programs account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-52,164, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made from this
account to conduct research into, and development of, evidence-based
practices to reduce offender behavior and recidivism among juveniles:
Provided, however, That the expenditures for such research and
development shall not exceed $1,000,000: And provided further, That
expenditures in an amount of not less than $1,000,000 shall be made by
the above agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide
for services to families at the O'Connell children's shelter in Lawrence,
Kansas: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-52,164, and amendments thereto, or any other statute,
expenditures shall be made by the above agency from the evidence-
based programs account for the jobs for America's graduates-Kansas
programs: Provided, however, That the expenditures for such programs
shall not exceed $5,500,000: And provided further, That expenditures
shall be made by the above agency from such account to require jobs
for America's graduates-Kansas to submit a report to the Kansas
juvenile justice oversight committee established by K.S.A. 75-52,161,
and amendments thereto, on or after June 15, 2026, but on or before
June 30, 2026: And provided further, That such report shall include the
number of youths served and performance outcomes.
Juvenile crime
community prevention (521-00-1000-0051)...........................$1,500,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by such agency from such
account during fiscal year 2026 to provide grants to communities for
evidence-based juvenile crime prevention programs: Provided further,
That at least $500,000 of such grants shall require a $1-for-$1 local or
private match.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 197
Operating expenditures –
juvenile services (521-00-1000-0103)....................................$1,807,359
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures – juvenile services account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Treatment and programs –
offender programs (521-00-1000-0151)...............................$13,543,826
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the treatment and
programs – offender programs account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Treatment and programs – medical
and mental (521-00-1000-0152)...........................................$95,810,002
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the treatment and
programs – medical and mental account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Department of corrections
hepatitis C treatment (521-00-1000-0153)..............................$2,600,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the department of
corrections hepatitis C treatment account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Treatment and programs –
KUMC contract (521-00-1000-0154).....................................$2,172,472
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the treatment and
programs – KUMC contract account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Community corrections (521-00-1000-0220).......................$31,098,494
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the community
corrections account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That no
expenditures may be made by any county from any grant made to such
county from the community corrections account for either half of state
fiscal year 2026 that supplant any amount of local public or private
funding of existing programs as determined in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary of corrections.
Prevention and graduated sanctions
community grants (521-00-1000-0221)................................$21,620,419
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the prevention and
graduated sanctions community grants account in excess of $100 as of
June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided
further, That moneys awarded as grants from the prevention and
graduated sanctions community grants account is not an entitlement to
communities, but a grant that must meet conditions prescribed by the
above agency for appropriate outcomes.
Facilities operations (521-00-1000-0303).............................$20,970,639
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the facilities operations
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Local jail payments (521-00-1000-0510)...............................$1,550,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the local jail payments
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 19-1930, and amendments thereto, payments by
the department of corrections under K.S.A. 19-1930(b), and
amendments thereto, for the cost of maintenance of prisoners shall not
exceed the per capita daily operating cost, not including inmate
programs, for the department of corrections.
Operating expenditures (521-00-1000-0603)........................$57,311,502
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 198
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the operating expenditures account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Debt service payments – data
systems replacement (521-00-1000-0702)..............................$3,346,286
Priority capital
improvement projects (521-00-1000-0800)............................$4,000,000
Equipment replacements (521-00-1000-0810)..........................$756,213
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the equipment
replacements account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Vehicle replacements (521-00-1000-0820)................................$591,717
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the vehicle replacements
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Ellsworth correctional facility –
facilities operations (177-00-1000-0303)..............................$24,391,081
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Ellsworth correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Ellsworth correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
El Dorado correctional facility –
facilities operations (195-00-1000-0303)..............................$48,480,936
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the El Dorado
correctional facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided, however, That expenditures from the El Dorado correctional
facility – facilities operations account for official hospitality shall not
exceed $500.
Hutchinson correctional facility –
facilities operations (313-00-1000-0303)..............................$53,121,639
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Hutchinson
correctional facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided, however, That expenditures from the Hutchinson correctional
facility – facilities operations account for official hospitality shall not
exceed $500.
Kansas juvenile correctional complex –
facilities operations (352-00-1000-0303)..............................$28,985,818
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas juvenile
correctional complex – facilities operations account in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided, however, That expenditures from the Kansas juvenile
correctional complex – facilities operations account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $500: Provided further, That expenditures
may be made from this account for educational services contracts,
which are hereby authorized to be negotiated and entered into by the
above agency with unified school districts or other accredited
educational services providers.
Lansing correctional facility –
facilities operations (400-00-1000-0303)..............................$51,451,496
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Lansing correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Lansing correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Larned state correctional facility –
facilities operations (408-00-1000-0303)..............................$19,284,631

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 199
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Larned state
correctional facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided, however, That expenditures from the Larned state
correctional facility – facilities operations account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Norton correctional facility –
facilities operations (581-00-1000-0303)..............................$25,986,288
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Norton correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Norton correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Topeka correctional facility –
facilities operations (660-00-1000-0303)..............................$25,054,852
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Topeka correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Topeka correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Winfield correctional facility –
facilities operations (712-00-1000-0303)..............................$27,600,301
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Winfield correctional
facility – facilities operations account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however,
That expenditures from the Winfield correctional facility – facilities
operations account for official hospitality shall not exceed $500.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Purchase of services account (521-00-1000-0300).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Supervision fees fund (521-00-2116-2100).................................No limit
Juvenile alternatives to
detention fund (521-00-2250)......................................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 79-4803, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from the juvenile alternatives to detention fund for
per diem payments to detention centers: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the juvenile alternatives to detention fund for per
diem payments to detention centers shall not exceed $100,000: And
provided further, That the department of corrections is hereby
authorized and directed to make expenditures from the juvenile
alternatives to detention fund for fiscal year 2026 for purchase of
services: And provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 79-4803, and amendments thereto, or any other statute,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the juvenile
alternatives to detention fund for graduated sanctions.
Juvenile justice fee fund central office (521-00-2257)................No limit
Alcohol and drug abuse
treatment fund (521-00-2339-2110)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the alcohol and drug
abuse treatment fund for payments associated with providing treatment
services to offenders who were driving under the influence of alcohol
or drugs regardless of when the services were rendered.
Department of corrections – general

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 200
fees fund (521-00-2427-2450).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the department of
corrections – general fees fund for operating expenditures for training
programs for correctional personnel, including official hospitality:
Provided further, That the secretary of corrections is hereby authorized
to fix, charge and collect fees for such programs: And provided further,
That such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the
operating expenses incurred for such training programs, including
official hospitality: And provided further, That all fees received for such
programs shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the department of corrections – general fees fund.
Community corrections special
revenue fund (521-00-2447-2447)...............................................No limit
Department of corrections forensic
psychologist fund (521-00-2492-2492).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the department of
corrections forensic psychologist fund for general healthcare contract
expenses.
Community corrections supervision
fund (521-00-2748-2748)............................................................No limit
Residential substance abuse treatment –
federal fund (521-00-3006).........................................................No limit
Title I program for neglected and
delinquent children – federal fund (521-00-3009).......................No limit
Distance learning and telemedicine –
federal fund (521-00-3025).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial
justice assistance grants –
federal fund (521-00-3057).........................................................No limit
Prisoner reentry intv demo –
federal fund (521-00-3063).........................................................No limit
Federal asset forfeiture –
federal fund (521-00-3063-3713)................................................No limit
Violence against women –
federal fund (521-00-3082).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne state and local law assistance –
federal fund (521-00-3213-3213)................................................No limit
Violence against women –
federal fund (521-00-3214).........................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (521-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Title VI-B special education –
federal fund (521-00-3234).........................................................No limit
Victims of crime act –
federal fund (521-00-3260).........................................................No limit
Juvenile justice delinquency prevention
federal fund (521-00-3351).........................................................No limit
Byrne grant – federal fund (521-00-3353-3200).........................No limit
Medical assistance program –
federal fund (521-00-3414).........................................................No limit
Economic adjustment assistance –
federal fund (521-00-3415).........................................................No limit
USMS reimbursement –
federal fund (521-00-3562-3562)................................................No limit
Elementary & secondary schools emergency relief –
federal fund (521-00-3638).........................................................No limit
Detection & mitigation of COVID-19
in confinement facilities –

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 201
federal fund (521-00-3649).........................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund –
federal fund (521-00-3756).........................................................No limit
Justice reinvestment technical assistance
for state governments project –
federal fund (521-00-3758-3758)................................................No limit
Prison rape elimination act (PREA) justice
assistance grant –
federal fund (521-00-3758).........................................................No limit
JRI technical assistance and training –
federal fund (521-00-3804-3804)................................................No limit
Second chance act –
federal fund (521-00-3895-3895)................................................No limit
Department of corrections –
alien incarceration grant
fund – federal (521-00-3943-3800).............................................No limit
Second chance act reentry initiative –
federal fund (521-00-3985-3901)................................................No limit
ICJR – federal fund......................................................................No limit
Juvenile delinquency prevention
trust fund (521-00-7322-7000)....................................................No limit
State of Kansas – department
of corrections inmate
benefit fund (521-00-7950-5350)................................................No limit
Ellsworth correctional facility – general
fees fund (177-00-2227-2000).....................................................No limit
El Dorado correctional facility – general
fees fund (195-00-2252-2000).....................................................No limit
Hutchinson correctional facility – general
fees fund (313-00-2051-2000).....................................................No limit
Kansas juvenile correctional
complex – fee fund (352-00-2321-2300).....................................No limit
Kansas juvenile correctional complex –
title I neglected and delinquent
children – federal fund (352-00-3009)........................................No limit
National school breakfast program –
federal fund – Kansas juvenile
correctional complex (352-00-3529-3529)..................................No limit
National school lunch program –
federal fund – Kansas juvenile
correctional complex (352-00-3530-3530)..................................No limit
Kansas juvenile correctional
complex – gifts, grants and
donations fund (352-00-7016-7000)............................................No limit
Lansing correctional facility – general
fees fund (400-00-2040-2040).....................................................No limit
Larned state correctional
facility – general
fees fund (408-00-2145-2000).....................................................No limit
Correctional industries fund (522-00-6126-7300).......................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the correctional
industries fund for official hospitality.
Norton correctional facility – general
fees fund (581-00-2238-2000).....................................................No limit
Topeka correctional facility – general
fees fund (660-00-2090-2090).....................................................No limit
Topeka correctional facility – community
development block grant –
federal fund (660-00-3669-3669)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 202
Winfield correctional facility – general
fees fund (712-00-2237-2000).....................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
corrections, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, from the state general fund for the department of
corrections or any correctional institution or correctional facility under
the general supervision and management of the secretary of corrections
to another item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state
general fund for the department of corrections or any correctional
institution or correctional facility under the general supervision and
management of the secretary of corrections. The secretary of
corrections shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts
and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3731, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall accept for payment from the secretary of corrections any
duly authorized claim to be paid from the local jail payments account
(521-00-1000-0510) of the state general fund during fiscal year 2026
for costs pursuant to K.S.A. 19-1930(b), and amendments thereto, even
though such claim is not submitted or processed for payment within the
fiscal year in which the service is rendered and whether or not the
services were rendered prior to the effective date of this act.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3731, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and
reports shall accept for payment from the director of Kansas
correctional industries any duly authorized claim to be paid from the
correctional industries fund (522-00-6126-7300) during fiscal year
2026 for operating or manufacturing costs even though such claim is
not submitted or processed for payment within the fiscal year in which
the service is rendered and whether or not the services were rendered
prior to the effective date of this act. The director of Kansas
correctional industries shall provide to the director of the budget on or
before September 15, 2026, a detailed accounting of all such payments
made from the correctional industries fund during fiscal year 2026.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
corrections, with the approval of the director of the budget, may make
transfers from the correctional industries fund (522-00-6126-7300) to
the department of corrections – general fees fund (521-00-2427-2450).
The secretary of corrections shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all expenditures
made by the department of corrections from the correctional industries
fund (522-00-6126-7300) shall be made on budget for all purposes of
state accounting and budgeting for the department of corrections.
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-52,164, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during fiscal year 2026, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount certified
pursuant to K.S.A. 75-52,164(b), and amendments thereto, from each
account of the state general fund of a state agency that has been
determined by the secretary of corrections to be actual or projected cost
savings to the evidence-based programs account of the state general
fund of the department of corrections: Provided, That the secretary of
corrections shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the
director of legislative research.
Sec. 122.
ADJUTANT GENERAL

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 203
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Operating expenditures (034-00-1000-0053).............................$400,000
Disaster relief (034-00-1000-0200)........................................$1,600,000
Sec. 123.
ADJUTANT GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (034-00-1000-0053)..........................$7,514,875
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$2,500.
Civil air patrol – operating
expenditures (034-00-1000-0103)................................................$43,068
Disaster relief (034-00-1000-0200)........................................$3,800,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the disaster relief account
in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for
fiscal year 2026.
Military activation payments (034-00-1000-0300)........................$9,114
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the military activation
payments account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all
expenditures from the military activation payments account shall be for
military activation payments authorized by and subject to the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-3228, and amendments thereto.
Kansas military
emergency relief (034-00-1000-0400)...........................................$9,881
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the Kansas military
emergency relief account for grants and interest-free loans, which are
hereby authorized to be entered into by the adjutant general with
repayment provisions and other terms and conditions including
eligibility as may be prescribed by the adjutant general therefor, to
members and families of the Kansas army and air national guard and
members and families of the reserve forces of the United States of
America who are Kansas residents, during the period preceding, during
and after mobilization to provide assistance to eligible family members
experiencing financial emergencies: Provided further, That such
assistance may include, but shall not be limited to, medical, funeral,
emergency travel, rent, utilities, child care, food expenses and other
unanticipated emergencies: And provided further, That any moneys
received by the adjutant general in repayment of any grants or interest-
free loans made from the Kansas military emergency relief account
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the Kansas military emergency relief account.
Office of emergency
communication (034-00-1000-0800).........................................$307,537
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the office of emergency
communication account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Inaugural expense fund (034-00-2003-2300)..............................No limit
Nuclear safety emergency management

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 204
fee fund (034-00-2081-2200)......................................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute, the
adjutant general may make transfers of moneys from the nuclear safety
emergency management fee fund to other state agencies for fiscal year
2026 pursuant to agreements, which are hereby authorized to be entered
into by the adjutant general with other state agencies to provide
appropriate emergency management plans to administer the Kansas
nuclear safety emergency management act, K.S.A. 48-940 et seq., and
amendments thereto.
General fees fund (034-00-2102)................................................No limit
Provided, That the adjutant general is hereby authorized to fix, charge
and collect fees agreed upon in memorandums of understanding with
other state agencies, local government agencies, for-profit
organizations and not-for-profit organizations: Provided further, That
such fees shall be fixed in order to recover all or part of the expenses
incurred under the provisions of the memorandums of understanding
with other state agencies, local government agencies, for-profit
organizations and not-for-profit organizations: And provided further,
That all fees received pursuant to such memorandums of understanding
shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the general fees fund.
Military fees fund – federal (034-00-2152).................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received by the adjutant general from the
federal government for reimbursement for expenditures made under
agreements with the federal government shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the military fees fund –
federal.
Armories and units general
fees fund (034-00-2171-2010).....................................................No limit
NG – federal forfeiture fund (034-00-2184-2100)......................No limit
Adjutant general expense fund (034-00-2357)............................No limit
Conversion of materials and equipment fund –
military division (034-00-2400-2030).........................................No limit
State emergency fund (034-00-2437)..........................................No limit
State emergency fund weather
disasters 5/4/2007 (034-00-2441)................................................No limit
State emergency fund weather
disasters 12/06, 7/07 (034-00-2445)............................................No limit
Office of emergency communications
fund (034-00-2496-2496)............................................................No limit
Provided, That the adjutant general is hereby authorized to fix, charge
and collect fees for recovery of costs associated with the use of the
above agency's communication equipment by other state agencies, local
government agencies, for-profit organizations and not-for-profit
organizations: Provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in order to
recover all or part of the expenses incurred in providing for the use of
the above agency's communication equipment by other state agencies,
local government agencies, for-profit organizations and not-for-profit
organizations: And provided further, That all fees received for use of the
above agency's communication equipment by other state agencies, local
government agencies, for-profit organizations or not-for-profit
organizations shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the office of emergency communications fund.
State asset forfeiture fund (034-00-2498-2498)..........................No limit
Kansas military emergency
relief fund (034-00-2658-2650)...................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 205
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the Kansas military
emergency relief fund for grants and interest-free loans, which are
hereby authorized to be entered into by the adjutant general with
repayment provisions and other terms and conditions including
eligibility as may be prescribed by the adjutant general therefor, to
members and families of the Kansas army and air national guard and
members and families of the reserve forces of the United States of
America who are Kansas residents, during the period preceding, during
and after mobilization to provide assistance to eligible family members
experiencing financial emergencies: Provided further, That such
assistance may include, but shall not be limited to, medical, funeral,
emergency travel, rent, utilities, child care, food expenses and other
unanticipated emergencies: And provided further, That any moneys
received by the adjutant general in repayment of any grants or interest-
free loans made from the Kansas military emergency relief fund shall
be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
Kansas military emergency relief fund.
Great plains joint regional training center
fee fund (034-00-2688-2688)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the great plains joint
regional training center fee fund for use of the great plains joint
regional training center by other state agencies, local government
agencies, for-profit organizations and not-for-profit organizations:
Provided further, That the adjutant general is hereby authorized to fix,
charge and collect fees for recovery of costs associated with the use of
the great plains joint regional training center by other state agencies,
local government agencies, for-profit organizations and not-for-profit
organizations: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed in
order to recover all or part of the expenses incurred in providing for the
use of the great plains joint regional training center by other state
agencies, local government agencies, for-profit organizations and not-
for-profit organizations: And provided further, That all fees received for
use of the great plains joint regional training center by other state
agencies, local government agencies, for-profit organizations or not-
for-profit organizations shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the great plains joint regional training
center fee fund.
Military honors funeral fund (034-00-2789-2789)......................No limit
Provided, That the adjutant general is hereby authorized to accept gifts
and donations of money during fiscal year 2026 for military funeral
honors or purposes related thereto: Provided further, That such gifts and
donations of money shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the military honors funeral fund.
Disaster grants – public assistance
federal fund (034-00-3005).........................................................No limit
Hazard mitigation grant
federal fund (034-00-3019).........................................................No limit
National guard military operations/maintenance
federal fund (034-00-3055-3300)................................................No limit
Hazard material training and planning –
federal fund (034-00-3121-3310)................................................No limit
Military construction national guard
federal fund (034-00-3192-3192)................................................No limit
National guard civilian youth opportunities
federal fund (034-00-3193-3193)................................................No limit
Econ adjustment/military installation

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 206
federal fund (034-00-3196-3196)................................................No limit
Public safety partner/community policing (034-00-3218-3220).No limit
Pre-disaster mitigation –
federal fund (034-00-3268-3269)................................................No limit
Fire management assistance grant –
federal fund (034-00-3320-3320)................................................No limit
Public safety interoperable
communications grant program
federal fund (034-00-3340-3340)................................................No limit
Citizen corps federal fund (034-00-3341-3341)..........................No limit
Emergency management performance grant –
federal fund (034-00-3342-3342)................................................No limit
Disaster assistance to individual/household
federal fund (034-00-3405-3405)................................................No limit
Interoperability communication
equipment fund (034-00-3449-3449)..........................................No limit
Safe and drug-free schools and
communities national programs
federal fund (034-00-3569-3569)................................................No limit
State and local implementation grant program –
federal fund (034-00-3576-3576)................................................No limit
Emergency management assistance compact
federal fund (034-00-3609-3605)................................................No limit
Law enforcement terrorism prevention program
federal fund (034-00-3613-3600)................................................No limit
State homeland security program
federal fund (034-00-3629-3629)................................................No limit
Emergency systems for advanced registration
for volunteer health professionals –
federal fund (034-00-3748-3748)................................................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund –
federal fund (034-00-3753).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (034-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
Civil air patrol – grants and contributions –
federal fund (034-00-7315-7000)................................................No limit
Kansas intelligence fusion center fund........................................No limit
Kansas national guard counter drug state
forfeiture fund..............................................................................No limit
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the adjutant general from moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 and from which expenditures may be made for salaries and
wages, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the
adjutant general from such moneys appropriated from the state general
fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 48-205, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, in addition to other positions within the
adjutant general's department in the unclassified service as prescribed
by law for additional positions in the unclassified service under the
Kansas civil service act: Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions
of K.S.A. 75-2935, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the
adjutant general may appoint a deputy adjutant general, who shall have
no military command authority, and who may be a civilian and shall
have served at least five years as a commissioned officer with the
Kansas national guard, who will perform such duties as the adjutant
general shall assign, and who will serve in the unclassified service
under the Kansas civil service act: Provided further, That the position

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 207
of such deputy adjutant general in the unclassified service under the
Kansas civil service act shall be established by the adjutant general
within the position limitation established for the adjutant general on the
number of full-time and regular part-time positions equated to full-
time, excluding seasonal and temporary positions, paid from
appropriations for fiscal year 2026 made by this or other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the adjutant
general, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026, from the
state general fund for the adjutant general to another item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state general fund for the
adjutant general: Provided, That the adjutant general shall certify each
such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research.
Sec. 124.
STATE FIRE MARSHAL
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 145(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the fire marshal
fee fund (234-00-2330) of the state fire marshal is hereby increased
from $9,102,098 to $9,104,848.
Sec. 125.
STATE FIRE MARSHAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures, other than refunds authorized
by law, purchases of nationally recognized adopted codes for resale and
federally reimbursed overtime, shall not exceed the following:
Boiler inspection fee fund (234-00-2128-2128)..........................No limit
Provided, That, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
notwithstanding the provisions of any statute, in addition to the other
purposes for which expenditures may be made from the boiler
inspection fee fund for fiscal year 2026 by the above agency, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
the boiler inspection fee fund for operating expenses of the above
agency.
Fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330)....................................$10,390,287
Provided, That expenditures from the fire marshal fee fund for official
hospitality shall not exceed $1,000: Provided further, That expenditures
in an amount of not to exceed $500,000 shall be made by the above
agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 to award grants to
local volunteer fire departments for equipment.
Hemp processing program (234-00-2330-2002).........................No limit
Explosives regulatory and
training fund (234-00-2361-2361)...............................................No limit
Emergency response fund (234-00-2589)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the state fire marshal
from the emergency response fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purposes
of responding to specific incidences of emergencies related to
hazardous materials or search and rescue incidents without prior
approval of the state finance council: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the emergency response fund during fiscal year 2026
for the purposes of responding to any specific incidence of an
emergency related to hazardous materials or search and rescue
incidents without prior approval by the state finance council shall not
exceed $25,000, except upon approval by the state finance council

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 208
acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of
legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A.
75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, except that such approval also
may be given while the legislature is in session.
State fire marshal liquefied petroleum gas
fee fund (234-00-2608-2600)......................................................No limit
Non-fuel flammable or combustible
liquid aboveground storage tank
system fund (234-00-2626-2610)................................................No limit
Fire safety standard and
firefighter protection act
enforcement fund (234-00-2694-2620).......................................No limit
Cigarette fire safety standard
and firefighter protection
act fund (234-00-2696-2630).......................................................No limit
Elevator safety fee fund (234-00-2854-2854).............................No limit
FFY12 HMEP grant –
federal fund (234-00-3121-3121)................................................No limit
Contract inspections fund (234-00-6122-6122)..........................No limit
Intragovernmental
service fund (234-00-6160-6000)................................................No limit
Gifts, grants and
donations fund (234-00-7405-7400)............................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of any other statute, the state fire marshal, with the
approval of the director of the budget, may transfer funds from the fire
marshal fee fund (234-00-2330-2000) to the emergency response fund
(234-00-2589) of the state fire marshal. The state fire marshal shall
certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and
shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of
legislative research and the director of the budget: Provided, That the
aggregate amount of such transfers for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not exceed $500,000.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research shall consult periodically
and review the balance credited to and the estimated receipts to be
credited to the fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330-2000) during fiscal
year 2026, and, upon a finding by the director of the budget in
consultation with the director of legislative research that the total of the
unencumbered balance and estimated receipts to be credited to the fire
marshal fee fund during fiscal year 2026 are insufficient to fund the
budgeted expenditures and transfers from the fire marshal fee fund for
fiscal year 2026 in accordance with the provisions of appropriation
acts, the director of the budget shall certify such finding to the director
of accounts and reports. Upon receipt of any such certification, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount of moneys
from the emergency response fund (234-00-2589) to the fire marshal
fee fund that is required, in accordance with the certification by the
director of the budget under this subsection, to fund the budgeted
expenditures and transfers from the fire marshal fee fund for the
remainder of fiscal year 2026 in accordance with the provisions of
appropriation acts, as specified by the director of the budget pursuant to
such certification.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research shall consult periodically
and review the balance credited to and the estimated receipts to be
credited to the fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330-2000) and any other
resources available to the fire marshal fee fund during the fiscal year
2026, and, upon a finding by the director of the budget in consultation

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 209
with the director of legislative research that the total of the
unencumbered balance and estimated receipts to be credited to the fire
marshal fee fund during fiscal year 2026 are insufficient to meet in full
the estimated expenditures for fiscal year 2026 as they become due to
meet the financial obligations imposed by law on the fire marshal fee
fund as a result of a cash flow shortfall, within the authorized budgeted
expenditures in accordance with the provisions of appropriation acts,
the director of the budget is authorized and directed to certify such
finding to the director of accounts and reports. Upon receipt of any
such certification, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer the
amount of money specified in such certification from the state general
fund to the fire marshal fee fund in order to maintain the cash flow of
the fire marshal fee fund for such purposes for fiscal year 2026. The
aggregate amount of such transfers during fiscal year 2026 pursuant to
this subsection shall not exceed $500,000. Within one year from the
date of each such transfer to the fire marshal fee fund pursuant to this
subsection, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer the
amount equal to the amount transferred from the state general fund to
the fire marshal fee fund from the fire marshal fee fund to the state
general fund in accordance with a certification for such purpose by the
director of the budget. At the same time as the director of the budget
transmits any certification under this subsection to the director of
accounts and reports during fiscal year 2026, the director of the budget
shall transmit a copy of such certification to the director of legislative
research.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of any other statute, the state fire marshal, may transfer
funds from the contract inspections fund (234-00-6122-6122) of the
state fire marshal to the fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330-2000) of
the state fire marshal. The state fire marshal shall certify each such
transfer to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy
of each such certification to the director of legislative research and the
director of the budget.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, notwithstanding
the provisions of any other statute, the state fire marshal is hereby
authorized to transfer moneys appropriated during fiscal year 2025
from the elevator safety fee fund (234-00-2854-2854) to the fire
marshal fee fund (234-00- 2330-2000) to be expended during fiscal
year 2026 by the state fire marshal to administer the provisions of the
elevator safety act, K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 44-1801 through 44-1820, and
amendments thereto.
(g) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $500,000 from the
state general fund to the fire marshal fee fund (234-00-2330) of the
state fire marshal.
Sec. 126.
KANSAS HIGHWAY PATROL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Body worn camera implementation fund....................................No limit
General department of justice federal grant fund........................No limit
(b) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by state finance
council by section 145(f) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the Kansas highway patrol operations fund (280-00-2034-
1100) of the Kansas highway patrol is hereby increased from

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 210
$77,312,654 to $78,926,480.
(c) On the effective day of this act, or soon thereafter as moneys
are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$1,474,812 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the
department of transportation to the Kansas highway patrol operations
fund (280-00-2034-1100) of the Kansas highway patrol.
Sec. 127.
KANSAS HIGHWAY PATROL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Kansas highway patrol
operations fund (280-00-2034-1100)....................................$78,968,732
Provided, That expenditures from the Kansas highway patrol
operations fund for official hospitality shall not exceed $3,000:
Provided further, That expenditures may be made from the Kansas
highway patrol operations fund for the purchase of civilian clothing for
members of the Kansas highway patrol assigned to duties pursuant to
K.S.A. 74-2105, and amendments thereto: And provided further, That
the superintendent shall make expenditures from the Kansas highway
patrol operations fund for necessary moving expenses in accordance
with K.S.A. 75-3225, and amendments thereto.
General fees fund (280-00-2179-2200).......................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received from the sale of used equipment,
recovery of and reimbursements for expenditures and any other source
of revenue shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the general fees fund, except as otherwise provided by
law: Provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of article 66
of chapter 75 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments
thereto, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the general fees fund, expenditures
shall be made by the above agency from such fund to sell the personal
sidearm, with a trigger lock, of a part-time state law enforcement
officer, who has 10 years or more of service, to such officer, subject to
the following: (1) Such officer is resigning; (2) the sale of such
personal sidearm shall be for the amount equal to the total of the fair
market value of the sidearm, as fixed by the superintendent, plus the
cost of the trigger lock; and (3) no sale of a personal sidearm shall be
made to any resigning officer unless the superintendent determines that
the employment record and performance evaluations of each such
officer are satisfactory: And provided further, That all proceeds from the
sale of personal sidearms and trigger locks shall be deposited in the
state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the general fees fund.
Nuclear fee fund (280-00-2179-2206) ........................................No limit
Motor carrier safety assistance program
state fund (280-00-2208).............................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the motor carrier
safety assistance program state fund for necessary moving expenses in
accordance with K.S.A. 75-3225, and amendments thereto.
Kansas highway patrol staffing and
training fund (280-00-2211-2211)...............................................No limit
Vehicle identification number
fee fund (280-00-2213)................................................................No limit
Highway safety fund (280-00-2217-2250)..................................No limit
State forfeiture

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 211
fund – pending (280-00-2264-2264)...........................................No limit
Highway patrol training
center fund (280-00-2306)...........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the highway patrol
training center fund for use of the highway patrol training center by
other state agencies, local government agencies and not-for-profit
organizations: Provided further, That the superintendent of the Kansas
highway patrol is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for
recovery of costs associated with use of the highway patrol training
center by other state agencies, local government agencies and not-for-
profit organizations: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed
in order to recover all or part of the expenses incurred in providing for
the use of the highway patrol training center by other state or local
government agencies: And provided further, That all fees received for
use of the highway patrol training center by other state agencies, local
government agencies or not-for-profit organizations shall be deposited
in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-
4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the highway
patrol training center fund.
Highway patrol motor
vehicle fund (280-00-2317-2800)................................................No limit
Aircraft fund – on budget (280-00-2368-2360)...........................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the aircraft fund – on
budget by the above agency in an amount of not to exceed $1,300,000
for the maintenance and operations of any aircraft of the above agency.
DUI – IID designation fund (280-00-2380-2380).......................No limit
Kansas highway patrol state
forfeiture fund (280-00-2413-2100)............................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 60-4117, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, expenditures may be made from the Kansas highway
patrol state forfeiture fund for salaries and wages, and associated fringe
benefits of non-supervisory personnel.
For patrol of Kansas
turnpike fund (280-00-2514-2500)..............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the for patrol of
Kansas turnpike fund for necessary moving expenses in accordance
with K.S.A. 75-3225, and amendments thereto.
Drug tax stamp enforcement fund (280-00-2825-2825)..............No limit
Disaster grants – public assistance –
federal fund (280-00-3005-3005)................................................No limit
Edward Byrne memorial
justice assistance grant –
federal fund (280-00-3057).........................................................No limit
National motor carrier safety assistance program –
federal fund (280-00-3073).........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made from the national motor
carrier safety assistance program – federal fund for necessary moving
expenses in accordance with K.S.A. 75-3225, and amendments thereto.
BAU fund (280-00-3092)............................................................No limit
Homeland security federal fund (280-00-3199)..........................No limit
Edward Byrne memorial assistance grant –
state and local law enforcement –
federal fund (280-00-3213-3213)................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partner –
federal fund (280-00-3216-3216)................................................No limit
Public safety partnership
and community policing
federal fund (280-00-3218-3218)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 212
Performance registration
information system management –
federal fund (280-00-3239-3239)................................................No limit
Commercial vehicle
information system network –
federal fund (280-00-3244-3244)................................................No limit
High priority – innovative technology
deployment grant fund (280-00-3244-3245)...............................No limit
Highway planning and construction –
federal fund (280-00-3333-3333)................................................No limit
KHP federal forfeiture –
federal fund (280-00-3545).........................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the KHP federal
forfeiture – fund by the above agency for the capital improvement
project or projects for troop F headquarters.
High intensity drug trafficking areas –
federal fund (280-00-3615-3000)................................................No limit
Homeland security program –
federal fund (280-00-3629).........................................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (280-00-3756)................No limit
Emergency ops cntr –
federal fund (280-00-3808-3808)................................................No limit
State and community highway safety –
federal fund (280-00-3815-3815)................................................No limit
Capitol area security fund (280-00-6143-6100)..........................No limit
Executive aircraft fund (280-00-6144-6120)...............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the executive aircraft
fund to provide aircraft services to other state agencies and to purchase
liability and property damage insurance for state aircraft: Provided
further, That the superintendent of the highway patrol is hereby
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for such aircraft services to
other state agencies: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed
in order to recover all or part of the operating expenses incurred in
providing such services: And provided further, That all fees received for
such services shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the executive aircraft fund: And provided further, That
expenditures shall be made from the executive aircraft fund by the
above agency in an amount of not to exceed $1,500,000 for the
maintenance and operations of any aircraft of the above agency.
Motor vehicle fuel and storeroom
sales fund (280-00-6155-6200)...................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the motor vehicle fuel
and storeroom sales fund to acquire and sell commodities and to
provide services to local governments and other state agencies:
Provided further, That the superintendent of the Kansas highway patrol
is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for such
commodities and services: And provided further, That such fees shall be
fixed in order to recover all or part of the expenses incurred in
acquiring or providing and selling such commodities and services: And
provided further, That all fees received for such commodities and
services shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the motor vehicle fuel and storeroom sales fund.
1122 program clearing fund (280-00-7280)................................No limit
Gifts and donations fund (280-00-7331).....................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the gifts and donations fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $1,000.
Ignition interlock devices program fund......................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 213
Body worn camera implementation fund....................................No limit
General department of justice federal grant fund........................No limit
(b) On or before the 10th of each month during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
from the state general fund to the 1122 program clearing fund (280-00-
7280-7280) interest earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance of
moneys in the 1122 program clearing fund for the preceding month;
and (2) the net earnings rate for the pooled money investment portfolio
for the preceding month.
(c) Except as provided further, on July 1, 2025, October 1, 2025,
January 1, 2026, and April 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter each such date
as moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer an amount specified by the executive director of the state
corporation commission, with the approval of the director of the
budget, of not more than $500,000 from the motor carrier license fees
fund (143-00-2812-5500) of the state corporation commission to the
motor carrier safety assistance program state fund (280-00-2208) of the
Kansas highway patrol: Provided, however, That the total of all
transfers shall not exceed $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026.
(d) Except as provided further, on July 1, 2025, October 1, 2025,
January 1, 2026, and April 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter each such date
as moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $19,742,183 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100)
of the department of transportation to the Kansas highway patrol
operations fund (280-00-2034-1100) of the Kansas highway patrol for
the purpose of financing the Kansas highway patrol operations. In
addition to other purposes for which expenditures may be made from
the state highway fund during fiscal year 2026 and notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, transfers and expenditures may be made from the state highway
fund during fiscal year 2026 for support and maintenance of the Kansas
highway patrol.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $295,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of
the department of transportation to the highway safety fund (280-00-
2217-2250) of the Kansas highway patrol for the purpose of financing
the motorist assistance program of the Kansas highway patrol.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $250,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of
the department of transportation to the general fees fund (280-00-2179-
2200) of the Kansas highway patrol for the purpose of financing
operating expenditures of the Kansas highway patrol.
(g) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,300,000 from the
state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation to the aircraft fund – on budget (280-00-2368-2360) of
the Kansas highway patrol.
(h) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $1,500,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100)
of the department of transportation to the executive aircraft fund (280-
00-6144-6120) of the Kansas highway patrol for the purpose of
maintaining and operating the executive aircraft.
Sec. 128.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 214
ATTORNEY GENERAL – KANSAS
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Meth lab cleanup (083-00-1000-0200)........................................$29,618
Sec. 129.
ATTORNEY GENERAL – KANSAS
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (083-00-1000-0083)........................$44,616,981
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated to the operating expenditures account for fiscal year
2026: Provided, however, That expenditures from the operating
expenditures account for official hospitality shall not exceed $750.
Meth lab cleanup (083-00-1000-0200)........................................$51,447
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the meth lab cleanup
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That the above agency is hereby
authorized to make expenditures from the meth lab cleanup account to
contract for services for remediation of sites determined by law
enforcement as hazardous resulting from the production of
methamphetamine.
Forensic DNA analysis...............................................................$500,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such account during fiscal year 2026 to provide for forensic genetic
genealogy DNA analysis for the purposes of solving violent crimes and
identifying human remains.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Record check fee fund (083-00-2044-2010)...............................No limit
Provided, That the director of the Kansas bureau of investigation is
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees in order to recover all or part
of the direct and indirect operating expenses for criminal history record
checks conducted for noncriminal justice entities including government
agencies and private organizations: Provided, however, That all moneys
received for such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the record check fee fund: Provided
further, That expenditures may be made from the record check fee fund
for operating expenditures of the Kansas bureau of investigation.
Forensic laboratory and materials
fee fund (083-00-2077)................................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the forensic laboratory
and materials fee fund for the acquisition of laboratory equipment and
materials and for other direct or indirect operating expenditures for the
forensic laboratory of the Kansas bureau of investigation: Provided,
however, That all expenditures from this fund of moneys received as
Kansas bureau of investigation laboratory analysis fees pursuant to
K.S.A. 28-176, and amendments thereto, shall be for the purposes
authorized by K.S.A. 28-176(e), and amendments thereto: Provided
further, That all fees received for such laboratory tests, including all
moneys received pursuant to K.S.A. 28-176(a), and amendments
thereto, shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 215
credited to the forensic laboratory and materials fee fund.
General fees fund (083-00-2140)................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund
for direct or indirect operating expenditures incurred for the following
activities: (1) Conducting education and training classes for special
agents and other personnel, including official hospitality; (2)
purchasing illegal drugs, making contacts and acquiring information
leading to illegal drug outlets, contraband and stolen property, and
conducting other activities for similar investigatory purposes; (3)
conducting investigations and related activities for the Kansas lottery or
the Kansas racing and gaming commission; (4) conducting DNA
forensic laboratory tests and related activities; (5) preparing, publishing
and distributing crime prevention materials; and (6) conducting agency
operations: Provided, however, That the director of the Kansas bureau
of investigation is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees in
order to recover all or part of the direct and indirect operating expenses
incurred, except as otherwise hereinafter provided, for the following:
(1) Education and training services made available to local law
enforcement personnel in classes conducted for special agents and other
personnel of the Kansas bureau of investigation; (2) investigations and
related activities conducted for the Kansas lottery or the Kansas racing
and gaming commission, except that the fees fixed for these activities
shall be fixed in order to recover all of the direct and indirect expenses
incurred for such investigations and related activities; (3) DNA forensic
laboratory tests and related activities; and (4) sale and distribution of
crime prevention materials: Provided further, That all fees received for
such activities shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and
shall be credited to the general fees fund: And provided further, That all
moneys that are expended for any such evidence purchase, information
acquisition or similar investigatory purpose or activity from whatever
funding source and that are recovered shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the general fees fund: And
provided further, That all moneys received as gifts, grants or donations
for the preparation, publication or distribution of crime prevention
materials shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the general fees fund: And provided further, That
expenditures from any moneys received from the division of alcoholic
beverage control and credited to the general fees fund may be made by
the Kansas bureau of investigation for all purposes for which
expenditures may be made for operating expenditures: And provided
further, That expenditures from any moneys received from the Kansas
criminal justice information system committee and credited to the
general fees fund may be made by the Kansas bureau of investigation
for all purposes for which expenditures may be made for training
activities and official hospitality.
Kansas bureau of investigation state
forfeiture fund (083-00-2283).....................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures made from the Kansas bureau of
investigation state forfeiture fund shall not be considered a source of
revenue to meet normal operating expenses, but for such special,
additional law enforcement purposes including direct or indirect
operating expenditures incurred for conducting educational classes and
training for special agents and other personnel, including official
hospitality.
Kansas bureau of investigation motor
vehicle fund (083-00-2344-2050)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 216
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the Kansas bureau of
investigation motor vehicle fund to acquire and sell motor vehicles for
the Kansas bureau of investigation: Provided further, That all moneys
received for sale of motor vehicles of the Kansas bureau of
investigation shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with
the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall
be credited to the Kansas bureau of investigation motor vehicle fund.
Criminal justice information system
line fund (083-00-2457)...............................................................No limit
Provided, That in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made from the criminal justice information system line fund
pursuant to K.S.A. 74-5707, and amendments thereto, expenditures
may be made from the criminal justice information system line fund for
salaries and wages, contractual services, commodities and capital
outlay for the maintenance and support of the Kansas criminal justice
information system.
DNA database fund (083-00-2676-2700)....................................No limit
Disaster grants – public assistance
federal fund (083-00-3005-3005)................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial justice assistance
federal fund (083-00-3057).........................................................No limit
eCitation national priority safety program –
federal fund (083-00-3092).........................................................No limit
Sexual assault kit grant –
federal fund (083-00-3146-3146)................................................No limit
National criminal history improvement program
federal fund (083-00-3189-3189)................................................No limit
Homeland security federal fund (083-00-3199)..........................No limit
Ed Byrne state/local law enforcement
federal fund (083-00-3213-3213)................................................No limit
Violence against women – ARRA
federal fund (083-00-3214).........................................................No limit
Bulletproof vest partnership –
federal fund (083-00-3216-3211)................................................No limit
Project safe
neighborhoods fund (083-00-3217-3217)...................................No limit
Public safety partnership
and community policing
federal fund (083-00-3218-3218)................................................No limit
Law enforcement mental health and
wellness act grant (083-00-3218-3221).......................................No limit
Forensic DNA backlog reduction
federal fund (083-00-3226-3226)................................................No limit
Coverdell forensic sciences improvement
federal fund (083-00-3227-3227)................................................No limit
AWA implementation grant program
federal fund (083-00-3228-3228)................................................No limit
Anti-gang initiative
federal fund (083-00-3229-3229)................................................No limit
Crime victim assistance
discretionary grant (083-00-3250-3260).....................................No limit
Substance use disorder
federal fund (083-00-3294).........................................................No limit
High intensity drug trafficking area –
federal fund (083-00-3349-3100)................................................No limit
Federal grants – marijuana eradication –
federal fund (083-00-3350).........................................................No limit
Ed Byrne memorial JAG – ARRA
federal fund (083-00-3455-3455)................................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 217
Convicted/arrestee DNA backlog reduction
federal fund (083-00-3489-3489)................................................No limit
Convicted offender/arrestee
DNA backlog reduction
federal fund (083-00-3489-3489)................................................No limit
KBI-FBI reimbursement
federal fund (083-00-3506-3506)................................................No limit
Social security administration reimbursement –
federal fund (083-00-3560-3560)................................................No limit
Ncs-x grant – federal fund (083-00-3580-3580).........................No limit
State homeland security program
federal fund (083-00-3629-3629)................................................No limit
Byrne discretionary
community fund (083-00-3654)..................................................No limit
Coronavirus emergency
supplemental fund (083-00-3671)...............................................No limit
American rescue plan state relief fund (083-00-3756)................No limit
State and community
highway safety fund (083-00-3815)............................................No limit
Federal forfeiture fund (083-00-3940)........................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures made from the federal forfeiture fund shall
not be considered a source of revenue to meet normal operating
expenses, but for such special, additional law enforcement purposes
including direct or indirect operating expenditures incurred for
conducting educational classes and training for special agents and other
personnel, including official hospitality.
Agency motor pool fund (083-00-6117)......................................No limit
Intergovernmental
service fund (083-00-6119-6100)................................................No limit
Opioid summit fund.....................................................................No limit
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the attorney
general may authorize full-time non-FTE unclassified permanent
positions and regular part-time non-FTE unclassified permanent
positions for the Kansas bureau of investigation that are paid from
appropriations for the attorney general – Kansas bureau of investigation
for fiscal year 2026 made by this act or other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, which shall be in addition to the
number of full-time and regular part-time positions equated to full-
time, excluding seasonal and temporary positions, authorized for fiscal
year 2026 for the attorney general – Kansas bureau of investigation.
The attorney general shall certify each such authorization for non-FTE
unclassified permanent positions for the Kansas bureau of investigation
to the director of personnel services of the department of administration
and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of
legislative research and the director of the budget.
Sec. 130.
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Emergency medical services
operating fund (206-00-2326-4000)........................................$2,318,031
Provided, That the emergency medical services board is hereby
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees in order to recover costs
incurred for distributing educational videos, replacing lost educational
materials and mailing labels of those licensed by the board: Provided
further, That such fees may be fixed in order to recover all or part of

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 218
such costs: And provided further, That all moneys received from such
fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the emergency medical services operating fund: And
provided further, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 65-
6128 or 65-6129b, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, all
moneys received by the emergency medical services board for fees
authorized by law for licensure or the issuance of permits, or for any
other regulatory duties and functions prescribed by law in the field of
emergency medical services, shall be deposited in the state treasury to
the credit of the emergency medical services operating fund of the
emergency medical services board: And provided further, That
expenditures from the emergency medical services operating fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $2,000.
Education incentive grant
payment fund (206-00-2396-2510).............................................No limit
Provided, That the priority for award of education incentive grants shall
be to award such grants to rural areas.
EMS revolving fund (206-00-2449-2400)...................................No limit
Provided, That, if an organization agrees to receive money from the
EMS revolving fund, the organization shall enter into a grant agreement
requiring such organization to submit a written report to the emergency
medical services board detailing and accounting for all expenditures
and receipts related to the use of the moneys received from the EMS
revolving fund: Provided further, That the emergency medical services
board shall prepare a written report specifying and accounting for all
moneys allocated to and expended from the EMS revolving fund: And
provided further, That such report shall be submitted to the house of
representatives committee on appropriations and the senate committee
on ways and means on or before February 1, 2026.
EMS criminal history and
fingerprinting fund (206-00-2806-2806).....................................No limit
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the emergency medical services board from the emergency
medical services operating fund (206-00-2326-4000) for fiscal year
2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by the
emergency medical services board from the emergency medical
services operating fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of
implementing a grant program for emergency medical services training
and educational assistance for persons in underserved areas: Provided,
That when issuing such grants, first priority shall be given to
ambulance services submitting applications seeking grants to pay the
cost of recruiting volunteers and cost of the initial courses of training
for emergency medical service providers: Provided further, That the
second priority shall be given to ambulance services submitting
applications seeking grants to pay the cost of continuing education for
emergency medical service providers: And provided further, That the
third priority shall be given to ambulance services submitting
applications seeking grants to pay the cost of education for emergency
medical service providers who are obtaining a postsecondary education
degree for the purpose of becoming instructors of emergency medical
services educational courses.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the emergency medical services board from the moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for the emergency medical services board for fiscal year
2026, as authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 219
emergency medical services board from moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for the
emergency medical services board for fiscal year 2026 to require
emergency medical services agencies in each of the six EMS regions of
the state to prepare and submit a report of the expenditures made and
moneys received in each of the EMS regions that are related to the
operation and administration of the Kansas emergency medical services
regional operations to the emergency medical services board: Provided,
That the report for each EMS region shall specify and account for all
moneys appropriated from the state treasury for the emergency medical
services board and disbursed to each such EMS region for the operation
of the education and training of emergency medical service providers in
each such EMS region.
(d) On July 1, 2025, and January 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter
each such date as moneys are available, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer $150,000 from the emergency medical services
operating fund (206-00-2326-4000) to the educational incentive grant
payment fund (206-00-2396-2510) of the emergency medical services
board.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
budget and the director of legislative research shall consult periodically
and review the balance credited to and the estimated receipts to be
credited to the emergency medical services operating fund (206-00-
2326-4000) during fiscal year 2026, and, upon a finding by the director
of the budget in consultation with the director of legislative research
that the total of the unencumbered balance and estimated receipts to be
credited to the emergency medical services operating fund during fiscal
year 2026 are insufficient to fund the budgeted expenditures and
transfers from the emergency medical services operating fund for fiscal
year 2026 in accordance with the provisions of appropriation acts, the
director of the budget shall certify such funding to the director of
accounts and reports. Upon receipt of any such certification, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount of moneys
from the education incentive grant payment fund (206-00-2396-2510)
to the emergency medical services operating fund that is required, in
accordance with the certification by the director of the budget under
this subsection, to fund the budgeted expenditures and transfers from
the emergency medical services operating fund for the remainder of
fiscal year 2026 in accordance with the provisions of appropriation
acts, as specified by the director of the budget pursuant to such
certification.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if any EMS
regional council enters into a grant agreement with the emergency
medical services board, such council shall be required to submit
pursuant to such grant agreement a written report detailing and
accounting for all expenditures and receipts of such council during such
fiscal year. The emergency medical services board shall prepare a
written report specifying and accounting for all moneys received by
and expended by each individual council that has reported to the
emergency medical services board pursuant to such grant agreement
and submit such report to the house of representatives committee on
appropriations and the senate committee on ways and means on or
before February 1, 2026.
Sec. 131.
KANSAS SENTENCING COMMISSION
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $1,378,186 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 130(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas from
the state general fund in the operating expenditures account (626-00-

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 220
1000-0303), the sum of $63,873 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the $10,840,817
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 130(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the substance abuse treatment
programs account (626-00-1000-0600), the sum of $2,634,658 is
hereby lapsed.
Sec. 132.
KANSAS SENTENCING COMMISSION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (626-00-1000-0303)..........................$1,443,127
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the operating expenditures account for official
hospitality shall not exceed $3,000.
Substance abuse
treatment programs (626-00-1000-0600)..............................$11,955,628
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the substance abuse
treatment programs account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 21-6824, and amendments
thereto, or any other statute, in addition to other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the substance
abuse treatment programs account of the state general fund during
fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made from such account for
operating costs.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (626-00-2201)................................................No limit
Statistical analysis – federal fund (626-00-3600)........................No limit
Coronavirus relief fund (626-00-3753).......................................No limit
Sec. 133.
KANSAS COMMISSION ON PEACE OFFICERS'
STANDARDS AND TRAINING
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 132(a)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the Kansas
commission on peace officers' standards and training fund (529-00-
2583-2580) of the Kansas commission on peace officers' standards and
training is hereby increased from $903,574 to $947,358.
Sec. 134.
KANSAS COMMISSION ON PEACE OFFICERS'
STANDARDS AND TRAINING
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Kansas commission on
peace officers' standards and
training fund (529-00-2583-2580)..........................................$1,071,656
Provided, That expenditures from the Kansas commission on peace
officers' standards and training fund for official hospitality shall not
exceed $1,000.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 221
Local law enforcement training
reimbursement fund (529-00-2746-2700)...................................No limit
Sec. 135.
STATE 911 BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Critical facility mapping grant program..................................$2,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such account during fiscal year 2026 to establish the critical facility
mapping grant program to facilitate efficient emergency response by
public safety agencies in the state of Kansas: Provided, That the
purpose of such program is to develop current and authoritative interior
and exterior GIS data for critical infrastructure in the state of Kansas:
Provided further, That the above agency shall administer the program to
provide grants to Kansas PSAPs, as defined in K.S.A. 12-5363, and
amendments thereto, to develop such GIS data that meets the
requirements established by the agency in a request for proposal: And
provided further, That the program shall prioritize grants to develop
such GIS data for the following facilities in the state in such order: (1)
Any public or private elementary school or secondary school; (2) any
public postsecondary state educational institution; (3) government
buildings; (4) mass gathering sites; and (5) healthcare facilities: And
provided further, That any Kansas PSAP may apply to the program for
a grant for services to develop such GIS data for one or more buildings
in the service area of the PSAP, and such data shall: (A) Be in formats
that are compatible with and supported by public safety applications
commonly used by local, regional and state agencies within Kansas;
(B) be in formats capable of being printed, shared electronically and, if
requested, digitally integrated into interactive mobile platforms in use;
(C) be verified for accuracy by the entity producing the data by
conducting a walkthrough of the school facilities and grounds being
mapped; (D) be able to be represented as oriented true north, include a
grid with "x" and "y" coordinates for reference and include z-axis
elevation data; (E) include accurate floor plans overlaid on current,
verified aerial imagery of the facility grounds; (F) include site-specific
labels that match the structure of the buildings, including room labels,
hallway names, external door or stairwell numbers and the location of
hazards, critical utility locations, key boxes, automated external
defibrillators and trauma kits; (G) contain site-specific labels that match
the facility grounds, including parking areas, athletic fields,
surrounding roads and neighboring properties; and (H) be provided to
the facility owner and appropriate public safety agencies at no
additional cost beyond initial production with ownership of the data
being granted to the facilities to ensure that such facilities can use the
data permanently without further fees or restrictions.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
State 911 fund..............................................................................No limit
State 911 grant fund.....................................................................No limit
State 911 operations fund............................................................No limit
Sec. 136.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (046-00-1000-0053)........................$14,501,415
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 222
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed $10,000:
Provided, however, That if federal cooperative funding provided by the
food safety and inspection service of the United States department of
agriculture is equal to or greater than state funding approved for
expenditures budgeted for meat and poultry inspections, then on July 1,
2025, of the $14,501,415 appropriated for the above agency for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by this section from the state general
fund in the operating expenditures account, the sum of $350,000 is
hereby lapsed.
Agency legal services (046-00-1000-0300).................................$50,000
Animal facilities inspection program emergency
animal shelter (046-00-1000-0065).............................................$50,000
BVLOS operations test range.................................................$3,000,000
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such fund during fiscal year 2026 to acquire technology and necessary
approvals to operate and maintain BVLOS operations for an
agriculture-focused and FAA-approved UAS test range: Provided
further, That the above agency shall work with the Kansas
congressional delegation for federal funds for BVLOS operations.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Meat and poultry inspection
fee fund (046-00-2004-0700)......................................................No limit
Entomology fee fund (046-00-2006-0900)..................................No limit
Livestock market brand inspection
fee fund (046-00-2007-2010)......................................................No limit
Veterinary inspection fee fund (046-00-2009-2020)...................No limit
Livestock brand fee fund (046-00-2011-2030)............................No limit
Grain commodity commission
services fund (046-00-2018-1070)..............................................No limit
Water structures fund (046-00-2037-1075).................................No limit
Water structures – state
highway fund (046-00-2043-1080).............................................No limit
Kansas agricultural
remediation fund (046-00-2095-1090)........................................No limit
Dairy fee fund (046-00-2105-1015)............................................No limit
Water resources cost fund (046-00-2110-1020)..........................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received by the secretary of agriculture from
any governmental or nongovernmental source to implement the
provisions of the Kansas water banking act, K.S.A. 82a-761 through
82a-773, and amendments thereto, which are hereby authorized to be
applied for and received, shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the water resources cost fund.
Soil amendment fee fund (046-00-2117-1100)............................No limit
Agricultural liming materials
fee fund (046-00-2118-1200).......................................................No limit
Weights and measures fee fund (046-00-2165-1500)..................No limit
Water appropriation
certification fund (046-00-2168-1600)........................................No limit
Agriculture seed fee fund (046-00-2187-2720)...........................No limit
Chemigation fee fund (046-00-2194-1800).................................No limit
Animal disease control fund (046-00-2202-2500)......................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the animal disease control fund for

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 223
official hospitality shall not exceed $450.
Animal dealers fee fund (046-00-2207-2050).............................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the animal dealers fee fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $300: Provided further, That
expenditures shall be made from the animal dealers fee fund by the
livestock commissioner for operating expenditures for an educational
course regarding animals and their care and treatment as authorized by
K.S.A. 47-1707, and amendments thereto, to be provided through the
internet or printed booklets.
Plant pest emergency
response fund (046-00-2210-1805).............................................No limit
Water transfer hearing fund (046-00-2278-1900)........................No limit
Publications fee fund (046-00-2322-2000)..................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the publications fee
fund for operating expenditures related to preparation and publication
of informational or educational materials related to the programs or
functions of the Kansas department of agriculture: Provided further,
That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-1005, and
amendments thereto, to the contrary, the secretary of agriculture is
hereby authorized to enter into a contract with a commercial publisher
for the printing, distribution and sale of such materials: And provided
further, That the secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to collect
fees from such commercial publisher pursuant to contract with the
publisher for the sale of such materials: And provided further, That the
secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to receive and accept
grants, gifts, donations or funds from any non-federal source for the
printing, publication and distribution of such materials: And provided
further, That all moneys received from such fees or for such grants,
gifts, donations or other funds received for such purpose shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
publications fee fund.
Market development fund (046-00-2331-2351)..........................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the market
development fund for official hospitality: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from the market development fund for loans
pursuant to loan agreements, which are hereby authorized to be entered
into by the secretary of agriculture: And provided further, That all
moneys received by the department of agriculture for repayment of
loans made under the agricultural value added center program shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
market development fund.
Trademark fund (046-00-2333-2360)..........................................No limit
Commercial industrial hemp act licensing
fee fund (046-00-2343-2343)......................................................No limit
General fees fund (046-00-2346-2100).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund
for operating expenditures for the regulatory programs of the Kansas
department of agriculture and for official hospitality: Provided further,
That the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or
amounts specified by the secretary of agriculture from any special
revenue fund or funds of the department of agriculture that have
available moneys to the general fees fund: And provided further, That
the director of accounts and reports shall transmit a copy of such
transfer request to the director of legislative research.
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (046-00-2402-2200)..........................................No limit
Lodging fee fund (046-00-2456-2400)........................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 224
Buffer participation
incentive fund (046-00-2517-2510).............................................No limit
Land reclamation fee fund (046-00-2542-2090).........................No limit
Petroleum inspection
fee fund (046-00-2550-2550)......................................................No limit
U.S. geological survey
cooperative gauge agreement
grants fund (046-00-2629-2800).................................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to enter
into a cooperative gauge agreement with the United States geological
survey: Provided further, That all moneys collected for the construction
or operation of river water intake gauges shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the U.S. geological survey
cooperative gauge agreement grants fund: And provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this fund to pay the costs incurred in
the construction or operation of river water intake gauges.
Laboratory equipment fund (046-00-2710-2700)........................No limit
Arkansas river gaging fund (046-00-2751-2751)........................No limit
Laboratory testing services
fee fund (046-00-2752-2752)......................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the laboratory testing
services fee fund for administrative operating expenditures of the
agriculture laboratory of the Kansas department of agriculture:
Provided further, That the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
an amount or amounts specified by the secretary of agriculture from
any special revenue fund or funds of the department of agriculture that
have available moneys to the laboratory testing services fee fund: And
provided further, That the director of accounts and reports shall
transmit a copy of such transfer request to the director of legislative
research.
Compliance education fee fund (046-00-2757-2757)..................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the compliance education fee fund
shall be for the purposes of compliance education: Provided further,
That, notwithstanding the provisions of any statute to the contrary,
during fiscal year 2026, the secretary of agriculture is hereby
authorized to remit and designate amounts of moneys collected for civil
fines and penalties by the department of agriculture to the state
treasurer for deposit in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, to the credit of
the compliance education fee fund: And provided further, That, upon
receipt of each such remittance and designation, the state treasurer shall
credit the entire amount of such remittance to the compliance education
fee fund.
Conference registration and
disbursement fund (046-00-2772-2101)......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the conference
registration and disbursement fund for official hospitality.
Reimbursement and
recovery fund (046-00-2773-2294).............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the reimbursement and
recovery fund for official hospitality.
Agricultural chemical
fee fund (046-00-2800-2900)......................................................No limit
Feeding stuffs
fee fund (046-00-2801-4000)......................................................No limit
Fertilizer fee fund (046-00-2802-4100).......................................No limit
Pesticide use fee fund (046-00-2804-4300).................................No limit
Egg fee fund (046-00-2808-4600)...............................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 225
Warehouse fee fund (046-00-2809-4700)....................................No limit
Food safety fee fund (046-00-2813-4805)...................................No limit
Pesticide disposal fund (046-00-2831-2831)...............................No limit
Water structures emergency
fund (046-00-2868-2868)............................................................No limit
Meat and poultry inspection
fund – federal (046-00-3013-3100).............................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA
10.932 fund (046-00-3022-3903)................................................No limit
Water structures NRCS
LIDAR grant (046-00-3081-3081)..............................................No limit
Market protection/
promotion fund (046-00-3104-3315)...........................................No limit
Homeland security grant –
federal fund (046-00-3199-3436)................................................No limit
Cooperating technical partners –
federal fund (046-00-3203-3213)................................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA 10.931 fund (046-00-3228-3220)................No limit
EPA pesticide performance partnership grant –
federal fund (046-00-3295-3290)................................................No limit
Plant/animal disease and
pest control (046-00-3360)..........................................................No limit
FEMA dam safety –
federal fund (046-00-3362-3353)................................................No limit
USDA Kansas forestry service –
federal fund (046-00-3426-3380)................................................No limit
Ag stats report fund (046-00-3427-3390)....................................No limit
National floodplain insurance assistance (CAP) –
federal fund (046-00-3445-3330)................................................No limit
Food/drug administration/research (046-00-3462)......................No limit
Specialty crop block grant fund (046-00-3463-3300).................No limit
Local food purchase agreement –
federal fund (046-00-3662-3662)................................................No limit
Resilient food system infrastructure
program grant fund (046-00-3663-3663)....................................No limit
Watershed protect approach/WTR
RSRCE MGT fund (046-00-3889)..............................................No limit
NRCS stream bank water quality –
federal fund (046-00-3917).........................................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA
10.069 fund (046-00-3952-3901)................................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA
10.924 fund (046-00-3953-3902)................................................No limit
Flx fnding mdl coop
agrmt fund (046-00-3954-3905)..................................................No limit
NRCS grant CFDA
10.912 fund (046-00-3955-3904)................................................No limit
Gifts and donations fund (046-00-7305-7000)............................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of agriculture is hereby authorized to
receive gifts and donations of resources and money for services for the
benefit and support of agriculture and purposes related thereto:
Provided further, That such gifts and donations of money shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
gifts and donations fund.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the water plan
project or projects specified, the following:
Interstate water issues (046-00-1800-0070)...............................$541,029

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 226
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the interstate water issues
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Water use (046-00-1800-0075)..................................................$250,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water use account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026.
Basin management (046-00-1800-0080)...................................$704,740
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the basin management
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Irrigation technology (046-00-1800-0088).............................$2,550,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the irrigation technology
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Crop and livestock research (046-00-1800-0089)..................$1,450,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the crop and livestock
research account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
in an amount of not less than $1,000,000 shall be made by the above
agency from such account during fiscal year 2026 for the collaborative
sorghum investment program: Provided, however, That expenditures
from this account for the collaborative sorghum investment program
shall only be made if the expenditures are matched by nonstate moneys
on a $3-for-$1 basis.
Soil health initiative (046-00-1800-0090)..................................$400,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the soil health initiative
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Water resources cost share (046-00-1800-1205).....................$4,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water resources cost
share account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That the initial
allocation for grants to conservation districts for fiscal year 2026 shall
be made on a priority basis, as determined by the secretary of
agriculture and the provisions of the state water plan: And provided
further, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $500,000 shall
be made by the above agency from such account during fiscal year
2026 to provide cost share grants to livestock production facilities for
the purpose of improving water efficiency through technology or
system upgrades.
Nonpoint source pollution assistance (046-00-1800-1210)....$1,871,401
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the nonpoint source
pollution assistance account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Conservation district aid (046-00-1800-1220)........................$5,252,706
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the conservation district
aid account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas conservation reserve
enhancement program (046-00-1800-1225)...........................$1,250,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas conservation
reserve enhancement program account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Watershed dam construction (046-00-1800-1240)..................$3,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the watershed dam
construction account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That expenditures
from the watershed dam construction account are hereby authorized for

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 227
engineering contracts for watershed planning as determined by the
secretary of agriculture.
Kansas water quality buffer initiatives (046-00-1800-1250)................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas water quality
buffer initiatives account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided further, That all
expenditures from the Kansas water quality buffer initiatives account
shall be made for grants or incentives to install water quality best
management practices: And provided further, That such expenditures
may be made from this account from the approved budget amount for
fiscal year 2026 in accordance with contracts, which are hereby
authorized to be entered into by the secretary of agriculture, for such
grants or incentives.
Riparian and wetland program (046-00-1800-1260).................$154,024
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the riparian and wetland
program account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Streambank stabilization projects (046-00-1800-1290)..........$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the streambank
stabilization projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas reservoir protection initiative administration.............$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas reservoir
protection initiative administration account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
agriculture, with the approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state
water plan fund for the Kansas department of agriculture to another
item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan
fund for the Kansas department of agriculture: Provided, That the
secretary of agriculture shall certify each such transfer to the director of
accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification
to: (1) The director of the budget; (2) the director of legislative
research; (3) the chairperson of the house of representatives agriculture
and natural resources budget committee; and (4) the appropriate
chairperson of the subcommittee on agriculture of the senate committee
on ways and means.
(e) On July 1, 2025, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-
416, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer $128,379 from the state highway
fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of transportation to the
water structures – state highway fund (046-00-2043-1080) of the
Kansas department of agriculture.
(f) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:
Agriculture marketing
program (046-00-1900-1110)..................................................$1,000,000
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the agriculture
marketing program account for loans pursuant to loan agreements,
which are hereby authorized to be entered into by the secretary of
agriculture in accordance with repayment provisions and other terms
and conditions as may be prescribed by the secretary of agriculture
therefor under the agricultural value added center program.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 82a-767, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute concerning the length of time
for conducting water bank evaluations, in addition to the other purposes
for which expenditures may be made by the department of agriculture

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 228
from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any special
revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year 2026, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session
of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the department of
agriculture from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 for the chief
engineer, in consultation with the director of the Kansas water office, to
develop a request for proposal and select an independent consultant to
conduct the evaluation, as described in K.S.A. 82a-767, and
amendments thereto, of the operations of the central Kansas water
bank: Provided, That such evaluation shall include specific findings
regarding the consumptive use and potential impairment impacts
involved with the use of safe deposit accounts in the Rattlesnake Creek
hydrologic unit: Provided further, That the results of such evaluation
shall be submitted to the house of representatives committee on water
and the senate committee on agriculture and natural resources on or
before January 12, 2026.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
agriculture, with approval of the director of the budget, may transfer
any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state
water plan fund for the Kansas department of agriculture to any item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
Kansas water office, university of Kansas, Kansas department of
wildlife and parks or the department of health and environment –
division of environment: Provided, That the secretary of agriculture
shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports
and upon receipt of such certification, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer such certified amount to the certified item of
appropriation: Provided further, That when the secretary of agriculture
provides certification to the director of accounts and reports under this
section, the secretary shall transmit a copy of each such certification to
the director of legislative research, the chairperson of the house of
representatives agriculture and natural resources budget committee and
the appropriate chairperson of the subcommittee on natural resources of
the senate committee on ways and means.
Sec. 137.
STATE FAIR BOARD
(a) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or any
special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2025 as authorized by
section 136 of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or
any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures shall be made by the above agency from such
moneys for fiscal year 2025 to submit a report to the senate committee
on agriculture and natural resources and the house committee on
agriculture and natural resources budget during the 2026 regular
session of the legislature concerning the emergency command center at
the state fair and plans from the above agency to raise $750,000 in
nonstate moneys to complete such emergency command center.
Sec. 138.
STATE FAIR BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures, other than refunds authorized
by law and remittances of sales tax to the department of revenue, shall
not exceed the following:
State fair fee fund (373-00-5182-5100).......................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the state fair fee fund for official

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 229
hospitality shall not exceed $10,000.
State fair debt service special
revenue fund (373-00-2267-2200)...............................................No limit
State fair special cash fund (373-00-9088-9000).........................No limit
Sec. 139.
KANSAS WATER OFFICE
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Water resources operating
expenditures (709-00-1000-0303)...........................................$1,407,987
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water resources
operating expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$1,500.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
General fees fund (709-00-2022)................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the general fees fund
for operating expenditures for the Kansas water office, including
training and informational programs and official hospitality: Provided
further, That the director of the Kansas water office is hereby
authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for such programs: And
provided further, That fees for such programs shall be fixed in order to
recover all or part of the operating expenses incurred for such
programs, including official hospitality: And provided further, That all
fees received for such programs and all fees received for providing
access to or for furnishing copies of public records shall be deposited in
the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the general fees fund.
Lower Smoky Hill water supply
access fund (709-00-2203-2203).................................................No limit
Water marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100).................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the water marketing
fund for the purchase of vessel liability insurance.
Indirect cost fund (709-00-2419-2419).......................................No limit
State conservation storage water
supply fund (709-00-2502-2600).................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the state conservation storage water supply fund for acquisition of
storage or to complete studies or take actions necessary to ensure
reservoir storage sustainability, subject to the availability of moneys
credited to the state conservation storage water supply fund.
Local water project
match fund (709-00-2620-3200).................................................No limit
Provided, That all moneys received from local government entities and
instrumentalities to be used to match funds for water projects shall be
deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
local water project match fund: Provided further, That all moneys
credited to this fund shall be used to match state funds or federal funds,
or both, for water projects.
Water supply storage
assurance fund (709-00-2631).....................................................No limit
Provided, That no additional water supply storage space shall be
purchased in Milford, Perry, Big Hill or Hillsdale reservoirs during
fiscal year 2026 unless a contract is entered into under the state water

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 230
plan storage act, K.S.A. 82a-1301 et seq., and amendments thereto, to
supply water to users that is not held under contract in such reservoirs.
Republican river water conservation projects –
Nebraska moneys fund (709-00-2690-2640)...............................No limit
Republican river water conservation projects –
Colorado moneys fund (709-00-2691-2680)...............................No limit
South fork Republican river water conservation
projects fund (709-00-2824-2824)...............................................No limit
Provided, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above
agency shall pay an amount equal to the amount certified pursuant to
subsection (k) from the south fork Republican river water conservation
projects fund as a grant pursuant to the grant agreement entered into by
the Kansas water office and the Cheyenne county conservation district:
Provided further, That in accordance with the grant agreement, such
moneys shall be used exclusively for the purposes of paying all or a
portion of the costs of the projects specified in K.S.A. 82a-1804(g), and
amendments thereto, in the area lying in the south fork of the upper
Republican river basin in northwest Kansas in all or parts of Cheyenne
and Sherman counties: And provided further, That in accordance with
the grant agreement, all expenditures of such moneys shall be approved
by the Cheyenne county conservation district and the Kansas water
office: And provided further, That, in accordance with the grant
agreement, such moneys shall be administered by the Cheyenne county
conservation district and any interest earned on such moneys shall be
used for the purposes prescribed by this subsection: And provided
further, That in accordance with the grant agreement, all expenditures
and the status of new projects approved by the Cheyenne county
conservation district shall be reported not later than November 1, 2026,
to the Kansas water office.
Water technical assistance fund (709-00-2875-2875).................No limit
Water projects grant fund (709-00-2881-2881)...........................No limit
Equipment leasing
fee fund (709-00-2892-2892)......................................................No limit
Milford RCPP federal fund (709-00-3022-3022)........................No limit
Multipurpose grant fund (709-00-3103-3103)............................No limit
Emergency management performance
grant fund (709-00-3342-3342)...................................................No limit
HHPD rehabilitation
grant fund (709-00-3362-3362)...................................................No limit
Water reclamation and reuse
grant fund (709-00-3731-3731)...................................................No limit
EPA wetland development
grant fund (709-00-3914)............................................................No limit
Motor pool vehicle
replacement fund (709-00-6120-6100)........................................No limit
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the state water
plan project or projects specified, the following:
Assessment and evaluation (709-00-1800-1110)....................$1,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the assessment and
evaluation account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
MOU – storage operations and maintenance (709-00-1800-1150)
....................................................................................................$778,711
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the MOU – storage
operations and maintenance account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Stream gaging (709-00-1800-1190)...........................................$698,708
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the stream gaging

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 231
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Conservation assistance for water users (709-00-1800-1200)...$500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the conservation
assistance for water users account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Reservoir and water quality research (709-00-1800-1275).......$500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the reservoir and water
quality research account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Water quality partnerships (709-00-1800-1280).....................$1,464,890
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water quality
partnerships account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas water plan education
and outreach strategy (709-00-1800-1281)................................$400,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas water plan
education and outreach strategy account in excess of $100 as of June
30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
High plains aquifer partnerships (709-00-1800-1282)............$2,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the high plains aquifer
partnerships account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Kansas reservoir protection initiative (709-00-1800-1286)..................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Kansas reservoir
protection initiative account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Equus beds chloride plume
remediation project (709-00-1800-1287)..............................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the equus beds chloride
plume remediation project account in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Flood response study (709-00-1800-1288)...........................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the flood response study
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Arbuckle study (709-00-1800-1289).........................................$300,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the Arbuckle study
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
HB 2302 projects (709-00-1800-1300)......................................$850,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the HB 2302 projects
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
Water injection dredging (709-00-1800-1290).....................................$0
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the water injection
dredging account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Water planning and project development................................$1,500,000
Independent program evaluation................................................$450,000
John Redmond reservoir
hydrosuction pilot program.....................................................$1,500,000
Provided, That no expenditures shall be made by the above agency
from such account during fiscal year 2026 for a sedimentation
hydrosuction pilot program on the John Redmond reservoir unless the
above agency seeks a partnership with the United States army corps of
engineers or another federal agency and the United States army corps
of engineers or another federal agency commits to providing a
contribution for the costs of such hydrosuction pilot program.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 232
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from
the state water plan fund for the Kansas water office to another item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
Kansas water office: Provided, That the director of the Kansas water
office shall certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and
reports and shall transmit a copy of each such certification to: (1) The
director of legislative research; (2) the chairperson of the house of
representatives agriculture and natural resources budget committee; and
(3) the appropriate chairperson of the subcommittee on natural
resources of the senate committee on ways and means.
(e) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from
the state water plan fund for the Kansas water office to any item of
appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state water plan fund for the
Kansas department of agriculture, university of Kansas, Kansas
department of wildlife and parks or the department of health and
environment – division of environment: Provided, That the director of
the Kansas water office shall certify each such transfer to the director
of accounts and reports and upon receipt of such certification, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer such certified amount to
the certified item of appropriation: Provided further, That when the
director of the Kansas water office provides certification to the director
of accounts and reports under this section, the director shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research,
the chairperson of the house of representatives agriculture and natural
resources budget committee and the appropriate chairperson of the
subcommittee on natural resources of the senate committee on ways
and means.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if it appears that
the resources are insufficient to meet in full the estimated expenditures
as they become due to meet the financial obligations imposed by law
on the water marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) of the Kansas water
office as a result of a cash flow shortfall, the pooled money investment
board is authorized and directed to loan to the director of the Kansas
water office a sufficient amount or amounts of moneys to maintain the
cash flow of the water marketing fund upon approval of each such loan
by the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto.
No such loan shall be made unless the terms have been approved by the
director of the budget. A copy of the terms of each such loan shall be
submitted to the director of legislative research. The pooled money
investment board is authorized and directed to use any moneys in the
operating accounts, investment accounts or other investments of the
state of Kansas to provide the funds for each such loan. Each such loan
shall be repaid without interest within one year from the date of the
loan.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if it appears that
the resources are insufficient to meet in full the estimated expenditures
as they become due to meet the financial obligations imposed by law
on the water marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) of the Kansas water
office as a result of increases in water rates, fees or charges imposed by
the federal government, the pooled money investment board is
authorized and directed to loan to the director of the Kansas water
office a sufficient amount or amounts of moneys to reimburse the water
marketing fund for increases in water rates, fees or charges imposed by

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 233
the federal government and to allow the Kansas water office to spread
such increases to consumers over a longer period, except that no such
loan shall be made unless the terms thereof have been approved by the
state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto.
The pooled money investment board is authorized and directed to use
any moneys in the operating accounts, investment accounts or other
investments of the state of Kansas to provide the funds for each such
loan. Each such loan shall bear interest at a rate equal to the net
earnings rate for the pooled money investment portfolio at the time of
the making of such loan. Such loan shall not be deemed to be an
indebtedness or debt of the state of Kansas within the meaning of
section 6 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of Kansas. Upon
certification to the pooled money investment board by the director of
the Kansas water office of the amount of each loan authorized pursuant
to this subsection, the pooled money investment board shall transfer
each such amount certified by the director of the Kansas water office
from the state bank account or accounts to the water marketing fund of
the Kansas water office. The principal and interest of each loan
authorized pursuant to this subsection shall be repaid in payments
payable at least annually for a period of not more than five years.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of
accounts and reports shall transfer an amount or amounts specified by
the director of the Kansas water office prior to April 1, 2026, from the
water marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) to the state general fund, in
accordance with the provisions of the state water plan storage act,
K.S.A. 82a-1301 et seq., and amendments thereto, and rules and
regulations adopted thereunder, for the purposes of making repayments
to the state general fund for moneys advanced for annual capital cost
payments for water supply storage space in reservoirs.
(i) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the Kansas
water office from moneys appropriated from the state general fund or
any special revenue fund or funds for the above agency for fiscal year
2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures shall be made by the
Kansas water office from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 to provide for the Kansas
water office to lead database coordination of water quality and quantity
data for all state water agencies and cooperating federal agencies to
facilitate policy-making and such other matters relating thereto.
(j) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office shall certify to the director of accounts and reports
the amount of moneys expended by the Kansas department of
agriculture from the state general fund that is attributable to the
administration of the state water plan storage act, K.S.A. 82a-1301 et
seq., and amendments thereto, or the water assurance program act,
K.S.A. 82a-1330 et seq., and amendments thereto: Provided, That upon
receipt of such certification, or as soon thereafter as moneys are
available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount
certified from the water marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) of the
Kansas water office to the state general fund: Provided further, That the
director of the Kansas water office shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of the budget and the director of legislative
research.
(k) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office shall certify the amount of moneys in the
Republican river water conservation projects – Colorado moneys fund

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 234
and shall transmit such certification, along with the amount to be
transferred, to the director of accounts and reports. Upon receipt of
such certification, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount specified by
the director of the Kansas water office from the Republican river water
conservation projects – Colorado moneys fund to the south fork
Republican river water conservation projects fund: Provided, That the
director of the Kansas water office shall transmit a copy of such
certification to the director of the budget and to the director of
legislative research.
(l) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the director of the
Kansas water office, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer moneys from the water marketing fund (709-00-2255-2100) of
the Kansas water office to the state conservation storage water supply
fund (709-00-2502-2600) of the Kansas water office: Provided, That
the director of the Kansas water office shall certify each such transfer
of moneys to the director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research.
(m) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $7,000,000 from the
water supply storage debt payment for Milford and Perry reservoirs
account (039-00-1000-0610) of the state general fund of the state
treasurer to the state water plan fund.
Sec. 140.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT OF
WILDLIFE AND PARKS
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the amounts appropriated
and reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025, by section 140(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state economic development initiatives fund in the
reimbursement for annual licenses issued to national guard members
account (710-00-1900-1930), the sum of $67,649 is hereby lapsed.
(b) On the effective date of this act, of the amounts appropriated
and reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025, by section 140(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state economic development initiatives fund in the
reimbursement for annual park permits issued to national guard
members account (710-00-1900-1940), the sum of $35,802 is hereby
lapsed.
(c) On the effective date of this act, of the amounts appropriated
and reappropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025, by section 140(b) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state economic development initiatives fund in the
reimbursement for annual licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans
account (710-00-1900-1950), the sum of $94,497 is hereby lapsed.
(d) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 140(c)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the boating fee
fund (710-00-2245-2813) of the Kansas department of wildlife and
parks is hereby increased from $1,164,788 to $1,491,763.
(e) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 140(c)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the department
access roads fund (710-00-2178-2761) of the Kansas department of
wildlife and parks is hereby increased from $2,084,033 to $2,466,529.
(f) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 178(f)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the parks fee fund
(710-00-2122-2066) of the Kansas department of wildlife and parks is

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 235
hereby increased from $1,260,000 to $1,448,037.
(g) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 178(h)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the wildlife fee
fund (710-00-2300-3262) of the Kansas department of wildlife and
parks is hereby increased from $1,290,834 to $1,869,594.
(h) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 178(i)
of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the cabin revenue
fund (710-00-2668-2660) of the Kansas department of wildlife and
parks is hereby increased from $700,046 to $1,937,500.
Sec. 141.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT OF
WILDLIFE AND PARKS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state water
plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Water quality..............................................................................$224,457
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
economic development initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:
Operating expenditures (710-00-1900-1910)..........................$1,900,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Provided, however, That
expenditures from this account for official hospitality shall not exceed
$2,500: Provided further, That, in addition to the other purposes for
which expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
operating expenditures account for fiscal year 2026, expenditures shall
be made by the above agency from the operating expenditures account
for fiscal year 2026 to include a provision on the calendar year 2026
applications for hunting licenses, fishing licenses and annual park
permits for the applicant to make a voluntary contribution of $2 or
more to support the annual licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans,
annual licenses issued to Kansas national guard members and annual
park permits issued to Kansas national guard members: And provided
further, That all moneys received as voluntary contributions to support
the annual licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans, annual licenses
issued to Kansas national guard members and annual park permits
issued to Kansas national guard members shall be deposited in the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and
amendments thereto, to the credit of the free licenses and permits fund.
State parks operating
expenditures (710-00-1900-1920)...........................................$2,200,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the state parks operating
expenditures account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Reimbursement for annual licenses issued to
national guard members (710-00-1900-1930).............................$36,342
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the reimbursement for
annual licenses issued to national guard members account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That all moneys in the reimbursement for annual
licenses issued to national guard members account shall be expended to
pay the wildlife fee fund for the cost of fees for annual hunting and
annual fishing licenses issued for the calendar year 2026 to Kansas
army or air national guard members, which licenses are hereby
authorized to be issued without charge to such members in accordance
with policies and procedures prescribed by the secretary of wildlife and
parks therefor and subject to the limitation of the moneys appropriated

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 236
and available in the reimbursement for annual licenses issued to
national guard members account to pay the wildlife fee fund for such
licenses.
Reimbursement for annual park permits issued to national
guard members (710-00-1900-1940)...........................................$17,922
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the reimbursement for
annual park permits issued to national guard members account in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: Provided further, That all moneys in the reimbursement for
annual park permits issued to national guard members account shall be
expended to pay the parks fee fund for the cost of fees for annual park
vehicle permits issued for the calendar year 2026 to Kansas army or air
national guard members, which annual park vehicle permits are hereby
authorized to be issued without charge to such members in accordance
with policies and procedures prescribed by the secretary of wildlife and
parks therefor and subject to the limitation of the moneys appropriated
and available in the reimbursement for annual park permits issued to
national guard members account to pay the parks fee fund for such
permits: Provided further, That not more than one annual park vehicle
permit per family shall be eligible to be paid from this account.
Reimbursement for annual licenses issued to Kansas
disabled veterans (710-00-1900-1950)........................................$69,736
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the reimbursement for
annual licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans account in excess of
$100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Provided further, That all moneys in the reimbursement for annual
licenses issued to Kansas disabled veterans account shall be expended
to pay the wildlife fee fund for the cost of fees for annual hunting and
annual fishing licenses issued for the calendar year 2026 to Kansas
disabled veterans, which licenses are hereby authorized to be issued
without charge to such veterans in accordance with policies and
procedures prescribed by the secretary of wildlife and parks therefor
and subject to the limitation of the moneys appropriated and available
in the reimbursement for annual licenses issued to Kansas disabled
veterans account to pay the wildlife fee fund for such licenses:
Provided, however, That to qualify for such license without charge, the
resident disabled veteran shall have been separated from the armed
services under honorable conditions, have a disability certified by the
Kansas office of veterans services as being service connected and such
service-connected disability is equal to or greater than 30%: And
provided further, That no other hunting or fishing licenses or permits
shall be eligible to be paid from this account.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Prairie spirit rails-to-trails
fee fund (710-00-2025-2030)......................................................No limit
State agricultural
production fund (710-00-2050-5100)..........................................No limit
Nonfederal grants fund (710-00-2063-2090)..............................No limit
Wildlife and parks
nonrestricted fund (710-00-2065-2120)......................................No limit
Development and
promotions fund (710-00-2097-2010).........................................No limit
Wildlife conservation
fund (710-00-2100-2020)............................................................No limit
Parks fee fund (710-00-2122-2053)......................................$12,673,223

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 237
Provided, That additional expenditures may be made from the parks fee
fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of compensating federal aid
program expenditures, if necessary, in order to comply with
requirements established by the United States fish and wildlife service
for the utilization of federal aid funds: Provided further, That all such
expenditures shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed
upon the parks fee fund for fiscal year 2026: And provided further, That
the secretary of wildlife and parks shall report all such expenditures to
the governor and the legislature as appropriate.
Parks restitution fund (710-00-2156-2100).................................No limit
Fish and wildlife
restitution fund (710-00-2166-2750)...........................................No limit
Department access
roads fund (710-00-2178-2761)..............................................$2,501,078
Boating fee fund (710-00-2245-2813)....................................$1,578,866
Provided, That additional expenditures may be made from the boating
fee fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of compensating federal
aid program expenditures, if necessary, in order to comply with
requirements established by the United States fish and wildlife service
for the utilization of federal aid funds: Provided further, That all such
expenditures shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed
upon the boating fee fund for fiscal year 2026: And provided further,
That the secretary of wildlife and parks shall report all such
expenditures to the governor and the legislature as appropriate.
Wildlife fee fund (710-00-2300-2890)..................................$36,484,671
Provided, That additional expenditures may be made from the wildlife
fee fund for fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of compensating federal
aid program expenditures, if necessary, in order to comply with
requirements established by the United States fish and wildlife service
for the utilization of federal aid funds: Provided further, That all such
expenditures shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation imposed
upon the wildlife fee fund for fiscal year 2026: And provided further,
That the secretary of wildlife and parks shall report all such
expenditures to the governor and the legislature as appropriate: And
provided further, That expenditures from the wildlife fee fund for
official hospitality shall not exceed $4,000.
Publication and other
sales fund (710-00-2399-2399)...................................................No limit
Provided, That, in addition to other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the
publication and other sales fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may
be made from such fund for the purpose of compensating federal aid
program expenditures, if necessary, in order to comply with the
requirements established by the United States fish and wildlife service
for utilization of federal aid funds: Provided further, That all such
expenditures shall be in addition to any expenditures made from the
publication and other sales fund for fiscal year 2026: And provided
further, That the secretary of wildlife and parks shall report all such
expenditures to the governor and legislature as appropriate.
Free licenses and
permits fund (710-00-2493-2493)...............................................No limit
Nongame wildlife
improvement fund (710-00-2593-3300)......................................No limit
Feed the hungry fund (710-00-2642-2640).................................No limit
Cabin revenue fund (710-00-2668-2660)....................................No limit
Federally licensed wildlife
areas fund (710-00-2670-3400)...................................................No limit
Disaster grants – public
assistance fund (710-00-3005-3005)...........................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 238
Wetlands reserve
program fund (710-00-3007-3060)..............................................No limit
Adaptive science fund (710-00-3015-3050)................................No limit
Soil/water
conservation fund (710-00-3083-3083).......................................No limit
Energy efficiency/conservation block
grant fund (710-00-3157-3157)...................................................No limit
Navigation projects fund (710-00-3191-3191)............................No limit
Recreation resource
management fund (710-00-3197-3197).......................................No limit
Cooperative endangered species
conservation fund (710-00-3198-3198).......................................No limit
Landowner incentive
program fund (710-00-3200-3210)..............................................No limit
State wildlife grants fund (710-00-3204-3204)...........................No limit
Endangered species –
recovery fund (710-00-3209-3209).............................................No limit
Bulletproof vest
partnership fund (710-00-3216-3216).........................................No limit
Enforce underage drinking
law fund (710-00-3219-3219).....................................................No limit
Recreational trails
program fund (710-00-3238-3238)..............................................No limit
Boating safety financial
assistance fund (710-00-3251-3250)...........................................No limit
Highway planning/
construction fund (710-00-3333-3333).......................................No limit
Plant and animal disease and pest
control fund (710-00-3360-3361)................................................No limit
Americorps – ARRA fund (710-00-3404-3405)..........................No limit
Wildlife restoration fund (710-00-3418-3418)............................No limit
Cooperative forestry
assistance fund (710-00-3426-3426)...........................................No limit
North America wetland
conservation fund (710-00-3453-3453).......................................No limit
Wildlife services fund (710-00-3485-3485)................................No limit
Sport fish restoration fund (710-00-3490-3490).........................No limit
Fish/wildlife management
assistance fund (710-00-3495-3495)...........................................No limit
Migratory bird monitoring (710-00-3504-3504).........................No limit
Fish/wildlife core act fund (710-00-3513-3513).........................No limit
Voluntary public access (710-00-3557-3557)..............................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (710-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $200,000
shall be made by the above agency from such fund during fiscal year
2026 to provide support for a marina located on Cheney lake.
Outdoor recreation
acquisition, development and
planning fund (710-00-3794-3794).............................................No limit
Land and water conservation
fund – local (710-00-3794-3795)................................................No limit
Land and water conservation
fund – state (710-00-3794-3920).................................................No limit
White-nose syndrome
response (710-00-3904-3904)......................................................No limit
Watershed protection/flood
prevention fund (710-00-3906-3906)..........................................No limit
Enhanced hunter education

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 239
program (710-00-3929-3929)......................................................No limit
Central aircraft fund (710-00-6145-6100)...................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made by the above agency from
the central aircraft fund for aircraft operating expenditures, for aircraft
maintenance and repair, to provide aircraft services to other state
agencies and for the purchase of state aircraft insurance: Provided
further, That the secretary of wildlife and parks is hereby authorized to
fix, charge and collect fees for the provision of aircraft services to other
state agencies: And provided further, That such fees shall be fixed to
recover all or part of the operating expenditures incurred in providing
such services: And provided further, That all fees received for such
services shall be credited to the central aircraft fund.
Department of wildlife
and parks private gifts and
donations fund (710-00-7335-7000)............................................No limit
Employee maintenance deduction
clearing fund (710-00-9120-9100)..............................................No limit
Suspense fund (710-00-9159-9000)............................................No limit
Great plains LCC.........................................................................No limit
USDA grant manual update.........................................................No limit
Economic adjustment assistance fund (710-00-3415).................No limit
Law enforcement agency support fund (710-00-3625)...............No limit
FHT RAISE grant federal fund (710-00-3902)...........................No limit
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the above
agency from moneys appropriated from any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, from which expenditures may be made for
salaries and wages, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made
by the above agency from such moneys appropriated from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, from which expenditures
may be made for salaries and wages, for progression within the existing
pay structure for natural resource officers of the Kansas department of
wildlife and parks: Provided, however, That, notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-2935, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, the secretary of wildlife and parks shall not require such officer
to transfer into the unclassified service in order to progress within the
existing pay structure pursuant to this subsection.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 32-9,100, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, in addition to
the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the Kansas
department of wildlife and parks from moneys appropriated from the
wildlife fee fund (710-00-2300-2880) of the Kansas department of
wildlife and parks for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, by this or
any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures may be made by the above agency from such
moneys during fiscal year 2026 to issue senior lifetime hunting and
fishing licenses to Kansas resident disabled veterans who are 65 years
of age or older: Provided, That such licenses are hereby authorized to
be issued without charge to such veterans in accordance with policies
and procedures prescribed by the secretary of wildlife and parks:
Provided further, That, to qualify for such license without charge, the
resident disabled veteran shall have been separated from the armed
services under honorable conditions and have a disability certified by
the Kansas office of veterans services as being service-related and such
service-connected disability is equal to or greater than 30%.
(f) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $200,000 from the
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief – federal fund (252-00-3756)

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 240
of the governor's department to the American rescue plan state relief
fund (710-00-3756-3536) of the Kansas department of wildlife and
parks.
(g) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
wildlife and parks, with approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from
the state water plan fund for the Kansas department of wildlife and
parks to any item of appropriation for fiscal year 2026 from the state
water plan fund for the Kansas water office, Kansas department of
agriculture, university of Kansas or the department of health and
environment – division of environment: Provided, That the secretary of
wildlife and parks shall certify each such transfer to the director of
accounts and reports and upon receipt of such certification, the director
of accounts and reports shall transfer such certified amount to the
certified item of appropriation: Provided further, That when the
secretary of wildlife and parks provides certification to the director of
accounts and reports under this section, the secretary shall transmit a
copy of each such certification to the director of legislative research,
the chairperson of the house of representatives agriculture and natural
resources budget committee and the appropriate chairperson of the
subcommittee on natural resources of the senate committee on ways
and means.
Sec. 142.
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
(a) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 142(c)
(1) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the buildings
– rehabilitation and repair account (276-00-4100-8005) of the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of transportation
is hereby increased from $5,200,000 to $6,177,163.
(b) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 142(c)
(1) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the buildings
– reroofing account (276-00-4100-8010) of the state highway fund
(276-00-4100-4100) of the department of transportation is hereby
increased from $659,080 to $1,437,138.
(c) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation
established for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by section 142(c)
(1) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas on the buildings
– other construction renovation and repair account (276-00-4100-8070)
of the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation is hereby increased from $6,688,936 to $33,521,896.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the state highway fund (276-00-
4100-4100) for fiscal year 2025, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or
accounts of the state highway fund for fiscal year 2025 for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Buildings – purchase land (276-00-4100-8065)..........................$67,927
(e) On the effective date of this act, or soon thereafter as moneys
are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$300,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) to the
driver's education scholarship grant fund (276-00-2851-2851) of the
department of transportation.
Sec. 143.
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 241
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Rail service
improvement fund (276-00-2008-2100)......................................No limit
Rail service improvement fund -
state funds (276-00-2008-2110)...................................................No limit
Seat belt safety fund (276-00-2216-2216)...................................No limit
Conversion of materials and
equipment fund (276-00-2256-2256)..........................................No limit
Interagency motor vehicle fuel
sales fund (276-00-2298-2400)...................................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures may be made from the interagency motor
vehicle fuel sales fund to provide and sell motor vehicle fuel to other
state agencies: Provided further, That the secretary of transportation is
hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect fees for motor vehicle fuel
sold to other state agencies: And provided further, That such fees shall
be fixed in order to recover all or part of the expenses incurred in
providing motor vehicle fuel to other state agencies: And provided
further, That all fees received for such sales of motor vehicle fuel shall
be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be credited to the
interagency motor vehicle fuel sales fund.
Traffic records
enhancement fund (276-00-2356-2000)......................................No limit
Coordinated public transportation
assistance fund (276-00-2572-0300)...........................................No limit
Highway special
permits fund (276-00-2576-2576).........................................................$0
Transportation technology
development fund (276-00-2835-2835).......................................No limit
Broadband infrastructure construction
grant fund (276-00-2836-2836)...................................................No limit
Short line rail improvement fund (276-00-2837-2837)...............No limit
Driver's education scholarship
grant fund (276-00-2851-2851)...................................................No limit
Kansas air service development incentive
program fund (276-00-2894-2894)..............................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from the Kansas air service
development incentive program fund shall be to support commercial
service airports in Kansas: Provided further, That the Kansas
department of transportation shall establish requirements for the
program, taking into consideration: (1) Recent or imminent regional
economic development opportunities, including, but not limited to, new
business entering the market area or business growth in the market
area; (2) viable air service opportunities, including, but not limited to,
airline support service or market data support service; (3) air service
routes serving a market area that meets the needs of such economic
development opportunities, including, but not limited to, routes
establishing a pipeline to areas with workforce talent or serving a
customer base or main business function; and (4) local match
requirements, including, but not limited to, opportunities to use state or
local moneys to leverage federal air service development grant funds:
And provided further, That local entities representing commercial
service airports may apply for grants from such fund: And provided
further, That the Kansas department of transportation shall form a
selection committee to evaluate such applications: And provided
further, That not more than $1,000,000 shall be awarded for a single
commercial service airport: And provided further, That all grant moneys
awarded to a local entity shall be deposited in an interest-bearing

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 242
escrow account: And provided further, That, when awarded a grant,
such local entity shall execute a minimum revenue guarantee (MRG)
agreement with an airline: And provided further, That such MRG
agreement shall describe the thresholds that trigger drawdowns of grant
moneys: And provided further, That the Kansas department of
transportation shall verify all expenses before authorizing any
drawdown of grant moneys from such escrow account.
Other federal grants fund (276-00-3122-3100)...........................No limit
American rescue plan state
relief fund (276-00-3756-3536)...................................................No limit
State highway fund (276-00-4100-4100)....................................No limit
Provided, That no expenditures may be made from the state highway
fund other than for the purposes specifically authorized by this or other
appropriation act.
Highway bond
proceeds fund (276-00-4109-4110).............................................No limit
Public use general aviation airport
development fund (276-00-4140-4140).......................................No limit
County equalization and
adjustment fund (276-00-4210-4210).....................................$2,500,000
Special city and county
highway fund (276-00-4220-4220).............................................No limit
Highway bond debt
service fund (276-00-4707-9000)................................................No limit
Rail service assistance program loan
guarantee fund (276-00-7502-7200)............................................No limit
Railroad rehabilitation loan
guarantee fund (276-00-7503-7500)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures from the railroad rehabilitation loan
guarantee fund shall not exceed the amount that the secretary of
transportation is obligated to pay during the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, in satisfaction of liabilities arising from the unconditional
guarantee of payment that was entered into by the secretary of
transportation in connection with the mid-states port authority federally
taxable revenue refunding bonds, series 1994, dated May 1, 1994,
authorized by K.S.A. 12-3420, and amendments thereto, and
guaranteed pursuant to K.S.A. 75-5031, and amendments thereto.
Transportation
revolving fund (276-00-7511-1000)............................................No limit
Communication system
revolving fund (276-00-7524-7700)............................................No limit
Kansas intermodal transportation
revolving fund (276-00-7552-7551)............................................No limit
Passenger rail service revolving fund..........................................No limit
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-5089, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from the passenger rail service revolving fund during
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to make loans or grants for the
costs of qualifying projects and operating support for Amtrak or any
common rail carrier approved by the federal railroad administration for
operation of an intercity passenger rail service program to connect
Kansas by rail to other member states of the midwest interstate
passenger rail commission, the midwest regional rail system, the
national passenger rail network and any other passenger rail service
operations serving Kansas: Provided, however, That no expenditures
shall be made from this fund for loans or grants until such loans or
grants have been approved by the state finance council acting on this
matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative
delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 243
3711c(c), and amendments thereto, except that such approval also may
be given while the legislature is in session.
(b) Expenditures may be made by the above agency for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100) for the following specified purposes: Provided, That
expenditures from the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026, other
than refunds authorized by law for the following specified purposes,
shall not exceed the limitations prescribed therefor as follows:
Agency operations (276-00-4100-
0403)..................................................................... $348,012,564
Provided, That expenditures from the agency operations account of the
state highway fund for official hospitality by the secretary of
transportation shall not exceed $5,000: Provided further, That
expenditures may be made from this account for engineering services
furnished to counties for road and bridge projects under K.S.A. 68-
402e, and amendments thereto.
Bond services fees (276-00-4100-0580)......................................No limit
Substantial maintenance (276-00-4100-0700).............................No limit
Claims (276-00-4100-1150)........................................................No limit
Conference fees (276-00-4100-2200)..........................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of transportation is hereby authorized to
fix, charge and collect conference, training and workshop attendance
and registration fees for conferences, training seminars and workshops
sponsored or cosponsored by the department: Provided further, That
such fees shall be deposited in the state treasury in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, and shall be
credited to the conference fees account of the state highway fund: And
provided further, That expenditures may be made from this account to
defray all or part of the costs of the conferences, training seminars and
workshops.
Federal local aid programs (276-00-4100-3000).........................No limit
Categorical aid NHTSA national priority (276-00-4100-3035)..No limit
Payments for city
connecting links (276-00-4100-6200).....................................$5,360,000
Unmanned aerial systems –
UAS aviation only (276-00-4100-6400)......................................No limit
Other capital improvements (276-00-4100-8075).......................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of transportation is authorized to make
expenditures from the other capital improvements account to undertake
a program to assist cities and counties with railroad crossings of roads
not on the state highway system.
(c) (1) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by the above agency from the state highway fund (276-
00-4100-4100) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or
accounts of the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Buildings – rehabilitation
and repair (276-00-4100-8005)...............................................$5,400,000
Buildings – reroofing (276-00-4100-8010)................................$446,758
Buildings – other construction, renovation
and repair (276-00-4100-8070).............................................$11,671,107
(2) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the state highway fund (276-00-
4100-4100) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026 from the
unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in each capital
improvement project account for a building or buildings in the state

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 244
highway fund for one or more projects approved for prior fiscal years:
Provided, That all expenditures from the unencumbered balance in any
such project account of the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026
shall not exceed the amount of the unencumbered balance in such
project account on June 30, 2026, subject to the provisions of
subsection (d): Provided further, That all expenditures from any such
project account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation
imposed on the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the secretary of
transportation, with the approval of the director of the budget, may
transfer any part of any item of appropriation in a capital improvement
project account for a building or buildings for fiscal year 2026 from the
state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) for the department of
transportation to another item of appropriation in a capital improvement
project account for a building or buildings for fiscal year 2026 from the
state highway fund for the department of transportation: Provided, That
the secretary of transportation shall certify each such transfer to the
director of accounts and reports and shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research.
(e) On April 1, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer from the motor pool service fund (173-00-6109-4020) of the
department of administration to the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100) of the department of transportation an amount determined to be
equal to the sum of the annual vehicle registration fees for each vehicle
owned or leased by the state or any state agencies in accordance with
K.S.A. 75-4611, and amendments thereto.
(f) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, upon notification
from the secretary of transportation that an amount is due and payable
from the railroad rehabilitation loan guarantee fund (276-00-7503-
7500), the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state
highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) to the railroad rehabilitation loan
guarantee fund the amount certified by the secretary as due and
payable.
(g) Any payment for services during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) to other
state agencies shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation
imposed on the state highway fund for fiscal year 2026.
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the secretary of transportation shall apportion and
distribute quarterly, on the first day of January, April, July and October,
to cities on the state highway system from the state highway fund
moneys at the rate of $5,000 per year per lane per mile for the
maintenance of streets and highways in cities designated by the
secretary as city connecting links: Provided, That all moneys so
distributed shall be used solely for the maintenance of city connecting
links: Provided further, That such apportionment shall apply only to
those city connecting link lanes maintained by the city, and shall not
apply to city connecting link lanes maintained by the secretary pursuant
to agreement with the city: And provided further, That, as used in this
subsection, "lane" means the portion of the roadway for use of moving
traffic of a standard width prescribed by the secretary.
(i) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $5,000,000 from the
state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) to the passenger rail service
revolving fund of the department of transportation.
(j) In addition to other purposes for which expenditures may be
made by the department of transportation from the economic
development account (276-00-4100-0860) of the state highway fund

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 245
(276-00-4100-4100) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures shall be made
by the above agency from the economic development account of the
state highway fund for fiscal year 2026 for the department of
transportation's economic development grant program to assist local
governments in upgrading county roads impacted by dairy industry
expansion in southwest Kansas: Provided, That expenditures for such
purpose from the economic development account of the state highway
fund for fiscal year 2026 shall not exceed $6,000,000: Provided further,
That all such expenditures for such purpose shall be in addition to any
expenditure limitation imposed on the state highway fund for fiscal
year 2026.
(k) On the effective date of this act, or soon thereafter as moneys
are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$5,000,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) to the
Kansas air service development incentive program fund (276-00-2894-
2894).
Sec. 144. (a) On June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of
K.S.A. 74-8768, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount of any
unencumbered balance in the expanded lottery act revenues fund to the
state general fund: Provided, That the transfer of such amount shall be
in addition to any other transfer from the expanded lottery act revenues
fund to the state general fund as prescribed by law.
(b) On June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall
determine and notify the director of the budget if the amount of revenue
collected in the expanded lottery act revenues fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, is insufficient to fund the appropriations and
transfers that are authorized from the expanded lottery act revenues
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in accordance with the
provisions of appropriation acts. The director of the budget shall certify
to the director of accounts and reports the amount necessary to be
transferred from the state general fund to the expanded lottery act
revenues fund in order to fund all such appropriations and transfers that
are authorized from the expanded lottery act revenues fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. Upon receipt of such certification, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer the amount of moneys
from the state general fund to the expanded lottery act revenues fund
that is required in accordance with the certification by the director of
the budget under this section. At the same time as the director of the
budget transmits this certification to the director of accounts and
reports, the director of the budget shall transmit a copy of such
certification to the director of legislative research.
Sec. 145. During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition
to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made by the
department of administration from moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for the department of
administration for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or any other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures shall be made by the department of administration from
the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026, for and on behalf of the Kansas department for aging
and disability services, to convey, without consideration, all of the
rights, title and interest in approximately 15 acres of real estate
described in section 145(a) of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws of
Kansas, and any improvements thereon, to the Kansas office of
veterans services subject to the provisions, including all contingencies
and limitations, of section 145 of chapter 82 of the 2023 Session Laws
of Kansas: Provided, however, That conveyance of the real property
authorized by this section shall not occur in the event the United States

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 246
department of veterans affairs does not provide funding through its
construction grant program for fiscal year 2025 or 2026.
Sec. 146. (a) During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and
June 30, 2027, in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures
may be made by any state agency named in this act from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue
fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027 as authorized by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026 regular session of
the legislature, expenditures shall be made by each state agency from
such moneys for fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 to prepare a
report concerning the total number of employees of such agency that
are working remotely from home or at another location that is not such
employee's assigned state office, state facility or field location of such
employee: Provided, That such reports shall be submitted to the house
of representatives committee on appropriations and senate committee
on ways and means on January 12, 2026, and January 11, 2027.
Sec. 147. Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-37,105,
and amendments thereto, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
in addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may be made
by any state agency named in this act from moneys appropriated from
the state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2026 as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by
any state agency from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to provide
monetary awards to state employees for the purposes of awarding a
hiring, recruitment or retention bonus as part of an established
employee award and recognition program: Provided, That the total
gross value of awards to any employee of the state through an
employee award and recognition program during fiscal year 2026 shall
not exceed $10,000: Provided further, That any monetary award or
series of such awards in excess of $3,500 that is proposed for an
employee in the classified service or an employee in the unclassified
service whose salary is subject to approval in accordance with K.S.A.
75-2935b, and amendments thereto, shall be subject to approval by the
governor and shall not be paid until approved by the governor: And
provided further, That a person who is appointed to a state agency
position may be a recipient of such awards: And provided further, That
the department of administration shall provide oversight and
administrative review of award and recognition programs for executive
branch agencies and appointed state councils and commissions: And
provided further, That such oversight shall provide for consistency of
such programs among such executive branch agencies, councils and
commissions: And provided further, That each state agency that has
awarded an employee with a monetary award pursuant to this section
shall submit a report on the number of monetary awards paid in each
category of awards or bonuses and the total dollar amount of each such
award or bonus provided during fiscal year 2026 to the secretary of the
department of administration who shall compile and submit a report on
such award or bonus on or before January 12, 2026, to the house of
representatives committee on appropriations and the senate committee
on ways and means: And provided further, That as used in this proviso,
"award" and "monetary award" includes a bonus given to an employee
pursuant to this proviso.
Sec. 148. During the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, and June
30, 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, no
state agency named in chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas,
this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature shall expend or transfer any moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 247
years 2025 and 2026 as authorized by chapters 88, 110 and 111 of the
2024 Session Laws of Kansas, this or any other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, that are identified as interest
earned on any moneys to the state for aid for coronavirus relief,
specifically including interest earnings in any such state agency
American rescue plan state relief fund, American rescue plan state
relief federal fund or American rescue plan state fiscal relief federal
fund except for expenditures or transfers specifically authorized by
appropriation acts of the legislature: Provided, That the state treasurer
shall identify and certify, in consultation with the director of legislative
research, the amount of such interest earnings: Provided further, That,
on and after May 1, 2025, as such identified interest earnings are
interest earnings on state moneys as provided for in K.S.A. 75-4210a,
and amendments thereto, such identified interest earnings shall be
credited to the state general fund as provided in K.S.A. 75-4210a, and
amendments thereto: And provided further, That such interest earnings
shall be expended or transferred from the state general fund as specified
by appropriation acts of the legislature.
Sec. 149. Except as provided further, for fiscal year 2026, on June
1, 2026, the director of personnel services of the department of
administration, in consultation with the director of the budget and the
director of legislative research, shall identify positions and the funding
associated with such positions in each state agency that have been
vacant for a part of or the entire fiscal year 2026 and that are paid from
appropriations from the state general fund: Provided, That the director
of the budget shall certify such amount in each state general fund
account that was not expended for positions during fiscal year 2026 for
the purposes of this section to the director of accounts and reports:
Provided further, That on June 30, 2026, the amount of funding
associated with such vacant positions in each state agency that are paid
from appropriations from the state general fund is hereby lapsed: And
provided further, That at the same time that such certification is made,
the director of the budget shall deliver a copy of such certification to
the director of legislative research: Provided, however, That the
provisions of this section shall not apply to vacant positions at the
university of Kansas funded from the geological survey account (682-
00-1000-0170) of the state general fund.
Sec. 150.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) On the effective date of this act, of the $61,000,000
appropriated for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2025, by section 145(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas from the state general fund in the state employee pay increase
account, the sum of $6,851,300 is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 151.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
State agency moving expenses...................................................$320,997
Provided, That expenditures may be made from such account during
fiscal year 2025 for moving expenses of a state agency upon the request
of such state agency and the review and approval of such request by the
state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto:
Provided further, That the state finance council is hereby authorized to
approve such expenditures: And provided further, That such
expenditures shall be approved by the governor and the majority of the
legislative members of the state finance council and that such approval

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 248
also may be given while the legislature is in session.
Sec. 152.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Summer ebt program...............................................................$1,825,000
Provided, That all moneys in the summer ebt program account shall be
used for the purpose of providing the Kansas department for children
and families funding for fiscal year 2025 for the summer ebt program:
Provided, however, That the secretary for children and families shall
certify to the members of the state finance council that the secretary has
requested a waiver from the United States department of agriculture to
exclude candy and soft drinks from the definition of eligible foods
under 7 C.F.R. § 271.2: And provided further, That, as used in this
proviso: (1) "Candy" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 79-3602,
and amendments thereto; and (2) "soft drinks" means the same as
defined in K.S.A. 79-3602, and amendments thereto: And provided
further, That upon receipt of such certification from the secretary, the
state finance council, acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
is hereby authorized to approve the expenditure of moneys from the
summer ebt program account to the Kansas department for children and
families for the summer ebt program as administered by such
department: Provided, however, That except that such expenditure shall
be approved by the governor and the majority of the legislative
members of the state finance council and that such approval may also
be given while the legislature is in session.
Sec. 153.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
State finance council ARPA grant fund.......................................No limit
Provided, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025,
notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the director
of the budget, in consultation with the director of legislative research,
shall continuously monitor the state general fund and all special
revenue funds to identify moneys in any state general fund account or
special revenue fund that are moneys to the state for aid for coronavirus
relief that are unexpended or have been returned to the state treasury as
unspent funds: Provided further, That the director of the budget shall
identify and certify, in consultation with the director of legislative
research, the amount of such unexpended or returned moneys to the
director of accounts and reports, who shall transfer such certified
amount from the state general fund account or special revenue fund to
the state finance council ARPA grant fund: And provided further, That
the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
is hereby authorized to approve the expenditure of moneys from the
state finance council ARPA grant fund: And provided further, That such
expenditure shall be approved by the governor and the majority of the
legislative members of the state finance council and that such approval
also may be given while the legislature is in session: And provided
further, That on or before the 10th day of each month during fiscal year
2025, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 249
general fund to the state finance council ARPA grant fund interest
earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance in the state finance
council ARPA grant fund for the preceding month; and (2) the net
earnings rate for the pooled money investment portfolio for the
preceding month.
Sec. 154.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:
Human services consensus caseload estimates.....................$10,000,000
Provided, That expenditures may be made from such account during
fiscal year 2025 for adjustments that are the result of the spring 2025
human services caseload estimates: Provided further, That the director
of the budget in consultation with the director of legislative research
shall certify the aggregate amount necessary to fund the spring 2025
human services consensus caseload estimates for the remainder of
fiscal year 2025: And provided further, That upon receipt and review of
such certification, the state finance council acting on this matter, which
is hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject
to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments
thereto, is hereby authorized to approve such expenditures: And
provided further, That such expenditures shall be approved by the
governor and the majority of the legislative members of the state
finance council and that such approval also may be given while the
legislature is in session.
Sec. 155.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
State employee pay increase.................................................$40,000,000
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account
shall be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the
cost to the state general fund of the salary increase, including
associated employer contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
water plan fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
State employee pay increase........................................................$65,197
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account
shall be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the
cost to the state water plan fund of the salary increase, including
associated employer contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the children's
initiatives fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
State employee pay increase..........................................................$6,848
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account
shall be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the
cost to the children's initiatives fund of the salary increase, including
associated employer contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(d) There is appropriated for the above agency from the Kansas
endowment for youth fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
State employee pay increase..........................................................$4,648
Provided, That all moneys in the state employee pay increase account
shall be used for the purpose of paying the proportionate share of the
cost to the Kansas endowment for youth fund of the salary increase,
including associated employer contributions, during fiscal year 2026.
(e) Upon recommendation of the director of the budget, the state
finance council, acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as
a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 250
prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, is hereby
authorized to approve: (1) Increases in expenditure limitations on
special revenue funds and accounts and increase the transfers between
special revenue funds as necessary to pay the salary increases under
this section for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026; and (2) the
expenditure of any remaining moneys in any account appropriated in
subsections (a) through (d) to address salary inequities in any state
agency as identified by the director of the budget in consultation with
the director of personnel services. The director of accounts and reports
is hereby authorized and directed to increase expenditure limitations on
such special revenue funds and accounts and increase the transfers
between special revenue funds in accordance with such approval for the
purpose of paying from such funds or accounts the proportionate share
of the cost to such funds or accounts, including associated employer
contributions, of the salary increases and other amounts specified for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
(f) (1) Except as provided in subsection (f)(3), effective with the
first payroll period chargeable to the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all executive branch state agencies shall receive a sum equivalent to the
total of 2.5%, rounded to the nearest penny, of the salaries and fringe
benefit costs excluding health insurance of all benefits eligible
unclassified employees in such agency, to be distributed as a merit
pool.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (f)(3), effective with the first
payroll period chargeable to the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, an
executive branch benefits-eligible employee shall be eligible for a
salary increase of one step for employees in the classified service,
including associated employer contributions, and each pay grade of the
classified pay matrix shall be extended upward by one step.
(3) Based on the department of administration's 2024 market
survey summary, effective with the first payroll period chargeable to
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if an executive branch benefits-
eligible employee's class/job title is:
(A) Under market pay by 10% or greater, such employee's salary
shall be increased by the percentage that equals the difference between
such under market pay percentage and 10% under market or by 2.5%,
whichever is greater;
(B) if an employee's class/job title is under market pay by less
than 10% and not greater than 10% over market pay, such employee's
salary shall be increased by 2.5%; and
(C) over market pay by greater than 10%, such employee's salary
shall be increased by 1%.
(4) Effective with the first payroll period chargeable to the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, all legislative branch state agencies shall
receive a sum equivalent to the total of 2.5%, rounded to the nearest
penny, of the salaries and fringe benefit costs excluding health
insurance of all benefits-eligible unclassified employees in such
agency, to be distributed as a merit pool.
(5) Effective with the first payroll period chargeable to the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the judicial branch shall receive a sum
equivalent to the total of 2.5%, rounded to the nearest penny, of the
salaries and fringe benefit costs excluding health insurance of all
benefits-eligible non-judge judicial branch employees in such agency,
to be distributed as a merit pool.
(6) Effective with the first payroll period chargeable to the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the state board of regents and the
universities shall receive a sum equivalent to the total of 2.5%, rounded
to the nearest penny, of the salaries and fringe benefit costs excluding
health insurance of all benefits-eligible employees in such agency, to be

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 251
distributed as a merit pool.
(g) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 46-137a and 46-
137b, and amendments thereto, or any other statute, the provisions of
subsection (f) shall not apply to the compensation or bi-weekly
allowance paid to each member of the legislature.
(2) The provisions of subsection (f) shall not apply to state officers
elected on a statewide basis.
(3) The provisions of subsection (f) shall not apply to justices of
the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, district court judges
and district magistrate judges.
(4) The provisions of subsection (f) shall not apply to:
(A) Teachers and licensed personnel at the Kansas state school for
the deaf or the Kansas state school for the blind.
(B) Any other employees on a formal, written career progression
plan implemented by executive directive.
(h) After implementation of subsections (f) and (g), the governor
is hereby authorized and directed to modify the pay plan for fiscal year
2026 in accordance with this section and to adopt such pay plan so
modified.
Sec. 156.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
State finance council ARPA grant fund.......................................No limit
Provided, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the director
of the budget, in consultation with the director of legislative research,
shall continuously monitor the state general fund and all special
revenue funds to identify moneys in any state general fund account or
special revenue fund that are moneys to the state for aid for coronavirus
relief that are unexpended or have been returned to the state treasury as
unspent funds: Provided further, That the director of the budget shall
identify and certify, in consultation with the director of legislative
research, the amount of such unexpended or returned moneys to the
director of accounts and reports, who shall transfer such certified
amount from the state general fund account or special revenue fund to
the state finance council ARPA grant fund: And provided further, That
the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
is hereby authorized to approve the expenditure of moneys from the
state finance council ARPA grant fund: And provided further, That such
expenditure shall be approved by the governor and the majority of the
legislative members of the state finance council and that such approval
also may be given while the legislature is in session: And provided
further, That on or before the 10th day of each month during fiscal year
2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state
general fund to the state finance council ARPA grant fund interest
earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance in the state finance
council ARPA grant fund for the preceding month; and (2) the net
earnings rate for the pooled money investment portfolio for the
preceding month.
Sec. 157.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 252
Lansing correctional facility pay differential..........................$4,143,829
Provided, That expenditures may be made from such account during
fiscal year 2026 for expenses related to funding a pay differential for
correctional officers at the Lansing correctional facility upon
certification by the department of corrections that the private prison in
Leavenworth County, Kansas, is operational as a detention center for
the United States immigration and customs enforcement and the
funding is necessary to provide such pay differential: Provided further,
That upon receipt and review of such certification, the state finance
council acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter
of legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in
K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, is hereby authorized to
approve such expenditures: And provided further, That such
expenditures shall be approved by the governor and the majority of the
legislative members of the state finance council and that such approval
also may be given while the legislature is in session.
Sec. 158.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
State finance council ARPA grant fund.......................................No limit
Provided, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, the director
of the budget, in consultation with the director of legislative research,
shall continuously monitor the state general fund and all special
revenue funds to identify moneys in any state general fund account or
special revenue fund that are moneys to the state for aid for coronavirus
relief that are unexpended or have been returned to the state treasury as
unspent funds: Provided further, That the director of the budget shall
identify and certify, in consultation with the director of legislative
research, the amount of such unexpended or returned moneys to the
director of accounts and reports, who shall transfer such certified
amount from the state general fund account or special revenue fund to
the state finance council ARPA grant fund: And provided further, That
the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto,
is hereby authorized to approve the expenditure of moneys from the
state finance council ARPA grant fund: And provided further, That such
expenditure shall be approved by the governor and the majority of the
legislative members of the state finance council and that such approval
also may be given while the legislature is in session: And provided
further, That on or before the 10th day of each month during fiscal year
2027, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state
general fund to the state finance council ARPA grant fund interest
earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance in the state finance
council ARPA grant fund for the preceding month; and (2) the net
earnings rate for the pooled money investment portfolio for the
preceding month.
Sec. 159. (a) (1) On July 1, 2025, of each amount appropriated or
reappropriated for a state agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, by chapter 88, 110 or 111 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas,
this act or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature from the state general fund, that is identified as operating
expenditures, including salaries and wages, contractual services,
commodities and capital outlay, the sum equal to 1.5% of the aggregate

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 253
amount of such operating expenditures is hereby lapsed.
(2) On July 1, 2026, of each amount appropriated or
reappropriated for a state agency for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, by this act or other appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026 regular
session of the legislature from the state general fund, that is identified
as operating expenditures, including salaries and wages, contractual
services, commodities and capital outlay, the sum equal to 1.5% of the
aggregate amount of such operating expenditures is hereby lapsed.
(b) (1) On July 1, 2025, of each amount appropriated or
reappropriated for the department of transportation for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, by chapter 88, 110 or 111 of the 2024 Session
Laws of Kansas, this act or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-
4100), that is identified as operating expenditures, including salaries
and wages, contractual services, commodities and capital outlay, the
sum equal to 1.5% of the aggregate amount of such operating
expenditures is hereby lapsed.
(2) On July 1, 2026, of each amount appropriated or
reappropriated for the department of transportation for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, by this act or other appropriation act of the 2025
or 2026 regular session of the legislature from the state highway fund
(276-00-4100-4100), that is identified as operating expenditures,
including salaries and wages, contractual services, commodities and
capital outlay, the sum equal to 1.5% of the aggregate amount of such
operating expenditures is hereby lapsed.
(c) This section shall not apply to the following categories of
appropriations or reappropriations for fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year
2027: Aid to locals, capital improvements, debt service and other
assistance.
(d) This section shall not apply to the following for fiscal year
2026 or fiscal year 2027: Legislative branch state agencies, judicial
branch state agencies, attorney general, attorney general – Kansas
bureau of investigation, Kansas sentencing commission, state hospitals,
veterans' and soldiers' homes of the Kansas office of veterans services,
correctional facilities, Kansas highway patrol, the state board of regents
and universities.
(e) The director of the budget, in consultation with the director of
legislative research, shall certify the aggregate amount of the lapses for
each state agency subject to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b).
The head of each state agency shall determine the amounts and
accounts from which to lapse an amount equal to the aggregate 1.5%
lapse and provide such determination to the director of the budget. The
director of the budget shall certify the amount of the lapse in each state
general fund account for the purposes of this section to the director of
accounts and reports. At the same time that any certification is made,
the director of the budget shall deliver a copy of such certification to
the director of legislative research.
Sec. 160.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
KEIMS database........................................................................$425,000
Provided, That all moneys in the KEIMS database account shall be
used for the purpose of providing the department of health and
environment – division of environment funding for fiscal year 2026 for
the one-time integration of the Kansas environmental information
management system with perceptive content for an electronic filing
system of records: Provided further, That upon the submission of a
report by the department of health and environment – division of

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 254
environment to the above agency regarding the improvements made to
the tanks program useability and the review and approval of such
report, expenditures may be made from such account during fiscal year
2026 by the state finance council acting on this matter, which is hereby
characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to the
guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto:
Provided further, That the state finance council is hereby authorized to
approve such expenditures: And provided further, That such
expenditures shall be approved by the governor and the majority of the
legislative members of the state finance council and that such approval
also may be given while the legislature is in session.
Sec. 161.
STATE FINANCE COUNCIL
(a) During fiscal year 2026, on or before August 1, 2025, the
secretary of administration, in consultation with the governor's
department, shall certify to the members of the state finance council
that all state agencies have:
(1) Eliminated any positions that relate to diversity, equity and
inclusion;
(2) eliminated any mandates, policies, programs, preferences and
activities relating to diversity, equity and inclusion;
(3) eliminated any training requirements in diversity, equity and
inclusion for any employee;
(4) canceled any state grants or contracts relating to diversity,
equity and inclusion; and
(5) removed gender identifying pronouns or gender ideology from
email signature blocks on state employee's email accounts and any
other form of communication.
(b) The secretary of administration shall present such certification
and any additional information to the state finance council at a state
finance council meeting.
Sec. 162.
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
(a) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the department of administration from moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2025, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by
the department of administration from such moneys for fiscal year 2025
to provide for the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development
finance authority in accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments
thereto, for a capital improvement project to construct, renovate,
develop and equip the pure imagination facility (Kansas advanced
immersive research for emerging systems center) on the Salina campus
of Kansas state university: Provided, That such capital improvement
project is hereby approved for Kansas state university for the purposes
of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto, and the authorization
of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority
in accordance with such statute: Provided further, That Kansas state
university may make expenditures from the moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds for such capital improvement project:
Provided, however, That expenditures from the moneys received from
the issuance of any such bonds for such capital improvement project
shall not exceed $45,000,000 plus all amounts required for costs of
bond issuance, costs of interest on the bonds issued for such capital
improvement project during the construction and renovation of such
project and, for a period of not more than one year following
completion of such project, credit enhancement costs and any required
reserves for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds: And

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 255
provided further, That all moneys received from the issuance of any
such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as prescribed by
applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That debt service for
any such bonds for such capital improvement project shall be financed
by appropriations from the state general fund to the department of
administration: And provided further, That any such bonds and interest
thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development finance
authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas within the
meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of
Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the taxing power
of the state of Kansas: And provided further, That Kansas state
university shall make provisions for the maintenance of the pure
imagination facility (K-AIRES center): And provided further, That,
notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-3739 through 75-3744,
and amendments thereto, or any other statute to the contrary, all
procurement approvals by the department of commerce concerning
such pure imagination facility during fiscal year 2024 shall be deemed
to be approved by Kansas state university and shall not require any
resubmission or rebidding.
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the department of administration from moneys appropriated
from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for
fiscal year 2025, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the
2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by
the department of administration from such moneys for fiscal year 2025
to provide for the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development
finance authority in accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments
thereto, for a capital improvement project to construct a central medical
and behavioral health support building at the Topeka correctional
facility: Provided, That such capital improvement project is hereby
approved for the department of corrections for the purposes of K.S.A.
74-8905(b), and amendments thereto, and the authorization of the
issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with such statute: Provided further, That the department of
corrections may make expenditures from the moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds for such capital improvement project:
Provided, however, That expenditures from the moneys received from
the issuance of any such bonds for such capital improvement project
shall not exceed $40,235,000 plus all amounts required for costs of
bond issuance, costs of interest on the bonds issued for such capital
improvement project during the construction and renovation of such
project and, for a period of not more than one year following
completion of such project, credit enhancement costs and any required
reserves for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds: And
provided further, That all moneys received from the issuance of any
such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as prescribed by
applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That debt service for
any such bonds for such capital improvement project shall be financed
by appropriations from the state general fund to the department of
administration: And provided further, That any such bonds and interest
thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development finance
authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas within the
meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of
Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the taxing power
of the state of Kansas: And provided further, That the department of
corrections shall make provisions for the maintenance of the building.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the department of administration from the moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or from any special revenue

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 256
fund or funds for fiscal year 2025, as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the department of administration from
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2025 to provide for the issuance
of 20-year bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital
improvement project for the Kansas bureau of investigation to
construct, renovate, develop and equip a regional crime center and
laboratory in Pittsburg, Kansas: Provided, That such capital
improvement project is hereby approved for the Kansas bureau of
investigation for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments
thereto, and the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas
development finance authority in accordance with such statute:
Provided further, That the Kansas bureau of investigation may make
expenditures from the moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds for such capital improvement project: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds for such capital improvement project shall not exceed
$40,000,000 plus all amounts required for costs of bond issuance, costs
of interest on the bonds issued for such capital improvement project
during the construction and renovation of such project and, for a period
of not more than one year following completion of such project, credit
enhancement costs and any required reserves for the payment of
principal and interest on the bonds: And provided further, That all
moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds shall be
deposited and accounted for as prescribed by applicable bond
covenants: And provided further, That debt service for any such bonds
for such capital improvement project shall be financed by
appropriations from the state general fund and any appropriate special
revenue fund or funds of the department of administration: And
provided further, That any such bonds and interest thereon shall be an
obligation only of the Kansas development finance authority, shall not
constitute a debt of the state of Kansas within the meaning of section 6
or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of Kansas and shall not
pledge the full faith and credit or the taxing power of the state of
Kansas: And provided further, That the Kansas bureau of investigation
shall make provisions for the maintenance of the regional crime center
and laboratory.
Sec. 163.
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital
improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Debt service
refunding – 2019F/G (173-00-1000-0465).............................$6,642,191
Rehabilitation and repair for
state facilities (173-00-1000-8500).........................................$5,000,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and
repair for state facilities account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025,
is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Debt service
refunding – 2021P (173-00-1000-8562).................................$3,417,500
Debt service
refunding – 2020R (173-00-1000-8563).................................$8,228,450
Debt service – 2025A/B (173-00-1000)................................$10,266,988
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 257
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Statehouse debt service – state
highway fund (173-00-2861-2861).............................................No limit
Debt service refunding – 2019F/G –
state highway fund (173-00-2823-2823).....................................No limit
Debt service refunding – 2020R –
state highway fund (173-00-2865-2865).....................................No limit
Debt service refunding – 2020S –
state highway fund (173-00-2866-2866).....................................No limit
State buildings
depreciation fund (173-00-6149-4500).......................................No limit
Capitol area plaza authority
planning fund (173-00-7121-7035).............................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of administration may accept gifts,
donations and grants of money, including payments from local units of
city and county government, for the development of a new master plan
for the capitol plaza and the state zoning area described in K.S.A. 75-
3619, and amendments thereto: Provided further, That all such gifts,
donations and grants shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, to the credit of the capitol area plaza authority planning fund.
Veterans memorial fund (173-00-7253-7250).............................No limit
Executive mansion gifts fund (173-00-7257-7270).....................No limit
State facilities gift fund (173-00-7263-7290)..............................No limit
Topeka state hospital cemetery memorial
gift fund (173-00-7337-7240)......................................................No limit
Master lease program fund (173-00-8732)..................................No limit
Printing plant improvement fund.................................................No limit
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the building and ground fund (173-
00-2028) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from the following capital improvement account or accounts of
the building and ground fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following
capital improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure
limitations prescribed therefor:
Parking improvements
and repair (173-00-2028-2085)...................................................No limit
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the state buildings depreciation fund
(173-00-6149) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or
accounts of the state buildings depreciation fund for fiscal year 2026
for the following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
State of Kansas facilities projects –
debt service (173-00-6149-4520)................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the state buildings depreciation fund for fiscal year 2026.
(e) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the state buildings operating fund
(173-00-6148) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or
accounts of the state buildings operating fund for fiscal year 2026 for
the following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Eisenhower building purchase and renovation –
debt service (173-00-6148-4610)................................................No limit
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 258
be made by the above agency from the building and ground fund (173-
00-2028), the state buildings depreciation fund (173-00-6149), and the
state buildings operating fund (173-00-6148) for fiscal year 2026,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from each such special
revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 from the unencumbered balance as of
June 30, 2026, in each existing capital improvement account of each
such special revenue fund: Provided, That expenditures from the
unencumbered balance of any such existing capital improvement
account shall not exceed the amount of the unencumbered balance in
such account on June 30, 2026: Provided further, That all expenditures
from the unencumbered balance of any such account shall be in
addition to any expenditure limitation imposed on each such special
revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 and shall be in addition to any other
expenditure limitation imposed on any such account of each such
special revenue fund for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 164.
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
(a) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the reimbursement and recovery
fund (300-00-2275) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from the following capital improvement account or
accounts of the reimbursement and recovery fund during the fiscal year
2026, for the following capital improvement project or projects, subject
to the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair (300-00-2275).....................................No limit
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the Wagner Peyser employment
services – federal fund (300-00-3275) for fiscal year 2026,
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the following
capital improvement account or accounts of the Wagner Peyser
employment services – federal fund during fiscal year 2026, for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair (300-00-3275).....................................No limit
Sec. 165.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT FOR
AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
the capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and repair projects (039-00-8100-8240)..........$3,452,500
Provided, That the secretary for aging and disability services is hereby
authorized to transfer moneys during fiscal year 2026 from the
rehabilitation and repair projects account to a rehabilitation and repair
account for any institution, as defined by K.S.A. 76-12a01, and
amendments thereto, for projects approved by the secretary for aging
and disability services: Provided further, That expenditures also may be
made from this account during fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of
rehabilitation and repair for facilities of the Kansas department for
aging and disability services other than any institution, as defined by
K.S.A. 76-12a01, and amendments thereto.
Larned state hospital – city of Larned
wastewater treatment (410-00-8100-8300)................................$129,620
Provided, That, notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 76-6b05, and
amendments thereto, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the Larned state hospital – city of Larned wastewater treatment
account of the state institutions building fund for payment of Larned
state hospital's portion of the city of Larned's wastewater treatment
system.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 259
Sec. 166.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, for the capital
improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Capital improvements (296-00-1000-8010) ..............................$267,101
(b) On the effective date of this act, the expenditure limitation for
capital improvement projects established for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2025, by section 156(d) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of
Kansas on the workmen's compensation fee fund (296-00-2124-2228)
of the department of labor is hereby increased from $464,000 to
$664,000.
Sec. 167.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital
improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Capital improvements (296-00-1000-8010)...............................$696,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the capital improvements
account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated
for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Employment security administration property
sale fund (296-00-3336-3110).....................................................No limit
Provided, That the secretary of labor is hereby authorized to make
expenditures from the employment security administration property
sale fund during fiscal year 2026 for the unemployment insurance
program: Provided, however, That no expenditures shall be made from
this fund for the proposed purchase or other acquisition of additional
real estate to provide space for the unemployment insurance program of
the department of labor until such proposed purchase or other
acquisition, including the preliminary plans and program statement for
any capital improvement project that is proposed to be initiated and
completed by or for the department of labor have been reviewed by the
joint committee on state building construction.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the department of labor from moneys appropriated from
any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature, expenditures may be made by the department of labor for
fiscal year 2026 from the moneys appropriated from any special
revenue fund for the expenses of the sale, exchange or other disposition
conveying title for any portion or all of the real estate of the department
of labor: Provided, That such expenditures may be made and such sale,
exchange or other disposition conveying title for any portion or all of
the real estate of the department of labor may be executed or otherwise
effectuated only upon specific authorization by the state finance council
acting on this matter, which is hereby characterized as a matter of
legislative delegation and subject to the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A.
75-3711c(c), and amendments thereto, and acting after receiving the
recommendations of the joint committee on state building construction:
Provided, however, That no such sale, exchange or other disposition
conveying title for any portion of the real estate of the department of
labor shall be executed until the proposed sale, exchange or other
disposition conveying title for such real estate has been reviewed by the
joint committee on state building construction: Provided further, That

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 260
the net proceeds from the sale of any of the real estate of the
department of labor shall be deposited in the state treasury in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto, and shall be credited to the employment security administration
property sale fund of the department of labor: And provided further,
That expenditures from the employment security administration
property sale fund shall not exceed the limitation established for fiscal
year 2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, except upon approval of the state
finance council.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the workmen's compensation fee
fund (296-00-2124) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from the workmen's compensation fee fund for fiscal
year 2026 for the following capital improvement projects: Payment of
rehabilitation and repair projects: Provided, That expenditures from the
workmen's compensation fee fund (296-00-2124-2228) for fiscal year
2026 for such capital improvement purposes shall not exceed $464,000.
Sec. 168.
KANSAS OFFICE OF VETERANS SERVICES
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital
improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Veterans cemetery program rehabilitation and
repair projects (694-00-1000-0904)...........................................$201,980
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the veterans cemetery
program rehabilitation and repair projects account in excess of $100 as
of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
the capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Soldiers' home rehabilitation and
repair projects (694-00-8100-7100)...........................................$798,670
Veterans' home rehabilitation and
repair projects (694-00-8100-8250)........................................$1,813,648
Any unencumbered balance in the northeast Kansas veterans' home
account (694-00-8100-8290) in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 169.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
the capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and
repair projects (604-00-8100-8108)........................................$1,322,718
Security system
upgrade project (604-00-8100-8130).........................................$306,342
Campus boilers and
HVAC upgrades (604-00-8100-8145).....................................$1,418,500
Sec. 170.
KANSAS STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
the capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and repair projects (610-00-8100-8108)..........$2,005,712
Campus life safety and security (610-00-8100-8130)................$397,356
Campus boilers and
HVAC upgrades (610-00-8100-8145).....................................$1,592,750
Sec. 171.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 261
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital
improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and repair
projects (288-00-1000-8088).....................................................$375,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and
repair projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in excess of $100
as of June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Shawnee mission roofs replacement account (288-00-1000), museum
of history air handling units/chiller replacement (288-00-1000).
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the private gifts, grants and
bequests fund (288-00-7302) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from the following capital improvement
account or accounts of the private gifts, grants and bequests fund for
fiscal year 2026 for the following capital improvement project or
projects, subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair projects................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the private gifts, grants and bequests fund for fiscal year 2026.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the historical preservation grant in
aid fund (288-00-3089) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made
by the above agency from the following capital improvement account
or accounts of the historical preservation grant in aid fund for fiscal
year 2026 for the following capital improvement project or projects,
subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair projects................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the historical preservation grant in aid fund for fiscal year 2026.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the private gifts, grants and
bequests fund, historic properties fee fund, state historical facilities
fund, save America's treasures fund, historical society capital
improvement fund, law enforcement memorial fund and historical
preservation grant in aid fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from each such special revenue fund for
fiscal year 2026 from the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in
each existing capital improvement account of each such special revenue
fund: Provided, That expenditures from the unencumbered balance of
any such existing capital improvement account shall not exceed the
amount of the unencumbered balance in such account on June 30,
2026: Provided further, That all expenditures from the unencumbered
balance of any such account shall be in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on each such special revenue fund for fiscal year
2026 and shall be in addition to any other expenditure limitation
imposed on any such account of each such special revenue fund for
fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 172.
EMPORIA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 262
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(379-00-2526-2040; 379-00-2069-2010)....................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (379-00-2485-2485)...................No limit
Morris central renovation (379-00-2526-2040)...........................No limit
Welch stadium renovation (379-00-2526-2040)..........................No limit
King hall theatre (379-00-2526-2040).........................................No limit
Twin towers housing project –
debt service 2017D (379-00-5120-5030)....................................No limit
Memorial union project –
debt service 2020F (379-00-5161-5040).....................................No limit
Student housing projects –
debt service 2017D (379-00-5169-5050)....................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (379-00-5186-5060)....................No limit
Student housing projects (379-00-5650-5120;
379-00-5169-5050)......................................................................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (379-00)...................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational
building fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature:
Provided, That this subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered
balance in any account of the Kansas educational building fund of the
above agency that was first appropriated for any fiscal year
commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency
of moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by
any provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of buildings account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (379-
00-1000-0320); demolition of buildings (379-00-1000-8510); and
Emporia state university student affordability (379-00-1000-0370):
Provided, That all expenditures from the Emporia state university
student affordability account shall be used to eliminate the student fee
of $125.12 per semester for full-time, on-campus students and $14.83
per credit hour for part-time students for memorial union debt:
Provided, however, That during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the Emporia state university or the state board of regents shall not
increase any other student fees to offset the revenue reduction from the
elimination of such student fee.
Sec. 173.
FORT HAYS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 263
Akers energy center project (246-00-2035-2000).......................No limit
Energy conservation –
debt service (246-00-2035-2000)................................................No limit
Forsyth library renovation (246-00-2035-2000)..........................No limit
Rarick hall renovation (246-00-2035-2000)................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(246-00-2035-2000; 246-00-2510-2040)....................................No limit
Gross coliseum parking lot project
(246-00-2035-2000; 246-00-5185-5050)....................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (246-00-2483-2483)...................No limit
Memorial union addition –
debt service 2020C (246-00-2510-2040).....................................No limit
Memorial union project (246-00-2510-2040)..............................No limit
Memorial union renovation –
debt service 2005G (246-00-5102-5010)....................................No limit
Student union rehabilitation and
repair projects (246-00-5102-5010).............................................No limit
Lewis field/Wiest hall renovation –
debt service 2016B (246-00-5103-5020).....................................No limit
Wiest hall replacement –
debt service 2016B (246-00-5103-5020).....................................No limit
Student housing rehabilitation and
repair projects (246-00-5103-5020).............................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (246-00-5185-5050)....................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (246-00)...................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational
building fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature:
Provided, That this subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered
balance in any account of the Kansas educational building fund of the
above agency that was first appropriated for any fiscal year
commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency
of moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by
any provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (246-
00-1000-0320) and demolition of buildings (246-00-1000-8510).
Sec. 174.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 264
Strong complex project –
debt service 2024F (367-00-5163-4500).....................................No limit
Sec. 175.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Chiller plant project –
debt service 2015B (367-00-2062-2000).....................................No limit
Engineering hall renovation
project (367-00-2062-2000)........................................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(367-00-2062-2000; 367-00-2062-2080;
367-00-2520-2080; 367-00-2901-2160)......................................No limit
Energy conservation projects –
debt service 2021A, 2012F/H, 2017B
(367-00-2062-2000; 367-00-5163-4500)....................................No limit
Capital lease – debt service
(367-00-2062-2000; 367-00-520-2080;
367-00-5117-4430)......................................................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (367-00-2484-2484)...................No limit
Electrical upgrade project – debt service 2017E
(367-00-2520-2080; 367-00-2484-2484)....................................No limit
Recreation complex project – debt service
2021A, 2010G1/2 (367-00-2520-2080).......................................No limit
Seaton hall renovation –
debt service 2016A (367-00-2520-2080).....................................No limit
Student union renovation project –
debt service 2016A (367-00-2520-2080).....................................No limit
Research initiative debt service
2021A (367-00-2901-2106).........................................................No limit
Building retro-commissioning
project (367-00-2901-2160)........................................................No limit
Chemical landfill – debt service
refunding 2011G-2 (367-00-2901-2160).....................................No limit
Salina student life center project – debt service
2008D (367-00-5111-5120).........................................................No limit
K-state Salina residence hall – debt service
2022A (367-00-5117-4430).........................................................No limit
Childcare development center project –
debt service 2019C (367-00-5125-5101).....................................No limit
Debt service refunding 2022D (367-00-5163-4500)...................No limit
Derby dining center project – debt
service 2019C (367-00-5163-4500).............................................No limit
Jardine housing project – debt service 2022D/
2014D/2015B/2011G-1 (367-00-5163-4500)..............................No limit
Student housing projects
(367-00-5163-4500; 367-00-5117-4430).....................................No limit
Wefald dining and residence hall project – debt
service 2022D/2014D-2 (367-00-5163-4500).............................No limit
Union parking –
debt service 2016A (367-00-5181-4630).....................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (367-00-5181-4638)....................No limit
Strong complex project –
debt service 2024F (367-00-5163-4500).....................................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (367-00)...................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 265
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational
building fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature:
Provided, That this subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered
balance in any account of the Kansas educational building fund of the
above agency that was first appropriated for any fiscal year
commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency
of moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by
any provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (367-
00-1000-0320); demolition of buildings (367-00-1000-8510); Kansas
state university animal diagnostic laboratory (367-00-1000-0260); and
Kansas state university ag innovation initiative (367-00-1000-0210):
Provided, That all expenditures from the Kansas state university ag
innovation initiative account shall require a match of nonstate or
private moneys on a $1-for-$1 basis: Provided, however, That no
federal grants may be used for such match.
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by Kansas state university from moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025
regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by Kansas
state university from such moneys for fiscal year 2026 to provide for
the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital
improvement project to complete the construction, renovation,
development and equipment of the animal science arena, agronomy
research and innovation center, global center for grain and food
innovation, Call hall and Weber hall: Provided, That such capital
improvement project is hereby approved for Kansas state university for
the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto, and the
authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development
finance authority in accordance with such statute: Provided further,
That Kansas state university may make expenditures from the moneys
received from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital
improvement project: Provided, however, That expenditures from the
moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital
improvement project shall not exceed $23,500,000 plus all amounts
required for costs of bond issuance, costs of interest on the bonds
issued for such capital improvement project during the construction and
renovation of such project and, for a period of not more than one year
following completion of such project, credit enhancement costs and any
required reserves for the payment of principal and interest on the
bonds: And provided further, That all moneys received from the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 266
issuance of any such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as
prescribed by applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That
debt service for any such bonds for such capital improvement project
shall be financed by appropriations from any appropriate special
revenue fund or funds: And provided further, That any such bonds and
interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development
finance authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas
within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of
the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the
taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further, That Kansas
state university shall make provisions for the maintenance of the animal
science arena, agronomy research and innovation center, global center
for grain and food innovation, Call hall and Weber hall.
Sec. 176.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY EXTENSION SYSTEMS
AND AGRICULTURE RESEARCH PROGRAMS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Capital lease – debt service
(369-00-2697-1100; 369-00-2921-1200).....................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair
projects (369-00-2697-1100).......................................................No limit
Sec. 177.
KANSAS STATE UNIVERSITY
VETERINARY MEDICAL CENTER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(368-00-2129-5500; 368-00-5160-5300;
368-00-2590-5530)......................................................................No limit
AHU replacement project (368-00-2590-5530)..........................No limit
Mosier lab renovation (368-00-2590-5530)................................No limit
Capital lease – debt service (368-00-5160-5300)........................No limit
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by Kansas state university veterinary medical center from the
moneys appropriated from the state general fund or from any special
revenue fund or funds for fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027, as
authorized by this or other appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026
regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be made by Kansas
state university veterinary medical center from such moneys for fiscal
year 2026 or fiscal year 2027 to provide for the issuance of bonds by
the Kansas development finance authority in accordance with K.S.A.
74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital improvement project
for the construction, development and equipment of a veterinary
diagnostic laboratory on the Manhattan campus of Kansas state
university: Provided, however, That prior to the issuance of any such
bonds, the above agency shall certify to the Kansas development
finance authority, the director of the budget and the director of
legislative research that the above agency has received $2,000,000 in
private donations for such capital improvement project: Provided
further, That such capital improvement project is hereby approved for
Kansas state university veterinary medical center for the purposes of
K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto, and the authorization of
the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with such statute: And provided further, That Kansas state

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 267
university veterinary medical center may make expenditures from the
moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital
improvement project: Provided, however, That expenditures from the
moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital
improvement project shall not exceed $128,000,000 plus all amounts
required for costs of bond issuance, costs of interest on the bonds
issued for such capital improvement project during the construction and
renovation of such project and, for a period of not more than one year
following completion of such project, credit enhancement costs and any
required reserves for the payment of principal and interest on the
bonds: And provided further, That all moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as
prescribed by applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That
debt service for any such bonds for such capital improvement project
shall be financed by appropriations from the state general fund and any
appropriate special revenue fund or funds: And provided further, That
any such bonds and interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the
Kansas development finance authority, shall not constitute a debt of the
state of Kansas within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the
constitution of the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and
credit or the taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further,
That Kansas state university veterinary medical center shall make
provisions for the maintenance of the veterinary diagnostic laboratory.
Sec. 178.
PITTSBURG STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Debt service refunding – 2022E
(385-00-2070-2010; 385-00-5106-5105)....................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (385-00-2486-2486)...................No limit
Overman student center –
debt service 2014A2 (385-00-2820-2820)..................................No limit
Overman student
center project (385-00-2820-2820)..............................................No limit
Building renovations – debt service 2014A1, 2022E
(385-00-2833-2831; 385-00-5106-5105)....................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(385-00-2833-2831; 385-00-2070-2010;
385-00-2529-2040)......................................................................No limit
Student housing projects – debt service 2011D1,
2020H, 2014A1 (385-00-2833-2831;
385-00-5165-5050)......................................................................No limit
Energy conservation projects –
debt service 2011D/D3, 2015M, 2014A-1
(385-00-5165-5050; 385-00-2070-2010;
385-00-5646-5160)......................................................................No limit
Parking facility – debt service
2020H (385-00-5187-5060).........................................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (385-00-5187-5060)....................No limit
Student housing maintenance projects (385-00-5646-5160).......No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (385-00)...................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 268
building fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature:
Provided, That this subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered
balance in any account of the Kansas educational building fund of the
above agency that was first appropriated for any fiscal year
commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency
of moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by
the provisions of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by the provisions of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (385-
00-1000-0320); demolition of buildings (385-00-1000-8510); and
American center for reading facility (385-00-1000-0290).
Sec. 179.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Energy conservation projects – debt service
2020B (682-00-2107-2000;
682-00-2545-2080)......................................................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(682-00-2107-2000; 682-00-2545-2080)....................................No limit
Kansas law enforcement training
center projects (682-00-2133-2020)............................................No limit
Engineering facility – debt service 2021D
(682-00-2153-2153; 682-00-2545-2080)....................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (682-00-2487-2487)...................No limit
Energy conservation projects –
debt service (682-00-2545-2080)................................................No limit
Earth, energy and environment center –
debt service 2017A (682-00-2545-2080).....................................No limit
Rehabilitation and
repair projects (682-00-2545-2080).............................................No limit
Student recreation center –
debt service 2017A (682-00-2864-2860).....................................No limit
Student recreation center rehabilitation
and repair (682-00-2864-2860)...................................................No limit
Law enforcement training center capital
improvement ARPA fund (682-00-3756)....................................No limit
Student housing projects –
debt service 2014C, 2017A,
2020B, 2021D (682-00-5142-5050)............................................No limit
McCollum hall parking facility – debt
service 2014C (682-00-5175-5070).............................................No limit
Parking facilities – debt service
2014C, 2017A (682-00-5175-5070)............................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (682-00-5175-5070)....................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 269
Student housing maintenance projects
(682-00-5621-5110; 682-00-5142-5050;
682-00-2545-2080; 682-00-2905-2160)......................................No limit
Student health facility rehabilitation and
repair projects (682-00-5640-5120).............................................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (682-00)...................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational
building fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature:
Provided, That this subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered
balance in any account of the Kansas educational building fund of the
above agency that was first appropriated for any fiscal year
commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency
of moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by
any provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (682-
00-1000-0420) and demolition of buildings (682-00-1000-8510).
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the university of Kansas from moneys appropriated from
the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 or fiscal year 2027, as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the university of Kansas from such
moneys for fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027 to provide for the
issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital
improvement project to fund future student housing needs, including
construction and equipping of one or more new student residence halls
and purchase of one or more existing leased apartment complexes on
the Lawrence campus of the university of Kansas: Provided, That such
capital improvement project is hereby approved for the university of
Kansas for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments
thereto, and the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas
development finance authority in accordance with such statute:
Provided further, That the university of Kansas may make expenditures
from the moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such
capital improvement project: Provided, however, That expenditures
from the moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such
capital improvement project shall not exceed $100,000,000 plus all
amounts required for costs of bond issuance, costs of interest on the
bonds issued for such capital improvement project during the
construction of such project and, for a period of not more than one year

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 270
following completion of such project, credit enhancement costs and any
required reserves for the payment of principal and interest on the
bonds: And provided further, That all moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as
prescribed by applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That
debt service for any such bonds for such capital improvement project
shall be financed by appropriations from any appropriate special
revenue fund or funds: And provided further, That any such bonds and
interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development
finance authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas
within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of
the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the
taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further, That the
university of Kansas shall make provisions for the maintenance of such
capital improvement project and related equipment and infrastructure
for student housing.
(g) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the university of Kansas from moneys appropriated from
the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 or fiscal year 2027, as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by the university of Kansas from such
moneys for fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027 to provide for the
issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments thereto, to refinance
the outstanding public finance authority lease development revenue
bonds (KU campus development corporation – central district
development project), series 2016: Provided, That such capital
improvement project is hereby approved for the university of Kansas
for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto, and
the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development
finance authority in accordance with such statute: Provided further,
That the university of Kansas may make expenditures from the moneys
received from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital
improvement project: Provided, however, That expenditures from the
moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such capital
improvement project shall not exceed $276,000,000 plus all amounts
required for costs of bond issuance, credit enhancement costs and any
required reserves for the payment of principal and interest on the
bonds: And provided further, That all moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as
prescribed by applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That
debt service for any such bonds for such capital improvement project
shall be financed by appropriations from any appropriate special
revenue fund or funds: And provided further, That any such bonds and
interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development
finance authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas
within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of
the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the
taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further, That the
purpose of such refinancing is to achieve a reduction in debt service:
And provided further, That the university of Kansas shall make
provisions for the maintenance of the original capital improvement
project and related equipment and infrastructure.
Sec. 180.
UNIVERSITY OF KANSAS MEDICAL CENTER
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 271
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Health education building –
debt service 2017A (683-00-2108-2500).....................................No limit
Energy conservation –
debt service 2020B (683-00-2108-2500).....................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(683-00-2108-2500; 683-00-2394-2390;
683-00-2551-2600; 683-00-2907-2800;
683-00-2915-2915)......................................................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (683-00-2488-2488)...................No limit
Hemenway research initiative – debt service
2020B (683-00-2907-2800; 683-00-2108)..................................No limit
KUMC research institute – debt service
2020B (683-00-2907-2800; 683-00-2108)..................................No limit
Parking garage 3 –
debt service 2014C (683-00-5176-5550).....................................No limit
Parking garage 4 – debt service
2020B (683-00-5176-5550).........................................................No limit
Parking garage 5 –
debt service 2016C (683-00-5176-5550).....................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (683-00-5176-5550)....................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (683-00)...................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational
building fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature:
Provided, That this subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered
balance in any account of the Kansas educational building fund of the
above agency that was first appropriated for any fiscal year
commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency
of moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by
any provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (683-
00-1000-0320); demolition of buildings (683-00-1000-8510); and
university of Kansas medical center cancer research facility (683-00-
1000-0640): Provided, That all expenditures from the university of
Kansas medical center cancer research facility account shall require a
match of nonstate or private moneys on a $1-for-$1 basis: Provided,
however, That no federal grants may be used for such match.
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the university of Kansas medical center from moneys
appropriated from the state general fund or any special revenue fund or
funds for fiscal year 2026, as authorized by this or other appropriation

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 272
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be
made by the university of Kansas medical center from such moneys for
fiscal year 2026 to provide for the issuance of bonds by the Kansas
development finance authority in accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and
amendments thereto, for a capital improvement project to construct,
renovate, develop and equip the cancer center at the university of
Kansas medical center: Provided, That such capital improvement
project is hereby approved for the university of Kansas medical center
for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments thereto, and
the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas development
finance authority in accordance with such statute: Provided further,
That the university of Kansas medical center may make expenditures
from the moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such
capital improvement project: Provided, however, That expenditures
from the moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such
capital improvement project shall not exceed $100,000,000 plus all
amounts required for costs of bond issuance, costs of interest on the
bonds issued for such capital improvement project during the
construction and renovation of such project and, for a period of not
more than one year following completion of such project, credit
enhancement costs and any required reserves for the payment of
principal and interest on the bonds: And provided further, That all
moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds shall be
deposited and accounted for as prescribed by applicable bond
covenants: And provided further, That debt service for any such bonds
for such capital improvement project shall be financed by
appropriations from any appropriate special revenue fund or funds: And
provided further, That any such bonds and interest thereon shall be an
obligation only of the Kansas development finance authority, shall not
constitute a debt of the state of Kansas within the meaning of section 6
or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of the state of Kansas and shall not
pledge the full faith and credit or the taxing power of the state of
Kansas: And provided further, That the university of Kansas medical
center shall make provisions for the maintenance of the cancer center.
Sec. 181.
WICHITA STATE UNIVERSITY
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Clinton hall shocker student success center –
debt service 2022G (715-00-2112-2000;
715-00-2558-2030)......................................................................No limit
Energy conservation –
debt service (715-00-2112-2000).................................................No limit
Honors colleges foundation –
debt service (715-00-2112-2000).................................................No limit
Woolsey hall – school of business
debt service 2020P (715-00-2112-2000;
715-00-2558-2030)......................................................................No limit
Deferred maintenance projects (715-00-2489-2489)...................No limit
Cessna stadium demolition (715-00-2558-2030)........................No limit
Convergence sciences 2 – debt
service 2021L (715-00-2558)......................................................No limit
Marcus welcome center
project (715-00-2558; 715-00-2112-2000)..................................No limit
Rehabilitation and repair projects
(715-00-2558-2030; 715-00-2908-2080;
715-00-2558-3000; 715-00-2112-2000)......................................No limit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 273
Rhatigan student center –
debt service 2020P (715-00-2558-2030).....................................No limit
Engineering research lab – debt
service 2016J (715-00-2558-2030)..............................................No limit
NIAR/engineering/industry &
defense projects (715-00-2908-2080;
715-00-2558-2030; 715-00-2558-3000)......................................No limit
Flats and suites –
debt service 2020P (715-00-5100-5250).....................................No limit
Shocker residence hall –
debt service 2021L (715-00-5100-5250).....................................No limit
Student housing projects (715-00-5100-5250)............................No limit
Parking garage – debt
service 2016J (715-00-5148-5000)..............................................No limit
Parking maintenance projects (715-00-5159-5040)....................No limit
Fairmont towers – debt
service 2012A2 (715-00-5620-5270)..........................................No limit
Deferred maintenance account –
Kansas campus restoration fund (715-00)...................................No limit
(b) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the rehabilitation and repair projects,
Americans with disabilities act compliance projects, state fire marshal
code compliance projects and improvements to classroom projects for
institutions of higher education account of the Kansas educational
building fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature:
Provided, That this subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered
balance in any account of the Kansas educational building fund of the
above agency that was first appropriated for any fiscal year
commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the state universities facilities capital
renewal initiative account of the state general fund of the above agency
of moneys transferred to such account by the state board of regents by
any provision of this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature.
(d) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the above agency
may make expenditures from the demolition of building account of the
state general fund of the above agency of moneys transferred to such
account by the state board of regents by any provision of this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature.
(e) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts in
excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal
year 2026: State universities facilities capital renewal initiative (715-
00-1000-0320) and demolition of buildings (715-00-1000-8510).
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by Wichita state university from moneys appropriated from
the state general fund or any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 or fiscal year 2027, as authorized by this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 or 2026 regular session of the legislature,
expenditures may be made by Wichita state university from such
moneys for fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027 to provide for the
issuance of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in
accordance with K.S.A. 74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital
improvement project for the renovation and equipment of the university
stadium on the campus of Wichita state university: Provided, That such
capital improvement project is hereby approved for Wichita state
university for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and amendments

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 274
thereto, and the authorization of the issuance of bonds by the Kansas
development finance authority in accordance with such statute:
Provided further, That Wichita state university may make expenditures
from the moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such
capital improvement project: Provided, however, That expenditures
from the moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds for such
capital improvement project shall not exceed $60,000,000 plus all
amounts required for costs of bond issuance, costs of interest on the
bonds issued for such capital improvement project during the
renovation of such project and, for a period of not more than one year
following completion of such project, credit enhancement costs and any
required reserves for the payment of principal and interest on the
bonds: And provided further, That all moneys received from the
issuance of any such bonds shall be deposited and accounted for as
prescribed by applicable bond covenants: And provided further, That
debt service for any such bonds for such capital improvement project
shall be financed by appropriations from any appropriate special
revenue fund or funds: And provided further, That any such bonds and
interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development
finance authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas
within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of
the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the
taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further, That Wichita
state university shall make provisions for the maintenance of the
stadium and related equipment and infrastructure.
Sec. 182.
STATE BOARD OF REGENTS
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Kansas educational
building fund (561-00-8001-8108)..............................................No limit
Provided, That the state board of regents is hereby authorized to
transfer moneys from the Kansas educational building fund to an
account or accounts of the Kansas educational building fund of any
institution under the control and supervision of the state board of
regents to be expended by the institution for projects, including
planning, new construction and razing, approved by the state board of
regents: Provided, however, That no expenditures shall be made from
any such account until the proposed projects have been reviewed by the
joint committee on state building construction: Provided further, That
the state board of regents shall certify to the director of accounts and
reports each such transfer of moneys from the Kansas educational
building fund: And provided further, That the state board of regents
shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of the
budget and to the director of legislative research.
Kansas campus restoration fund (561-00)...................................No limit
Provided, That the state board of regents is hereby authorized to
transfer moneys from the Kansas campus restoration fund to the
deferred maintenance account – Kansas campus restoration fund of any
institution under the control and supervision of the state board of
regents to be expended by the institution for projects approved by the
state board of regents: Provided further, That the state board of regents
shall certify to the director of accounts and reports each such transfer of
moneys from the Kansas campus restoration fund: And provided
further, That the state board of regents shall transmit a copy of each
such certification to the director of the budget and to the director of

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 275
legislative research.
(b) Any unencumbered balance in the following account or
accounts in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Demolition of buildings (561-00-
1000-8510).
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an aggregate amount
of $13,200,000 from the APEX payroll incentive fund, the APEX new
employee training and education fund and the APEX payroll residency
incentive fund of the department of commerce to the Kansas campus
restoration fund of the state board of regents.
(d) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $5,000,000 from the
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief – federal fund (252-00-3756)
of the governor's department to the Kansas campus restoration fund of
the state board of regents.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $5,000,000 from the
water supply storage debt payment for Milford and Perry reservoirs
account (039-00-1000-0610) of the state general fund of the state
treasurer to the Kansas campus restoration fund of the state board of
regents.
Sec. 183.
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(a) Any unencumbered balance in the priority capital
improvement projects account (521-00-1000-0800) of the state general
fund of the above agency in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is
hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the
correctional institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, for the capital improvement project or projects specified, the
following:
Capital improvements – rehabilitation and repair of
correctional institutions (521-00-8600-8240).........................$4,182,000
Provided, That the secretary of corrections is hereby authorized to
transfer moneys during fiscal year 2026 from the capital improvements
– rehabilitation and repair of correctional institutions account of the
correctional institutions building fund to an account or accounts of the
correctional institutions building fund of any institution or facility
under the jurisdiction of the secretary of corrections to be expended
during fiscal year 2026 by the institution or facility for capital
improvement projects and for security improvement projects, including
acquisition of security equipment.
(c) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
institutions building fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for
the capital improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Capital improvements –
rehabilitation and repair of juvenile
correctional facilities (521-00-8100-8000)................................$913,619
Provided, That the secretary of corrections is hereby authorized to
transfer moneys during fiscal year 2026 from the capital improvements
– rehabilitation and repair account of the state institutions building fund
to any account or accounts of the state institutions building fund of any
juvenile correctional facility or institution under the general supervision
and management of the secretary of corrections to be expended during
fiscal year 2026 for capital improvement projects approved by the
secretary: Provided further, That the secretary of corrections shall
certify each such transfer to the director of accounts and reports and
shall transmit a copy of each such certification to the director of the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 276
budget and the director of legislative research.
(d) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
Correctional facility
infrastructure project (521-00-2834)...........................................No limit
Correctional industries fund capital unit (522-00-6126-7301)....No limit
Sec. 184.
ATTORNEY GENERAL –
KANSAS BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
(a) On the effective date of this act, the $3,050,000 appropriated
for the above agency for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, by
section 174(a) of chapter 88 of the 2024 Session Laws of Kansas in the
regional crime center laboratory debt service account is hereby lapsed.
Sec. 185.
ATTORNEY GENERAL –
KANSAS BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital
improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and
repair projects (083-00-1000-0100)...........................................$300,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and
repair projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the moneys appropriated from the
state general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal
year 2026 and 2027, as authorized by this or other appropriation act of
the 2025 or 2026 regular session of the legislature, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from moneys appropriated from the state
general fund or from any special revenue fund or funds for fiscal year
2026 and 2027 to provide for the issuance of up to 30-year bonds by
the Kansas development finance authority in accordance with K.S.A.
74-8905, and amendments thereto, for a capital improvement project to
design, construct, renovate and equip a KBI headquarters in downtown
Topeka, Kansas, including the purchase of real property for such KBI
headquarters: Provided, That such capital improvement project is
hereby approved for the above agency for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-
8905(b), and amendments thereto, and the authorization of the issuance
of bonds by the Kansas development finance authority in accordance
with such statute: Provided further, That the above agency may make
expenditures from the moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds for such capital improvement project: Provided, however, That
expenditures from the moneys received from the issuance of any such
bonds for such capital improvement project shall not exceed
$80,000,000 plus all amounts required for costs of bond issuance, costs
of interest on the bonds issued for such capital improvement project
during the construction and renovation of such project and, for a period
of not more than one year following completion of such project, credit
enhancement costs and any required reserves for the payment of
principal and interest on the bonds: And provided further, That all
moneys received from the issuance of any such bonds shall be
deposited and accounted for as prescribed by applicable bond
covenants: And provided further, That debt service for any such bonds
for such capital improvement project shall be financed by
appropriations from the state general fund or any appropriate special

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 277
revenue fund or funds: And provided further, That any such bonds and
interest thereon shall be an obligation only of the Kansas development
finance authority, shall not constitute a debt of the state of Kansas
within the meaning of section 6 or 7 of article 11 of the constitution of
the state of Kansas and shall not pledge the full faith and credit or the
taxing power of the state of Kansas: And provided further, That the
above agency shall make provisions for the maintenance of the KBI
headquarters: Provided, however, That prior to the issuance of such
bonds, the above agency shall advise and consult with the joint
committee on state building construction on such KBI headquarters:
And provided however, That the issuance of such bonds shall be subject
to approval by the state finance council acting on this matter, which is
hereby characterized as a matter of legislative delegation and subject to
the guidelines prescribed in K.S.A. 75-3711c(c), and amendments
thereto, except that such approval also may be given when the
legislature is in session: And provided further, That the above agency
shall certify to the state finance council that the above agency pursued
tax credits for any real property for such headquarters.
Sec. 186.
KANSAS HIGHWAY PATROL
(a) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made from the highway patrol training center fund for fiscal year
2025, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
highway patrol training center fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair – training
center – Salina (280-00-2306-2004)............................................No limit
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $500,000
shall be made by the above agency from such fund during fiscal year
2025 for repairs to facilities at the Salina training academy.
(b) On the effective date of this act, or as soon thereafter as
moneys are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$500,000 from the state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the
department of transportation to the rehabilitation and repair – training
center – Salina fund (280-00-2306-2004) of the Kansas highway patrol.
Sec. 187.
KANSAS HIGHWAY PATROL
(a) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made from the highway patrol training center fund for fiscal year
2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
highway patrol training center fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Rehabilitation and repair – training
center – Salina (280-00-2306-2004)............................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the highway patrol training center fund for fiscal year 2026.
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made from the vehicle identification number fee fund (280-00-2213)
for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency
from the vehicle identification number fee fund for fiscal year 2026 for
the following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Training academy rehabilitation
and repair (280-00-2213-2401)...................................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 278
the vehicle identification number fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
(c) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made from the Kansas highway patrol operations fund for fiscal year
2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the Kansas
highway patrol operations fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following
capital improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure
limitations prescribed therefor:
Scale replacement and rehabilitation and
repair of buildings (280-00-2034-1115)..................................$1,582,860
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the Kansas highway patrol operations fund for fiscal year 2026.
(d) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the Kansas highway patrol
operations fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from each such special revenue fund for fiscal year 2026
from the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in each existing
capital improvement account of each such special revenue fund:
Provided, That expenditures from the unencumbered balance of any
such existing capital improvement account shall not exceed the amount
of the unencumbered balance in such account on June 30, 2026:
Provided further, That all expenditures from the unencumbered balance
of any such account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitation
imposed on each such special revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 and
shall be in addition to any other expenditure limitation imposed on any
such account of each such special revenue fund for fiscal year 2026.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $1,582,860 from the
state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation to the scale replacement and rehabilitation and
repair of buildings account of the Kansas highway patrol operations
fund (280-00-2034-1115). In addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made from the state highway fund during fiscal
year 2026 and notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 68-416, and
amendments thereto, or any other statute, transfers and expenditures
may be made from the state highway fund during fiscal year 2026 for
support and maintenance of the Kansas highway patrol.
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the KHP federal forfeiture – federal
fund (280-00-3545) for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by
the above agency from the following account or accounts of the KHP
federal forfeiture – federal fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following
capital improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure
limitations prescribed therefor:
Troop F storage building (280-00-3545-3545)............................No limit
Training academy rehabilitation
and repair (280-00-3545-3548)...................................................No limit
KHP federal forfeiture – new construction..................................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the KHP federal forfeiture – federal fund for fiscal year 2026.
(g) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
American rescue plan state relief fund (280-00-3756) ………..No limit
Provided, That expenditures in an amount of not less than $24,000,000
shall be made by the above agency from such fund during fiscal year
2026 to provide for the relocation of the Kansas highway patrol central

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 279
dispatch facilities.
(h) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in addition to the
other purposes for which the above agency may make expenditures
from moneys appropriated from any special revenue fund or funds, as
authorized by this or any other appropriation act of the 2025 regular
session of the legislature, the above agency may make expenditures
from such moneys for the purpose of paying the expenses incurred by
the above agency in the preparation and execution of a lease agreement
authorized by this subsection: Provided, That notwithstanding the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-3765b, and amendments thereto, or any other
statute, the above agency is authorized to enter into a lease agreement
with a third-party entity pursuant to which such third-party entity will
design, construct and equip for the above agency a hangar facility at the
Colonel James Jabara Airport in Wichita, Kansas.
(i) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $24,000,000 from the
American rescue plan – state fiscal relief – federal fund (252-00-3756)
of the governor's department to the American rescue plan state relief
fund (280-00-3756) of the Kansas highway patrol: Provided, however,
That, if sufficient funds are not available to cover such transfer, the
superintendent shall certify the amount of such insufficient funds to the
director of accounts and reports: Provided further, That, upon receipt of
such certification, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
such certified amount from the state general fund to the American
rescue plan state relief fund (280-00-3756) of the Kansas highway
patrol: And provided further, That the superintendent shall transmit a
copy of such certification to the director of the budget and the director
of legislative research.
Sec. 188.
KANSAS HIGHWAY PATROL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Aircraft fund – on budget (280-00-2368-2360)...........................No limit
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency from
such fund during fiscal year 2027 to provide for a lease of a hangar
facility at the Colonel James Jabara Airport in Wichita, Kansas.
(b) On July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $650,000 from the
state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation to the aircraft fund – on budget (280-00-2368-2360) of
the Kansas highway patrol.
Sec. 189.
ADJUTANT GENERAL
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital
improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Rehabilitation and
repair projects (034-00-1000-8000)........................................$3,500,000
Provided, That any unencumbered balance in the rehabilitation and
repair projects account in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, is hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026.
Any unencumbered balance in excess of $100 as June 30, 2025, in the
following accounts are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026:
Hays armory (034-00-1000-8040); SDB remodel (034-00-1000-8030);
deferred maintenance (034-00-1000-0700).
Sec. 190.
STATE FAIR BOARD

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 280
(a) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts of the
state general fund for the above agency in excess of $100 as of June 30,
2025, are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: Bison arena
renovation (373-00-1000-8105), and state fair facilities upgrades (373-
00-1000-8110).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures other than refunds authorized
by law shall not exceed the following:
State fair capital
improvements fund (373-00-2533-2500)....................................No limit
(c) On or before the 10th day of each month during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
from the state general fund to the state fair capital improvements fund
interest earnings based on: (1) The average daily balance of moneys in
the state fair capital improvements fund for the preceding month; and
(2) the net earnings rate for the pooled money investment portfolio for
the preceding month.
Sec. 191.
STATE FAIR BOARD
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state
general fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the capital
improvement project or projects specified, the following:
Expo center rehabilitation debt service......................................$365,152
Provided, That expenditures shall be made by the above agency, in
consultation with the Kansas development finance authority, from such
account during fiscal year 2026 to pay off the outstanding debt service
obligations for the Series 2021J revenue bonds issued for the Expo
center rehabilitation project: Provided, however, That the above agency
shall make expenditures for such purpose only if the revenue bonds
issued for the Expo center rehabilitation project are determined by the
above agency, in consultation with the Kansas development finance
authority, to be eligible for prepayment during fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 192.
KANSAS DEPARTMENT OF
WILDLIFE AND PARKS
(a) Any unencumbered balance in the following accounts of the
state general fund in excess of $100 as of June 30, 2025, are hereby
reappropriated for fiscal year 2026: El Dorado shower house (710-00-
1000), flint hills trail system (710-00-1000), state parks operating
expenditures (710-00-1900-1920).
(b) There is appropriated for the above agency from the following
special revenue fund or funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
all moneys now or hereafter lawfully credited to and available in such
fund or funds, except that expenditures shall not exceed the following:
Bridge maintenance fund (710-00-2045-2070)...........................No limit
Department access road fund (710-00-2178-2760).....................No limit
Provided, That, in addition to the other purposes for which
expenditures may be made by the above agency from the department
access road fund, expenditures may be made from this fund for road
improvement projects administered by the department of transportation
in state parks and on public lands.
Office of the secretary building fund (710-00-2253)..................No limit
(c) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $3,400,000 from the
state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation to the department access road fund (710-00-2178-2760)
of the Kansas department of wildlife and parks.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 281
(d) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $200,000 from the
state highway fund (276-00-4100-4100) of the department of
transportation to the bridge maintenance fund (710-00-2045-2070) of
the Kansas department of wildlife and parks.
(e) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the state agricultural production
fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above
agency from the following capital improvement account or accounts of
the state agricultural production fund for fiscal year 2026 for the
following capital improvement project or projects, subject to the
expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Agricultural land capital improvement (710-00-2050)................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the state agricultural production fund for fiscal year 2026.
(f) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the parks fee fund for fiscal year
2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
following capital improvement account or accounts of the parks fee
fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital improvement project
or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Parks rehabilitation and
repair projects (710-00-2122-2066)........................................$1,289,225
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the parks fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
(g) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the boating fee fund for fiscal year
2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
following capital improvement account or accounts of the boating fee
fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital improvement project
or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
River access (710-00-2245-2830).........................................................$0
Coast guard boating projects (710-00-2245-2840)...............................$0
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the boating fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
(h) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the wildlife fee fund for fiscal year
2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
following capital improvement account or accounts of the wildlife fee
fund during fiscal year 2026 for the following capital improvement
project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed
therefor:
Shooting range development (710-00-2300-2301)....................$284,250
Coast guard boating projects (710-00-2300-3000)....................$100,000
Land acquisition (710-00-2300-3040).......................................$400,000
Rehabilitation and repair (710-00-2300-3262).......................$3,459,167
State fishing lakes projects (710-00-2300-4320)..................................$0
Federally mandated
boating access (710-00-2300-4360)...........................................$573,000
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the wildlife fee fund for fiscal year 2026.
(i) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the cabin revenue fund for fiscal
year 2026, expenditures may be made by the above agency from the
following capital improvement account or accounts of the cabin

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 282
revenue fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital
improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations
prescribed therefor:
Cabin site preparation (710-00-2668-2670)...............................$428,712
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the cabin revenue fund for fiscal year 2026.
(j) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the migratory waterfowl
propagation and protection fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the following capital improvement
account or accounts of the migratory waterfowl propagation and
protection fund for fiscal year 2026 for the following capital
improvement project or projects, subject to the expenditure limitations
prescribed therefor:
Wetlands acquisition (710-00-2600-3330).................................$775,000
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the migratory waterfowl propagation and protection fund for fiscal year
2026.
(k) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the boating safety and financial
assistance fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be made by the
above agency from the following capital improvement account or
accounts of the boating safety and financial assistance fund for fiscal
year 2026 for the following capital improvement project or projects,
subject to the expenditure limitations prescribed therefor:
Coast guard boating projects (710-00-3251-3251)......................No limit
Provided, That all expenditures from each such capital improvement
account shall be in addition to any expenditure limitations imposed on
the boating safety and financial assistance fund for fiscal year 2026.
(l) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by the above agency from the parks fee fund, boating fee fund,
boating safety and financial assistance fund, wildlife fee fund, wildlife
conservation fund, cabin revenue fund, wildlife restoration fund, sport
fish restoration program fund, migratory waterfowl propagation and
protection fund, nongame wildlife improvement fund, plant and animal
disease and pest control fund, land and water conservation fund – local,
outdoor recreation acquisition, development and planning fund,
recreational trails program fund, federally licensed wildlife areas fund,
department of wildlife and parks gifts and donations fund, highway
planning/construction fund, state wildlife grants fund, disaster grants –
public assistance, nonfederal grants fund, bridge maintenance fund,
state agricultural production fund, department access road fund,
wildlife restoration fund, state agricultural production fund, highway
planning and construction fund, American rescue plan state relief fund,
navigation projects fund, other federal grants fund and recreation
resource management fund for fiscal year 2026, expenditures may be
made by the above agency from each such special revenue fund for
fiscal year 2026 from the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in
each existing capital improvement account of each such special revenue
fund: Provided, That expenditures from the unencumbered balance of
any such existing capital improvement account shall not exceed the
amount of the unencumbered balance in such account on June 30,
2026: Provided further, That all expenditures from the unencumbered
balance of any such account shall be in addition to any expenditure
limitation imposed on each such special revenue fund for fiscal year
2026 and shall be in addition to any other expenditure limitation
imposed on any such account of each such special revenue fund for

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 283
fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 193. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 2-223 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 2-223. (a) There is hereby established in the state treasury the
state fair capital improvements fund. All expenditures of moneys in the
state fair capital improvements fund shall be used for the payment of
capital improvements and maintenance for the state fairgrounds and the
payment of capital improvement obligations that have been financed.
Capital improvement projects for the Kansas state fairgrounds are
hereby approved for the purposes of K.S.A. 74-8905(b), and
amendments thereto, and the authorization of the issuance of bonds by
the Kansas development finance authority in accordance with that
statute.
(b) Except as provided further, on each June 30, the state fair
board shall certify to the director of accounts and reports an amount to
be transferred from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital
improvements fund, which amount shall be not less than the amount
equal to 5% of the total gross receipts during the current fiscal year
from state fair activities and non-fair days activities. For the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2024 2025, notwithstanding the other provisions of this
section, on March 1, 2024 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are
available therefor, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital improvements fund
the amount equal to the greater of $300,000 or the amount equal to 5%
of the total gross receipts during fiscal year 2024 2025 from state fair
activities and non-fair days activities through March 1, 2024 2025,
except that, subject to approval by the director of the budget prior to
March 1, 2024 2025, after reviewing the amounts credited to the state
fair fee fund and the state fair capital improvements fund, cash flow
considerations for the state fair fee fund, and the amount required to be
credited to the state fair capital improvements fund pursuant to this
subsection to pay the bonded debt service payment due on April 1,
2024 2025, the state fair board may certify an amount on March 1,
2024 2025, to the director of accounts and reports to be transferred
from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital improvements fund
that is equal to the amount required to be credited to the state fair
capital improvements fund pursuant to this subsection to pay the
bonded debt service payment due on April 1, 2024 2025, and shall
certify to the director of accounts and reports on the date specified by
the director of the budget the amount equal to the balance of the
aggregate amount that is required to be transferred from the state fair
fee fund to the state fair capital improvements fund for fiscal year 2024
2025. Upon receipt of any such certification, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer moneys from the state fair fee fund to the state
fair capital improvements fund in accordance with such certification.
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026, notwithstanding the
other provisions of this section, on March 1, 2025 2026, or as soon
thereafter as moneys are available therefor, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital
improvements fund the amount equal to the greater of $300,000 or the
amount equal to 5% of the total gross receipts during fiscal year 2025
2026 from state fair activities and non-fair days activities through
March 1, 2025 2026, except that, subject to approval by the director of
the budget prior to March 1, 2025 2026, after reviewing the amounts
credited to the state fair fee fund and the state fair capital improvements
fund, cash flow considerations for the state fair fee fund, and the
amount required to be credited to the state fair capital improvements
fund pursuant to this subsection to pay the bonded debt service
payment due on April 1, 2025 2026, the state fair board may certify an
amount on March 1, 2025 2026, to the director of accounts and reports

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 284
to be transferred from the state fair fee fund to the state fair capital
improvements fund that is equal to the amount required to be credited
to the state fair capital improvements fund pursuant to this subsection
to pay the bonded debt service payment due on April 1, 2025 2026, and
shall certify to the director of accounts and reports on the date specified
by the director of the budget the amount equal to the balance of the
aggregate amount that is required to be transferred from the state fair
fee fund to the state fair capital improvements fund for fiscal year 2025
2026. Upon receipt of any such certification, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer moneys from the state fair fee fund to the state
fair capital improvements fund in accordance with such certification.
Sec. 194. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-1775a is hereby amended to read
as follows: 12-1775a. (a) Prior to December 31, 1996, the governing
body of each city that, pursuant to K.S.A. 12-1771, and amendments
thereto, has established a redevelopment district prior to July 1, 1996,
shall certify to the director of accounts and reports the amount equal to
the amount of revenue realized from ad valorem taxes imposed
pursuant to K.S.A. 72-5142, and amendments thereto, within such
redevelopment district. Except as provided further, to February 1, 1997,
and annually on that date thereafter, the governing body of each such
city shall certify to the director of accounts and reports an amount equal
to the amount by which revenues realized from such ad valorem taxes
imposed in such redevelopment district are estimated to be reduced for
the ensuing calendar year due to legislative changes in the statewide
school finance formula. Prior to March 1 of each year, the director of
accounts and reports shall certify to the state treasurer each amount
certified by the governing bodies of cities under this section for the
ensuing calendar year and shall transfer from the state general fund to
the city tax increment financing revenue replacement fund the
aggregate of all amounts so certified. Prior to April 15 of each year, the
state treasurer shall pay from the city tax increment financing revenue
replacement fund to each city certifying an amount to the director of
accounts and reports under this section for the ensuing calendar year
the amount so certified. During fiscal years 2024, 2025 and, 2026 and
2027, no moneys shall be transferred from the state general fund to the
city tax increment financing revenue replacement fund pursuant to this
subsection.
(b) There is hereby created the tax increment financing revenue
replacement fund, which shall be administered by the state treasurer.
All expenditures from the tax increment financing revenue replacement
fund shall be made in accordance with appropriations acts upon
warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to
vouchers approved by the state treasurer or a person or persons
designated by the state treasurer.
Sec. 195. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-5256 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 12-5256. (a) All expenditures from the state housing trust
fund made for the purposes of K.S.A. 12-5253 through 12-5255, and
amendments thereto, shall be made in accordance with appropriation
acts upon warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued
pursuant to vouchers approved by the president of the Kansas housing
resources corporation.
(b) (1) On July 1, 2023, July 1, 2024, and July 1, 2025 July 1,
2026, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $2,000,000
from the state economic development initiatives fund to the state
housing trust fund established by K.S.A. 74-8959, and amendments
thereto.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 74-8959, and
amendments thereto, to the contrary, during fiscal year 2024, fiscal year
2025 and, fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, moneys in the state

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 285
housing trust fund shall be used solely for the purpose of loans or
grants to cities or counties for infrastructure or housing development in
rural areas. During such fiscal years, on or before January 13, 2025,
January 12, 2026, and January 11, 2027, and January 10, 2028, the
president of the Kansas housing resources corporation shall submit a
report concerning the activities of the state housing trust fund to the
house of representatives committee on appropriations and the senate
committee on ways and means.
Sec. 196. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-180 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 65-180. The secretary of health and environment shall:
(a) Institute and carry on an intensive educational program among
physicians, hospitals, public health nurses and the public concerning
congenital hypothyroidism, galactosemia, phenylketonuria and other
genetic diseases detectable with the same specimen. This educational
program shall include information about the nature of such conditions
and examinations for the detection thereof in early infancy in order that
measures may be taken to prevent intellectual disability or morbidity
resulting from such conditions.
(b) Provide recognized screening tests for phenylketonuria,
galactosemia, hypothyroidism and such other diseases as may be
appropriately detected with the same specimen. The initial laboratory
screening tests for these diseases shall be performed by the department
of health and environment or its designee for all infants born in the
state. Such services shall be performed without charge.
(c) Provide a follow-up program by providing test results and
other information to identified physicians; locate infants with abnormal
newborn screening test results; with parental consent, monitor infants
to assure appropriate testing to either confirm or not confirm the
disease suggested by the screening test results; with parental consent,
monitor therapy and treatment for infants with confirmed diagnosis of
congenital hypothyroidism, galactosemia, phenylketonuria or other
genetic diseases being screened under this statute; and establish
ongoing education and support activities for individuals with confirmed
diagnosis of congenital hypothyroidism, galactosemia, phenylketonuria
and other genetic diseases being screened under this statute and for the
families of such individuals.
(d) Maintain a registry of cases including information of
importance for the purpose of follow-up services to prevent intellectual
disability or morbidity.
(e) Provide, within the limits of appropriations available therefor,
the necessary treatment product for diagnosed cases for as long as
medically indicated, when the product is not available through other
state agencies. In addition to diagnosed cases under this section,
diagnosed cases of maple syrup urine disease shall be included as a
diagnosed case under this subsection. Where the applicable income of
the person or persons who have legal responsibility for the diagnosed
individual meets medicaid eligibility, such individuals' needs shall be
covered under the medicaid state plan. Where the applicable income of
the person or persons who have legal responsibility for the diagnosed
individual is not medicaid eligible, but is below 300% of the federal
poverty level established under the most recent poverty guidelines
issued by the United States department of health and human services,
the department of health and environment shall provide reimbursement
of between 50% to 100% of the product cost in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted by the secretary of health and environment.
Where the applicable income of the person or persons who have legal
responsibility for the diagnosed individual exceeds 300% of the federal
poverty level established under the most recent poverty guidelines
issued by the United States department of health and human services,

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 286
the department of health and environment shall provide reimbursement
of an amount not to exceed 50% of the product cost in accordance with
rules and regulations adopted by the secretary of health and
environment.
(f) Provide state assistance to an applicant pursuant to subsection
(e) only after it has been shown that the applicant has exhausted all
benefits from private third-party payers, medicare, medicaid and other
government assistance programs and after consideration of the
applicant's income and assets. The secretary of health and environment
shall adopt rules and regulations establishing standards for determining
eligibility for state assistance under this section.
(g) (1) Except for treatment products provided under subsection
(e), if the medically necessary food treatment product for diagnosed
cases must be purchased, the purchaser shall be reimbursed by the
department of health and environment for costs incurred up to $1,500
per year per diagnosed child age 18 or younger at 100% of the product
cost upon submission of a receipt of purchase identifying the company
from which the product was purchased. For a purchaser to be eligible
for reimbursement under this subsection, the applicable income of the
person or persons who have legal responsibility for the diagnosed child
shall not exceed 300% of the poverty level established under the most
recent poverty guidelines issued by the federal department of health
and human services.
(2) As an option to reimbursement authorized under subsection (g)
(1), the department of health and environment may purchase food
treatment products for distribution to diagnosed children in an amount
not to exceed $1,500 per year per diagnosed child age 18 or younger.
For a diagnosed child to be eligible for the distribution of food
treatment products under this subsection, the applicable income of the
person or persons who have legal responsibility for the diagnosed child
shall not exceed 300% of the poverty level established under the most
recent poverty guidelines issued by the federal department of health
and human services.
(3) In addition to diagnosed cases under this section, diagnosed
cases of maple syrup urine disease shall be included as a diagnosed
case under this subsection.
(h) The department of health and environment shall continue to
receive orders for both necessary treatment products and necessary
food treatment products, purchase such products, and shall deliver the
products to an address prescribed by the diagnosed individual. The
department of health and environment shall bill the person or persons
who have legal responsibility for the diagnosed patient for a pro-rata
share of the total costs, in accordance with the rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to this section.
(i) The secretary of health and environment shall adopt rules and
regulations as needed to require, to the extent of available funding,
newborn screening tests to screen for treatable disorders listed in the
core uniform panel of newborn screening conditions recommended in
the 2005 report by the American college of medical genetics entitled
"Newborn Screening: Toward a Uniform Screening Panel and System"
or another report determined by the department of health and
environment to provide more appropriate newborn screening guidelines
to protect the health and welfare of newborns for treatable disorders.
(j) In performing the duties under subsection (i), the secretary of
health and environment shall appoint an advisory council to advise the
department of health and environment on implementation of subsection
(i).
(k) The department of health and environment shall periodically
review the newborn screening program to determine the efficacy and

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 287
cost effectiveness of the program and determine whether adjustments to
the program are necessary to protect the health and welfare of
newborns and to maximize the number of newborn screenings that may
be conducted with the funding available for the screening program.
(l) There is hereby established in the state treasury the Kansas
newborn screening fund that shall be administered by the secretary of
health and environment. All expenditures from the fund shall be for the
newborn screening program. All expenditures from the fund shall be
made in accordance with appropriation acts upon warrants of the
director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved
by the secretary of health and environment or the secretary's designee.
On July 1 of each year, the director of accounts and reports shall
determine the amount credited to the medical assistance fee fund
pursuant to K.S.A. 40-3213, and amendments thereto, and shall transfer
the estimated portion of such amount that is necessary to fund the
newborn screening program for the ensuing fiscal year as certified by
the secretary of health and environment or the secretary's designee to
the Kansas newborn screening fund. Such amount shall not exceed
$5,000,000 in fiscal years 2024, 2025 and, 2026 and 2027.
Sec. 197. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-50,107 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 74-50,107. (a) Commencing on July 1, 2021, and on the
first day of each month thereafter during fiscal year 2024, fiscal year
2025 and, fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the secretary of
revenue shall apply a rate of 2% to that portion of moneys withheld
from the wages of individuals and collected under the Kansas
withholding and declaration of estimated tax act, K.S.A. 79-3294 et
seq., and amendments thereto. The amount so determined shall be
credited on a monthly basis as follows: (1) An amount necessary to
meet obligations of the debt services for the IMPACT program
repayment fund; (2) an amount to the IMPACT program services fund
as needed for program administration; and (3) any remaining amounts
to the job creation program fund created pursuant to K.S.A. 74-50,224,
and amendments thereto. During fiscal year 2024, fiscal year 2025 and,
fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the aggregate amount that is
credited to the job creation program fund pursuant to this subsection
shall not exceed $20,000,000 for each such fiscal year.
(b) Commencing on July 1, 2026 2027, and on an annual basis
thereafter, the secretary of revenue shall estimate the amount equal to
the amount of net savings realized from the elimination, modification
or limitation of any credit, deduction or program pursuant to the
provisions of this act as compared to the expense deduction provided
for in K.S.A. 79-32,143a, and amendments thereto. Whereupon such
amount of savings in accordance with appropriation acts shall be
remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such
remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount to the
credit of the job creation program fund created pursuant to K.S.A. 74-
50,224, and amendments thereto. In addition, such other amount or
amounts of money may be transferred from the state general fund or
any other fund or funds in the state treasury to the job creation program
fund in accordance with appropriation acts.
Sec. 198. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-8711 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 74-8711. (a) There is hereby established in the state treasury
the lottery operating fund.
(b) Except as provided by K.S.A. 74-8724 and the Kansas
expanded lottery act, and amendments thereto, the executive director
shall remit all moneys collected from the sale of lottery tickets and
shares and any other moneys received by or on behalf of the Kansas
lottery to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 288
75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such
remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the
state treasury to the credit of the lottery operating fund. Moneys
credited to the fund shall be expended or transferred only as provided
by this act. Expenditures from such fund shall be made in accordance
with appropriations acts upon warrants of the director of accounts and
reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the executive director
or by a person designated by the executive director.
(c) Moneys in the lottery operating fund shall be used for:
(1) The payment of expenses of the lottery, which shall include all
costs incurred in the operation and administration of the Kansas lottery;
all costs resulting from contracts entered into for the purchase or lease
of goods and services needed for operation of the lottery, including but
not limited to supplies, materials, tickets, independent studies and
surveys, data transmission, advertising, printing, promotion, incentives,
public relations, communications and distribution of tickets and shares;
and reimbursement of costs of facilities and services provided by other
state agencies;
(2) the payment of compensation to lottery retailers;
(3) transfers of moneys to the lottery prize payment fund pursuant
to K.S.A. 74-8712, and amendments thereto;
(4) transfers to the state general fund pursuant to K.S.A. 74-8713,
and amendments thereto;
(5) transfers to the community crisis stabilization centers fund and
clubhouse model program fund of the Kansas department for aging and
disability services pursuant to subsection (e);
(6) transfers to the state gaming revenues fund pursuant to
subsection (d) and as otherwise provided by law;
(7) transfers to the white collar crime fund of the governor
pursuant to subsection (f);
(8) transfers to the problem gambling and addictions grant fund of
the department for aging and disability services pursuant to subsection
(g);
(9) transfers to the attracting professional sports to Kansas fund of
the department of commerce pursuant to subsection (h); and
(10) transfers to the county reappraisal fund as prescribed by law.
(d) The director of accounts and reports shall transfer moneys in
the lottery operating fund to the state gaming revenues fund created by
K.S.A. 79-4801, and amendments thereto, on or before the 15th day of
each month in an amount certified monthly by the executive director
and determined as follows, whichever is greater:
(1) An amount equal to the moneys in the lottery operating fund in
excess of those needed for the purposes described in subsections (c)(1)
through (c)(6); or
(2) except for pull-tab lottery tickets and shares, an amount equal
to not less than 30% of total monthly revenues from the sales of lottery
tickets and shares less estimated returned tickets. In the case of pull-tab
lottery tickets and shares, an amount equal to not less than 20% of the
total monthly revenues from the sales of pull-tab lottery tickets and
shares less estimated returned tickets.
(e) (1) Subject to the limitations set forth in paragraph (2) and the
provisions of paragraph (3), commencing in fiscal year 2020, on or
before the 10th day of each month, the director of the lottery shall
certify to the director of accounts and reports all net profits from the
sale of lottery tickets and shares via lottery ticket vending machines. Of
such certified amount, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
75% from the lottery operating fund to the community crisis
stabilization centers fund of the Kansas department for aging and
disability services and 25% from the lottery operating fund to the

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 289
clubhouse model program fund of the Kansas department for aging and
disability services.
(2) Moneys transferred pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not exceed
in the aggregate $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2024, shall not exceed in the
aggregate $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2025, and shall not exceed in the
aggregate $8,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 2027 and each fiscal year
thereafter.
(3) During fiscal year 2026, on or before the 15th day of each
month, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $625,000
from the lottery operating fund to the community crisis stabilization
centers fund of the Kansas department for aging and disability services
and $208,333 from the lottery operating fund to the clubhouse model
program fund of the Kansas department for aging and disability
services.
(f) On July 1, 2023, and each July 1 thereafter, or as soon
thereafter as moneys are available, the first $750,000 credited to the
lottery operating fund from sports wagering revenues deposited in the
lottery operating fund shall be transferred by the director of accounts
and reports from the lottery operating fund to the white collar crime
fund established in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-8792, and amendments
thereto.
(g) On July 1, 2023, and each July 1 thereafter, or as soon
thereafter as moneys are available, after the transfer required under
subsection (f) has been made, 2% of the remaining moneys credited to
the lottery operating fund from sports wagering revenues deposited in
the lottery operating fund shall be transferred by the director of
accounts and reports from the lottery operating fund to the problem
gambling and addictions grant fund established in K.S.A. 79-4805, and
amendments thereto.
(h) On July 1, 2023, and each July 1 thereafter, or as soon
thereafter as moneys are available, after the transfer required under
subsection (f) has been made, 80% of the remaining moneys credited to
the lottery operating fund from sports wagering revenues deposited in
the lottery operating fund shall be transferred by the director of
accounts and reports from the lottery operating fund to the attracting
professional sports to Kansas fund established in K.S.A. 2024 Supp.
74-8793, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 199. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-99b34 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 74-99b34. (a) The bioscience development and investment
fund is hereby created. The bioscience development and investment
fund shall not be a part of the state treasury and the funds in the
bioscience development and investment fund shall belong exclusively
to the authority.
(b) Distributions from the bioscience development and investment
fund shall be for the exclusive benefit of the authority, under the control
of the board and used to fulfill the purpose, powers and duties of the
authority pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 74-99b01 et seq., and
amendments thereto.
(c) The secretary of revenue and the authority shall establish the
base year taxation for all bioscience companies and state universities.
The secretary of revenue, the authority and the board of regents shall
establish the number of bioscience employees associated with state
universities and report annually and determine the increase from the
taxation base annually. The secretary of revenue and the authority may
consider any verifiable evidence, including, but not limited to, the
NAICS code assigned or recorded by the department of labor for
companies with employees in Kansas, when determining which
companies should be classified as bioscience companies.
(d) (1) Except as provided in subsection (h), for a period of 15

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 290
years from the effective date of this act, the state treasurer shall pay
annually 95% of withholding above the base, as certified by the
secretary of revenue, upon Kansas wages paid by bioscience employees
to the bioscience development and investment fund. Such payments
shall be reconciled annually. On or before the 10th day of each month,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state general
fund to the bioscience development and investment fund interest
earnings based on:
(A) The average daily balance of moneys in the bioscience
development and investment fund for the preceding month; and
(B) the net earnings rate of the pooled money investment portfolio
for the preceding month.
(2) There is hereby established in the state treasury the center of
innovation for biomaterials in orthopaedic research – Wichita state
university fund, which shall be administered by Wichita state
university. All moneys credited to the fund shall be used for research
and development. All expenditures from the center of innovation for
biomaterials in orthopaedic research – Wichita state university fund
shall be made in accordance with appropriation acts and upon warrants
of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to expenditures
approved by the president of Wichita state university or by the person
or persons designated by the president of Wichita state university.
(3) There is hereby established in the state treasury the national
bio agro-defense facility fund, which shall be administered by Kansas
state university in accordance with the strategic plan adopted by the
governor's national bio agro-defense facility steering committee. All
moneys credited to the fund shall be used in accordance with the
governor's national bio agro-defense facility steering committee's plan
with the approval of the president of Kansas state university. All
expenditures from the national bio agro-defense facility fund shall be
made in accordance with appropriation acts and upon warrants of the
director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to expenditures
approved by the steering committee and the president of Kansas state
university or by the person or persons designated by the president of
Kansas state university.
(e) The cumulative amounts of funds paid by the state treasurer to
the bioscience development and investment fund shall not exceed
$581,800,000.
(f) The division of post audit is hereby authorized to conduct a
post audit in accordance with the provisions of the legislative post audit
act, K.S.A. 46-1106 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(g) At the direction of the authority, the fund may be held in the
custody of and invested by the state treasurer, provided that the
bioscience development and investment fund shall at all times be
accounted for in a separate report from all other funds of the authority
and the state.
(h) During fiscal years 2024, 2025 and, 2026 and 2027, no
moneys shall be transferred from the state general fund to the
bioscience development and investment fund pursuant to subsection (d)
(1).
Sec. 200. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-775 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 76-775. (a) Subject to the other provisions of this act, on the
first day of the first state fiscal year commencing after receiving a
certification of receipt of a qualifying gift under K.S.A. 76-774, and
amendments thereto, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
from the state general fund the amount determined by the director of
accounts and reports to be the earnings equivalent award for such
qualifying gift for the period of time between the date of certification of
the qualifying gift and the first day of the ensuing state fiscal year to

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 291
either: (1) The endowed professorship account of the faculty of
distinction matching fund of the eligible educational institution, in the
case of a certification of a qualifying gift to an eligible educational
institution that is a state educational institution; or (2) the faculty of
distinction program fund of the state board of regents, in the case of a
certification of a qualifying gift to an eligible institution that is not a
state educational institution. Subject to the other provisions of this act,
on each July 1 thereafter, the director of accounts and reports shall
make such transfer from the state general fund of the earnings
equivalent award for such qualifying gift for the period of the preceding
state fiscal year. All transfers made in accordance with the provisions of
this subsection shall be considered demand transfers from the state
general fund, except that all such transfers during the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, and June 30, 2026, and June 30,
2027, shall be considered to be revenue transfers from the state general
fund.
(b) There is hereby established in the state treasury the faculty of
distinction program fund, which shall be administered by the state
board of regents. All moneys transferred under this section to the
faculty of distinction program fund of the state board of regents shall be
paid to eligible educational institutions that are not state educational
institutions for earnings equivalent awards for qualifying gifts to such
eligible educational institutions. The state board of regents shall pay
from the faculty of distinction program fund the amount of each such
transfer to the eligible educational institution for the earnings
equivalent award for which such transfer was made under this section.
(c) The earnings equivalent award for an endowed professorship
shall be determined by the director of accounts and reports and shall be
the amount of interest earnings that the amount of the qualifying gift
certified by the state board of regents would have earned at the average
net earnings rate of the pooled money investment board portfolio for
the period for which the determination is being made.
(d) The total amount of new qualifying gifts that may be certified
to the director of accounts and reports under this act during any state
fiscal year for all eligible educational institutions shall not exceed
$30,000,000. The total amount of new qualifying gifts that may be
certified to the director of accounts and reports under this act during
any state fiscal year for any individual eligible educational institution
shall not exceed $10,000,000. No additional qualifying gifts shall be
certified by the state board of regents under this act when the total of all
transfers from the state general fund for earnings equivalent awards for
qualifying gifts pursuant to this section, and amendments thereto, for a
fiscal year is equal to or greater than $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2024
2025 and in each fiscal year thereafter.
Sec. 201. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-7,107 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 76-7,107. (a) (1) On July 1, 2008, or as soon thereafter as
sufficient moneys are available, $7,000,000 shall be transferred by the
director of accounts and reports from the state general fund to the
infrastructure maintenance fund established by K.S.A. 76-7,104, and
amendments thereto.
(2) No moneys shall be transferred by the director of accounts and
reports from the state general fund to the infrastructure maintenance
fund established by K.S.A. 76-7,104, and amendments thereto, during
the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, and June 30,
2026, and June 30, 2027, pursuant to this section.
(b) All transfers made in accordance with the provisions of this
section shall be considered to be demand transfers from the state
general fund.
(c) All moneys credited to the infrastructure maintenance fund

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 292
shall be expended or transferred only for the purpose of paying the cost
of projects approved by the state board pursuant to the state educational
institution long-term infrastructure maintenance program.
Sec. 202. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-7,155 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 76-7,155. On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys
are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$7,000,000 from the state general fund to the Kansas campus
restoration fund. On July 1, 2026, July 1, 2027, July 1, 2028, July 1,
2029, and July 1, 2030, or as soon thereafter each such date as moneys
are available, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer
$32,700,000 from the state general fund to the Kansas campus
restoration fund.
Sec. 203. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-7,157 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 76-7,157. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c),
commencing in fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2031, the board of
regents shall distribute in each fiscal year an aggregate amount of
$30,000,000 from the Kansas campus restoration fund to each state
educational institution's deferred maintenance account established
pursuant to K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-7,154, and amendments thereto, in
accordance with the Kansas campus restoration plan developed and
approved pursuant to K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-7,156, and amendments
thereto.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), commencing in fiscal
year 2026 through fiscal year 2031, the board of regents shall credit
$100,000 in each fiscal year from the Kansas campus restoration fund
to each community college, technical college, institute of technology
and municipal university account established pursuant to K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 76-7,154, and amendments thereto.
(c) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if the total
amount transferred to the Kansas campus restoration fund in fiscal
year 2026 is less than $32,700,000, such total amount transferred in
fiscal year 2026 shall be prorated and distributed by the board of
regents among the state educational institutions and each community
college, technical college, institute of technology and municipal
university in proportion to the amount each is eligible to receive under
subsections (a) and (b).
Sec. 204. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-2989 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 79-2989. (a) For calendar years 2023 and 2024 and 2025, if
a county clerk has printing or postage costs pursuant to K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 79-2988, and amendments thereto, the county clerk shall notify
and provide documentation of such costs to the secretary of revenue.
The secretary of revenue shall certify the amount of moneys
attributable to such costs and shall transmit a copy of such certification
to the director of accounts and reports. Upon such receipt of such
certification, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer an
amount of moneys equal to such certified amount from the state general
fund to the taxpayer notification costs fund of the department of
revenue. The secretary of revenue shall transmit a copy of each such
certification to the director of legislative research and the director of the
budget.
(b) There is hereby established in the state treasury the taxpayer
notification costs fund that shall be administered by the secretary of
revenue. All expenditures from the taxpayer notification costs fund
shall be for the purpose of paying county printing and postage costs
pursuant to K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-2988, and amendments thereto. All
expenditures from such fund shall be made in accordance with
appropriations acts upon warrants of the director of accounts and
reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the secretary of
revenue or the secretary's designee.

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 293
Sec. 205. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-3425i is hereby amended to read
as follows: 79-3425i. On January 15 and July 15 of each year, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer a sum equal to the total
taxes collected under the provisions of K.S.A. 79-6a04 and 79-6a10,
and amendments thereto, and annual commercial vehicle fees collected
pursuant to K.S.A. 8-143m, and amendments thereto, and credited to
the state general fund during the six months next preceding the date of
transfer, from the state general fund to the special city and county
highway fund, created by K.S.A. 79-3425, and amendments thereto,
except that: (1) Such transfers are subject to reduction under K.S.A. 75-
6704, and amendments thereto; (2) no moneys shall be transferred from
the state general fund to the special city and county highway fund
during state fiscal year 2024, state fiscal year 2025 or, state fiscal year
2026 or state fiscal year 2027; and (3) all transfers under this section
shall be considered to be demand transfers from the state general fund.
Sec. 206. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-34,171 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 79-34,171. (a) On January 1, 2009, and quarterly thereafter,
the director of accounts and reports shall transfer $400,000 from the
state general fund to the Kansas retail dealer incentive fund, except that
no moneys shall be transferred pursuant to this section from the state
general fund to the Kansas retail dealer incentive fund during the fiscal
years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, or June 30, 2026, or June
30, 2027. On and after July 1, 2009, the unobligated balance in the
Kansas retail dealer incentive fund shall not exceed $1.5 million. If the
unobligated balance of the fund exceeds $1.1 million at the time of a
quarterly transfer, the transfer shall be limited to the amount necessary
for the fund to reach a total of $1.5 million.
(b) There is hereby created in the state treasury the Kansas retail
dealer incentive fund. All moneys in the Kansas retail dealer incentive
fund shall be expended by the secretary of the department of revenue
for the payment of incentives to Kansas retail dealers who sell and
dispense renewable fuels or biodiesel through a motor fuel pump in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 79-34,170 through 79-34,175,
and amendments thereto.
(c) All moneys remaining in the Kansas retail dealer incentive
fund upon the expiration of K.S.A. 79-34,170 through 79-34,175, and
amendments thereto, shall be credited by the state treasurer to the state
general fund.
Sec. 207. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-4804 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 79-4804. (a) After the transfer of moneys pursuant to
K.S.A. 79-4806, and amendments thereto, an amount equal to 85% of
the balance of all moneys credited to the state gaming revenues fund
shall be transferred and credited to the state economic development
initiatives fund. Expenditures from the state economic development
initiatives fund shall be made in accordance with appropriations acts
for the financing of such programs supporting and enhancing the
existing economic foundation of the state and fostering growth through
the expansion of current, and the establishment and attraction of new,
commercial and industrial enterprises as provided by this section and as
may be authorized by law and not less than 1/ of such money shall be
2
distributed equally among the congressional districts of the state.
Except as provided by subsection (g), all moneys credited to the state
economic development initiatives fund shall be credited within the
fund, as provided by law, to an account or accounts of the fund, which
are created by this section, or for state fiscal years 2023, 2024 and
2025, 2026 and 2027 to an account or accounts of the fund created by
appropriation acts.
(b) There is hereby created the Kansas capital formation account
in the state economic development initiatives fund. All moneys credited

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 294
to the Kansas capital formation account shall be used to provide,
encourage and implement capital development and formation in
Kansas.
(c) There is hereby created the Kansas economic development
research and development account in the state economic development
initiatives fund. All moneys credited to the Kansas economic
development research and development account shall be used to
promote, encourage and implement research and development
programs and activities in Kansas and technical assistance funded
through state educational institutions under the supervision and control
of the state board of regents or other Kansas colleges and universities.
(d) There is hereby created the Kansas economic development
endowment account in the state economic development initiatives fund.
All moneys credited to the Kansas economic development endowment
account shall be accumulated and invested as provided in this section to
provide an ongoing source of funds, which shall be used for economic
development activities in Kansas, including, but not limited to,
continuing appropriations or demand transfers for programs and
projects, which shall include, but are not limited to, specific community
infrastructure projects in Kansas that stimulate economic growth.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f), the director of
investments may invest and reinvest moneys credited to the state
economic development initiatives fund in accordance with investment
policies established by the pooled money investment board under
K.S.A. 75-4232, and amendments thereto, in the pooled money
investment portfolio. All moneys received as interest earned by the
investment of the moneys credited to the state economic development
initiatives fund shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to
the Kansas economic development endowment account of such fund.
(f) Moneys credited to the Kansas economic development
endowment account of the state economic development initiatives fund
may be invested in government guaranteed loans and debentures as
provided by law in addition to the investments authorized by subsection
(e) or in lieu of such investments. All moneys received as interest
earned by the investment under this subsection of the moneys credited
to the Kansas economic development endowment account shall be
deposited in the state treasury and credited to the Kansas economic
development endowment account of the state economic development
initiatives fund.
(g) Except as provided further, in each fiscal year, the director of
accounts and reports shall make transfers in equal amounts on July 15
and January 15 that in the aggregate equal $2,000,000 from the state
economic development initiatives fund to the state water plan fund
created by K.S.A. 82a-951, and amendments thereto. During fiscal
year 2026, the aggregate amount transferred from the state economic
development initiatives fund to the state water plan fund shall equal
$2,921,417. No other moneys credited to the state economic
development initiatives fund shall be used for: (1) Water-related
projects or programs, or related technical assistance; or (2) any other
projects or programs, or related technical assistance that meet one or
more of the long-range goals, objectives and considerations set forth in
the state water resource planning act.
Sec. 208. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-955 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 82a-955. (a) On July 1, 2024, the director of accounts and
reports shall transfer $45,000,000 from the state general fund to the
state water plan fund and. On July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $35,000,000 from the
state general fund to the state water plan fund. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide for the transfer of $35,000,000 from the state

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 295
general fund to the state water plan fund on July 1, 2026, and July 1,
2027.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), The state water plan
fund shall continue to be appropriated and expended for the purposes
prescribed in K.S.A. 82a-951, and amendments thereto, except that if
an appropriation is made for any fiscal year as intended in subsection
(a), on July 1 of such fiscal year, 2025, and July 1, 2026, or as soon
thereafter on such dates as moneys are available:
(A) $5,000,000$5,500,000 shall be transferred from the state
water plan fund to the water technical assistance fund established in
K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-956, and amendments thereto; and
(B) $12,000,000$12,500,000 shall be transferred from the state
water plan fund to the water projects grant fund established in K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 82a-957, and amendments thereto.
(2) On July 1, 2024, the director of accounts and reports shall
transfer $7,500,000 from the state water plan fund to the water
technical assistance fund and $19,500,000 from the state water plan
fund to the water projects grant fund.
(3) The provisions of this section shall expire on July 1, 2028. On
July 1, 2028, the director of accounts and reports shall transfer all
moneys in the water technical assistance fund and the water projects
grant fund to the state water plan fund and all liabilities of the water
technical assistance fund and the water projects grant fund shall be
imposed upon the state water plan fund. On July 1, 2028, the water
technical assistance fund and the water projects grant fund shall be
abolished.
(c) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any restrictions in K.S.A. 82a-951,
and amendments thereto, the Kansas water authority may recommend
to the legislature the appropriation of up to 10% of the unencumbered
balance of the state water plan fund to be used to supplement salaries of
existing state agency full-time equivalent employees and for funding
new full-time equivalent positions created to implement the state water
plan. Moneys from such appropriation may be used to supplement
existing positions, but such moneys shall not be used to replace state
general fund moneys, any fee fund moneys or other funding for
positions existing on July 1, 2023.
(B) Eligible full-time equivalent positions that moneys may be
used for pursuant to this paragraph include engineers, geologists,
hydrologists, environmental scientists, attorneys, resource planners,
grant specialists and any other similar positions.
(2) If at least two conservation districts present a joint proposal to
the Kansas water authority for a position or positions to provide shared
services to all districts involved in such proposal, the Kansas water
authority may recommend that moneys be used to supplement the
salary or salaries of such position or positions pursuant to paragraph
(1).
(3) The Kansas water authority shall encourage funding requests
from state and local entities that cooperate with qualified nonprofit
entities on projects that provide a direct benefit to water quantity and
quality, including water infrastructures that are both natural and
constructed, and include matching funds from non-state sources.
(4) The Kansas water authority may direct the Kansas water office
to provide funding pursuant to K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-956 or 82a-957,
and amendments thereto, for the improvement of water infrastructure in
an unincorporated area related to or serving a national park site or state
historic site if the request for funding is made by a nonprofit
organization or state agency that is willing to administer the moneys
and oversee the project, and the Kansas water authority deems such
applicant capable of successfully managing the project. Upon receipt of

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 296
such a request, the Kansas water office may award moneys in any fiscal
year prior to July 1, 2028, with such awarding of moneys to be made at
the discretion of the Kansas water office.
(5) The Kansas water authority shall encourage the creation of
grant programs for stockwatering conservation projects. Such grant
programs shall prioritize the use of fees collected pursuant to K.S.A.
82a-954(a)(3), and amendments thereto.
(d) All reporting requirements established in K.S.A. 82a-951, and
amendments thereto, shall continue and such reporting requirements
shall apply to the water technical assistance fund established in K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 82a-956, and amendments thereto, and the water projects
grant fund established in K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 82a-957, and amendments
thereto.
Sec. 209. If any fund or account name described by words and the
numerical accounting code that follows such fund or account name do
not match, it shall be conclusively presumed that the legislature
intended that the fund or account name described by words is the
correct fund or account name, and such fund or account name described
by words shall control over a contradictory or incorrect numerical
accounting code.
Sec. 210. Severability. If any provision or clause of this act or
application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act
that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
Sec. 211. Appeals to exceed expenditure limitations. (a) Upon
written application to the governor and approval of the state finance
council, expenditures from special revenue funds may exceed the
amounts specified in this act.
(b) This section shall not apply to the expanded lottery act
revenues fund, the state economic development initiatives fund, the
children's initiative fund, the state water plan fund or the Kansas
endowment for youth fund, or to any account of any such funds.
Sec. 212. Savings. (a) Any unencumbered balance as of June 30,
2025, in any special revenue fund, or account thereof, of any state
agency named in this act that is not otherwise specifically appropriated
or limited for fiscal year 2026 by this or any other appropriation act of
the 2025 regular session of the legislature is hereby appropriated for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the same use and purpose as the
same was heretofore appropriated.
(b) This section shall not apply to the expanded lottery act
revenues fund, the state economic development initiatives fund, the
children's initiatives fund, the state water plan fund, the Kansas
endowment for youth fund, the Kansas educational building fund, the
state institutions building fund or the correctional institutions building
fund, or to any account of any of such funds.
Sec. 213. During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, all moneys
that are lawfully credited to and available in any bond special revenue
fund and that are not otherwise specifically appropriated or limited by
this or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the
legislature are hereby appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, for the state agency for which the bond special revenue fund was
established for the purposes authorized by law for expenditures from
such bond special revenue fund. As used in this section, "bond special
revenue fund" means any special revenue fund or account thereof
established in the state treasury prior to or on or after the effective date
of this act for the deposit of the proceeds of bonds issued by the Kansas
development finance authority for the payment of debt service for
bonds issued by the Kansas development finance authority or for any

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 297
related purpose in accordance with applicable bond covenants.
Sec. 214. Federal grants. (a) During the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, each federal grant or other federal receipt that is received by a
state agency named in this act and that is not otherwise appropriated to
that state agency for fiscal year 2026 by this or other appropriation act
of the 2025 regular session of the legislature is hereby appropriated for
fiscal year 2026 for that state agency for the purpose set forth in such
federal grant or receipt, except that no expenditure shall be made from
and no obligation shall be incurred against any such federal grant or
other federal receipt that has not been previously appropriated or
reappropriated or approved for expenditure by the governor until the
governor has authorized the state agency to make expenditures
therefrom.
(b) In addition to the other purposes for which expenditures may
be made by any state agency that is named in this act and that is not
otherwise authorized by law to apply for and receive federal grants,
expenditures may be made by such state agency from moneys
appropriated for fiscal year 2026 by this act or any other appropriation
act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature to apply for and
receive federal grants during fiscal year 2026, which federal grants are
hereby authorized to be applied for and received by such state agencies:
Provided, That no expenditure shall be made from and no obligation
shall be incurred against any such federal grant or other federal receipt
that has not been previously appropriated or reappropriated or approved
for expenditure by the governor until the governor has authorized the
state agency to make expenditures therefrom.
Sec. 215. (a) Any correctional institutions building fund
appropriation heretofore appropriated to any state agency named in this
or other appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature
and having an unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2025, in excess of
$100 is hereby reappropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
for the same uses and purposes as originally appropriated, unless
specific provision is made for lapsing such appropriation.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered balance
in any account of the correctional institutions building fund that was
encumbered for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
Sec. 216. (a) Any Kansas educational building fund appropriation
heretofore appropriated to any institution named in this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature and
having an unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2025, in excess of
$100 is hereby reappropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
for the same use and purpose as originally appropriated, unless specific
provision is made for lapsing such appropriation.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered balance
in any account of the Kansas educational building fund that was
encumbered for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
Sec. 217. (a) Any state institutions building fund appropriation
heretofore appropriated to any state agency named in this or other
appropriation act of the 2025 regular session of the legislature and
having an unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2025, in excess of
$100 is hereby reappropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
for the same use and purpose as originally appropriated, unless specific
provision is made for lapsing such appropriation.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to the unencumbered balance
in any account of the state institutions building fund that was
encumbered for any fiscal year commencing prior to July 1, 2024.
Sec. 218. Any transfers of moneys during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, from any special revenue fund of any state agency
named in this act to the audit services fund of the division of post audit

SENATE BILL No. 125—page 298
under K.S.A. 46-1121, and amendments thereto, shall be in addition to
any expenditure limitation imposed on any such fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026.
Sec. 219. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 2-223, 12-1775a, 12-5256, 65-180,
74-50,107, 74-8711, 74-99b34, 76-775, 76-7,107, 76-7,155, 76-7,157,
79-2989, 79-3425i, 79-34,171, 79-4804 and 82a-955 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 220. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after
its publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
__________________________
SENATE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
as amended
HOUSE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
_____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.